VOL. I. B
THE HISTORY
OF
NEW YORK,
&c.
BOOK I.
Being, like all introductions to American
histories
,
very learned, sagacious, and nothing at all to
the purpose; containing divers profound theories
and philosophic speculations, which the idle reader
may totally overlook, and begin at the next book.
CHAP. I.
In which the Author ventures a Description of the
World, from the best Authorities
.
THE world in which we dwell is a huge, opake,
reflecting, inanimate mass, floating in the vast
etherial
ocean of infinite space. It has the form of an
orange, being an oblate spheroid, curiously flattened
at opposite parts, for the insertion of two imaginary
poles, which are supposed to penetrate and unite at
the centre; thus forming an axis on which the
mighty
orange turns with a regular diurnal revolution.
The transitions of light and darkness, whence
proceed the alternations of day and night, are
produced
by this diurnal revolution, successively
presenting
the different parts of the earth to the rays of
the sun. The latter is, according to the best, that
is to say, the latest, accounts, a luminous or fiery
body, of a prodigious magnitude, from which this
world is driven by a centrifugal or repelling power,
and to which it is drawn by a centripetal or
attractive
force; otherwise termed the attraction of
gravitation
;
the combination, or rather the
counteraction
of these two opposing impulses producing a
circular
and annual revolution. Hence result the
vicissitudes
of the seasons,
viz.
spring, summer, autumn,
and winter.
I am fully aware, that I expose myself to the
cavillings of sundry dead philosophers, by adopting
the above theory. Some will entrench themselves
behind the ancient opinion, that the earth is an
extended
plain, supported by vast pillars; others, that
it rests on the head of a snake, or the back of a huge
tortoise; and others, that it is an immense flat
pancake
,
and rests upon whatever it pleases God
formerly
a pious Catholic opinion, and sanctioned by a
formidable
bull
, dispatched from the vatican by a
most holy and infallible pontiff. Others will attack
my whole theory, by declaring with the Brahmins,
that the heavens rest upon the earth, and that the
sun and moon swim therein like fishes in the water,
moving from east to west by day, and gliding back
along the edge of the horizon to their original sta
tions during the night time.
[2]
[2]
Faria y Souza. Mick. Lus. Note B, 7.
While others will
maintain, with the Pauranicas of India, that is a vast
plain, encircled by seven oceans of milk, nectar and
other delicious liquids; that it is studded with seven
mountains, and ornamented in the centre by a
mountainous
rock of burnished gold; and that a great
dragon occasionally swallows up the moon, which
accounts for the phenomena of lunar eclipses.
Sir W. Jones, Diss. Antiq. Ind.
Zod.
I am confident also, I shall meet with equal
opposition
to my account of the sun; certain ancient
philosophers having affirmed that it is a vast wheel
of brilliant fire,
Plut. de Plac. Philos. lib. ii, cap.
20.
others that it is merely a mirror or
sphere of transparent chrystal;
Achill. Tat. Isag. cap. 19. Ap. Petav. t. iii, p. 81. Stob.
Eclog. Phys. lib. i, p. 56. Plut. de plac. p. p.
and a third class,
at the head of whom stands Anaxagoras, having
maintained, that it is nothing but a huge ignited
rock or stone, an opinion which the good people of
Athens have kindly saved me the trouble of
confuting
,
by turning the philosopher neck and heels
out of their city.
Diog. Laert. in Anaxag. I. ii, sec. 8. Plat. Apol. t i, p. 26.
Plut. de Superst. t. ii, p. 269. Xenoph. Mem. l. iv, p. 815.
Another set of philosophers, who
delight in variety, declare, that certain fiery particles
exhale constantly from the earth, which
concentrating
in a single point of the firmament by day, con
stitute the sun, but being scattered, and rambling
about in the dark at night, collect in various points
and form stars. These are regularly burnt out and
extinguished, like the lamps in our streets, and
require
a fresh supply of exhalations for the next
occasion
.
[3]
[3]
Aristot. Meteor. l. ii, c. 2. Idem. Probl. sec. 15. Stob.
Ecl. Phys. l. i, p. 55. Bruck. Hist. Phil. t. i, p. 1154, et alii.
It is even recorded that at certain remote and
obscure
periods, in consequence of a great scarcity of
fuel, (probably during a severe winter) the sun has
been completely burnt out, and not rekindled for a
whole month. A most melancholy occurrence, the
very idea of which gave vast concern to Heraclitus,
the celebrated weeping Philosopher, who was a
great stickler for this doctrine. Beside these
profound
speculations, others may expect me to
advocate
the opinion of Herschel, that the sun is a most
magnificent, habitable abode; the light it
furnishes
,
arising from certain empyreal, luminous or
phosphoric clouds, swimming in its transparent
atmosphere
.
Philos. Trans. 1795, p. 72.idem. 1801, p. 265.Nich.
Philos. Journ. 1. p. 13.
But to save dispute and altercation
with my readerswho I already perceive, are a
captious
,
discontented crew, and likely to give me a
world of troubleI now, once for all, wash my
hands of all and every of these theories, declining
entirely and unequivocally, any investigation of
B 2
their merits. The subject of the present chapter is
merely the Island, on which is built the goodly city
of New York,a very honest and substantial
Island
,
which I do not expect to find in the sun, or
moon; as I am no land speculator, but a plain
matter
of fact historian. I therefore renounce all
lunatic
,
or solaric excursions, and confine myself to the
limits of this terrene or earthly globe; somewhere
on the surface of which I pledge my credit as a
historian
(which
heaven and my landlord know is all
the credit I possess) to detect and demonstrate the
existence of this illustrious island to the conviction
of all reasonable people.
Proceeding on this discreet and considerate
plan, I rest satisfied with having advanced the most
approved and fashionable opinion on the form of this
earth and its movements; and I freely submit it to
the cavilling of any Philo, dead or alive, who may
choose to dispute its correctness. I must here
intreat
my unlearned readers (in which class I
humbly
presume to include nine tenths of those who
shall pore over these instructive pages) not to be
discouraged when they encounter a passage above
their comprehension; for as I shall admit nothing
into my work that is not pertinent and absolutely
essential
to its well being, so likewise I shall advance
no theory or hypothesis, that shall not be
elucidated
to the comprehension of the dullest intellect. I
am not one of those churlish authors, who do so
enwrap their works in the mystic fogs of scientific
jargon, that a man must be as wise as themselves to
understand their writings; on the contrary, my
pages, though abounding with sound wisdom and
profound erudition, shall be written with such
pleasant
and urbane perspicuity, that there shall not
even be found a country justice, an outward
alderman
,
or a member of congress, provided he can read
with tolerable fluency, but shall both understand and
profit by my labours. I shall therefore, proceed
forthwith to illustrate by experiment, the
complexity
of motion just ascribed to this our rotatory
planet.
Professor Von Poddingcoft (or Puddinghead as
the name may be rendered into English) was long
celebrated in the college of New York, for most
profound gravity of deportment, and his talent at
going to sleep in the midst of examinations; to the
infinite relief of his hopeful students, who thereby
worked their way through college with great ease
and little study. In the course of one of his
lectures
,
the learned professor, seizing a bucket of
water swung it round his head at arms length; the
impulse with which he threw the vessel from him,
being a centrifugal force, the retention of his arm
operating as a centripetal power, and the bucket,
which was a substitute for the earth, describing a
circular orbit round about the globular head and
ruby visage of Professor Von Poddingcoft, which
formed no bad representation of the sun. All of
these particulars were duly explained to the class of
gaping students around him. He apprised them
moreover, that the same principle of gravitation,
which retained the water in the bucket, restrains the
ocean from flying from the earth in its rapid
revolutions
;
and he further informed them that should
the motion of the earth be suddenly checked, it
would incontinently fall into the sun, through the
centripetal force of gravitation; a most ruinous
event to this planet, and one which would also
obscure
,
though it most probably would not extinguish
the solar luminary. An unlucky stripling, one of
those vagrant geniuses, who seem sent into the
world merely to annoy worthy men of the
puddinghead
order, desirous of ascertaining the correctness
of the experiment, suddenly arrested the arm of
the professor, just at the moment that the bucket
was in its zenith, which immediately descended with
astonishing precision, upon the philosophic head of
the instructor of youth. A hollow sound, and a
red-hot hiss attended the contact, but the theory
was in the amplest manner illustrated, for the
unfortunate
bucket perished in the conflict, but the
blazing countenance of Professor Von Poddingcoft,
emerged from amidst the waters, glowing fiercer
than ever with unutterable indignationwhereby
the students were marvellously edified, and departed
considerably wiser than before.
It is a mortifying circumstance, which greatly
perplexes many a pains taking philosopher, that
nature often refuses to second his most profound
and elaborate efforts; so that often after having
invented
one of the most ingenious and natural theories
imaginable, she will have the perverseness to act
directly in the teeth of his system, and flatly
contradict
his most favourite positions. This is a
manifest and unmerited grievance, since it throws
the censure of the vulgar and unlearned entirely
upon the philosopher; whereas the fault is not to
be ascribed to his theory, which is unquestionably
correct, but to the waywardness of dame nature,
who with the proverbial fickleness of her sex, is
continually
indulging in coquetries and caprices, and
seems really to take pleasure in violating all
philosophic
rules, and jilting the most learned and
indefatigable
of her adorers. Thus it happened with
respect to the foregoing satisfactory explanation of
the motion of our planet; it appears that the
centrifugal
force has long since ceased to operate, while
its antagonist remains in undiminished potency:
the world therefore, according to the theory as it
originally stood, ought in strict propriety to tumble
into the sunPhilosophers were convinced that it
would do so, and awaited in anxious impatience,
the fulfilment of their prognostications. But the
untoward planet, pertinaciously continued her
course, notwithstanding that she had reason,
philosophy
,
and a whole university of learned professors
opposed to her conduct. The philo's were all at a
non plus, and it is apprehended they would never
have fairly recovered from the slight and affront
which they conceived offered to them by the world,
had not a good natured professor kindly officiated
as mediator between the parties, and effected a
reconciliation
.
Finding the world would not accomodate
itself to the theory, he wisely determined to
accomodate
the theory to the world: he therefore
informed his brother philosophers, that the circular
motion of the earth round the sun was no sooner
engendered by the conflicting impulses above
described
,
than it became a regular revolution,
independent
of the causes which gave it originin short,
that madam earth having once taken it into her
head to whirl round, like a young lady of spirit in
a high dutch waltz, the duivel himself could not
stop her. The whole board of professors of the
university of Leyden joined in the opinion, being
heartily glad of any explanation that would decently
extricate them from their embarrassmentand
immediately
decreed the penalty of expulsion against
all who should presume to question its correctness:
the philosophers of all other nations gave an
unqualified
assent, and ever since that memorable
era the world has been left to take her own course,
and to revolve around the sun in such orbit as she
thinks proper.
CHAP. II.
Cosmogony or Creation of the World. With a
multitude
of excellent Theories, by which the
Creation
of a World is shewn to be no such difficult
Matter as common Folks would imagine
.
Having thus briefly introduced my reader to the
world, and given him some idea of its form and
situation
,
he will naturally be curious to know from
whence it came, and how it was created. And
indeed
these are points absolutely essential to be
cleared up, in as much as if this world had not
been formed, it is more than probable, nay I may
venture to assume it as a maxim or postulate at
least, that this renowned island on which is situated
the city of New York, would never have had an
existence. The regular course of my history
therefore
,
requires that I should proceed to notice the
cosmogony or formation of this our globe.
And now I give my readers fair warning, that I
am about to plunge for a chapter or two, into as
complete a labyrinth as ever historian was
perplexed
withal; therefore I advise them to take fast
hold of my skirts, and keep close at my heels,
venturing
neither to the right hand nor to the left,
least they get bemired in a slough of unintelligible
learning, or have their brains knocked out, by some
of those hard Greek names which will be flying
about in all directions. But should any of them
be too indolent or chicken-hearted to accompany
me in this perilous undertaking, they had better
take a short cut round, and wait for me at the
beginning
of some smoother chapter.
Of the creation of the world, we have a
thousand
contradictory accounts; and though a very
satisfactory one is furnished us by divine revelation,
yet every philosopher feels himself in honour bound,
to furnish us with a better. As an impartial
historian
,
I consider it my duty to notice their several
theories, by which mankind have been so
exceedingly
edified and instructed.
Thus it was the opinion of certain ancient sages,
that the earth and the whole system of the universe,
was the deity himself;
[4]
[4]
Aristot. ap. Cic. lib. i, cap. 3.
a doctrine most
strenuously
maintained by Zenophanes and the whole tribe
of Eleatics, as also by Strato and the sect of
peripatetic
or vagabondizing philosophers. Pythagoras
likewise inculcated the famous numerical system of
the monad, dyad and triad, and by means of his
sacred quaternary elucidated the formation of the
world, the arcana of nature and the principles both
of music and morals.
Aristot. Metaph. lib. i, c. 5. Idem de clo l. 3. c. i. Rousseau
mem. sur musique ancien. p. 39. Plutarch de plac. Philos. lib. i.
cap. 3. et. alii.
Other sages adhered to
the mathematical system of squares and triangles;
the cube, the pyramid and the sphere; the
tetrahedron
,
the octahedron, the icosahedron and the
dodecahedron
.
[5]
[5]
Tim. Locr. ap. Plato. t. 3. p. 90.
While others advocated the great
elementary theory, which refers the construction of
our globe and all that it contains, to the
combinations
of four material elements, air, earth, fire and
water; with the assistance of a fifth, an
immaterial
and vivifying principle; by which I presume
the worthy theorist meant to allude to that vivifying
spirit contained in gin, brandy, and other potent
liquors
,
and which has such miraculous effects, not
only on the ordinary operations of nature, but
likewise
on the creative brains of certain philosophers.
Nor must I omit to mention the great atomic
system taught by old Moschus before the siege of
Troy; revived by Democritus of laughing memory;
improved by Epicurus that king of good fellows,
and modernised by the fanciful Descartes. But I
decline enquiring, whether the atoms, of which the
earth is said to be composed, are eternal or recent;
whether they are animate or inanimate; whether,
agreeably to the opinion of the Atheists, they were
fortuitously aggregated, or as the Theists maintain,
were arranged by a supreme intelligence.
Aristot. Nat. Auscult. l. 2. cap. 6. Aristoph. Metaph. lib. i.
cap. 3. Cic de. Nat. deor. lib. i. cap. 10. Justin. Mart. orat. ad
gent. p. 20.
Whether
in fact the earth is an insensate clod, or whe
VOL. I. C
ther it is animated by a soul;
[6]
[6]
Mosheim in Cudw. lib. i. cap. 4. Tim. de anim. mund. ap.
Plat. lib. 3. Mem. de l'acad. des Belles Lettr. t. 32. p. 19. et alii.
which opinion was
strenuously maintained by a host of philosophers,
at the head of whom stands the great Plato, that
temperate sage, who threw the cold water of
philosophy
on the form of sexual intercourse, and
inculcated
the doctrine of Platonic affection, or the
art of making love without making children.An
exquisitely refined intercourse, but much better
adapted to the ideal inhabitants of his imaginary
island of Atlantis, than to the sturdy race, composed
of rebellious flesh and blood, who populate the
little
matter of fact island which we inhabit.
Besides these systems, we have moreover the
poetical theogeny of old Hesiod, who generated the
whole Universe in the regular mode of procreation,
and the plausible opinion of others, that the earth
was hatched from the great egg of night, which
floated in chaos, and was cracked by the horns of
the celestial bull. To illustrate this last doctrine,
Bishop Burnet in his Theory of the Earth,
Book i. ch. 5.
has
favoured us with an accurate drawing and
description
,
both of the form and texture of this mundane
egg; which is found to bear a miraculous
resemblance
to that of a
goose!
Such of my readers as take
a proper interest in the origin of this our planet, will
be pleased to learn, that the most profound sages
of antiquity, among the Egyptians, Chaldeans,
Persians, Greeks and Latins, have alternately
assisted
at the hatching of this strange bird, and that
their cacklings have been caught, and continued in
different tones and inflections, from philosopher to
philosopher, unto the present day.
But while briefly noticing long celebrated
systems
of ancient sages, let me not pass over with
neglect, those of other philosophers; which though
less universal and renowned, have equal claims to
attention, and equal chance for correctness. Thus
it is recorded by the Brahmins, in the pages of their
inspired Shastah, that the angel Bistnoo
transforming
himself into a great boar, plunged into the
watery abyss, and brought up the earth on his tusks.
Then issued from him a mighty tortoise, and a
mighty snake; and Bistnoo placed the snake erect
upon the back of the tortoise, and he placed the
earth upon the head of the snake.
[7]
[7]
Holwell. Gent. Philosophy.
The negro philosophers of Congo affirm, that
the world was made by the hands of angels,
excepting
their own country, which the Supreme
Being
constructed himself, that it might be supremely
excellent. And he took great pains with the
inhabitants
,
and made them very black, and beautiful:
and when he had finished the first man, he was well
pleased with him, and smoothed him over the face,
and hence his nose and the nose of all his
descendants
became flat.
The Mohawk Philosophers tell us that a
pregnant
woman fell down from heaven, and that a
tortoise
took her upon its back, because every place
was covered with water; and that the woman
sitting
upon the tortoise paddled with her hands in
the water, and raked up the earth, whence it finally
happened that the earth became higher than the
water.
[8]
[8]
Johannes Megapolensis, jun. Account of Maquaas or
Mohawk
Indians. 1644.
Beside these and many other equally sage
opinions
,
we have likewise the profound conjectures of
Aboul-Hassan-Aly
,
MSS. Biblist. Roi. Fr.
son of Al Khan, son of Aly,
son of Abderrahman, son of Abdallah, son of
Masoud-el-Hadheli
,
who is commonly called
Masoudi
,
and surnamed Cothbeddin, but who takes the
humble
title of Laheb-ar-rasoul, which means the
companion
of the ambassador of God. He has written
an universal history entitled
Mouroudge-ed-dhahrab
,
or the golden meadows and the mines of
precious
stones. In this valuable work he has related
the history of the world, from the creation down to
the moment of writing; which was, under the
Khaliphat
of Mothi Billah, in the month
Dgioumadi-elaoual
of the 336th year of the Hegira or flight of
the Prophet. He informs us that the earth is a
huge bird, Mecca and Medina constituting the head,
Persia and India the right wing, the land of Gog
the left wing, and Africa the tail. He informs us
moreover, than an earth has existed before the
present
,
(which he considers as a mere chicken of 7000
years) that it has undergone divers deluges, and
that, according to the opinion of some well
informed
Brahmins of his acquaintance, it will be
renovated
every seventy thousandth hazarouam; each
hazarouam consisting of 12,000 years.
But I forbear to quote a host more of these
ancient
and outlandish philosophers, whose deplorable
ignorance, in despite of all their erudition, compelled
them to write in languages which but few of my
readers can understand; and I shall proceed briefly
to notice a few more intelligible and fashionable
theories of their modern successors.
And first I shall mention the great Buffon, who
conjectures that this globe was originally a globe of
liquid fire, scintillated from the body of the sun,
by the percussion of a comet, as a spark is
generated
by the collision of flint and steel. That at first
it was surrounded by gross vapours, which cooling
and condensing in process of time, constituted,
according
to their densities, earth, water and air;
which gradually arranged themselves, according to
C 2
their respective gravities, round the burning or
vitrified
mass, that formed their centre, &c.
Hutton, on the contrary, supposes that the waters
at first were universally paramount; and he
terrifies
himself with the idea that the earth must be
eventually washed away, by the force of rain, rivers
and mountain torrents, untill it is confounded with
the ocean, or in other words, absolutely dissolves
into itself.Sublime idea! far surpassing that of the
tender-hearted damsel of antiquity who wept
herself
into a fountain; or the good dame of Narbonne
in France, who for a volubility of tongue unusual
in her sex, was doomed to peel five hundred
thousand
and thirty-nine ropes of onions, and actually
ran out at her eyes, before half the hideous task
was accomplished.
Whiston, the same ingenious philosopher who
rivalled Ditton in his researches after the longitude,
(for which the mischief-loving Swift discharged on
their heads a stanza as fragrant as an Edinburgh
nosegay) has distinguished himself by a very
admirable
theory respecting the earth. He
conjectures
that it was originally a
chaotic comet
, which
being selected for the abode of man, was removed
from its excentric orbit, and whirled round the sun
in its present regular motion; by which change of
direction, order succeeded to confusion in the
arrangement
of its component parts. The
philosopher
adds, that the deluge was produced by an un
courteous salute from the watery tail of another
comet; doubtless through sheer envy of its improved
condition; thus furnishing a melancholy proof that
jealousy may prevail, even among the heavenly
bodies, and discord interrupt that celestial harmony
of the spheres, so melodiously sung by the poets.
But I pass over a variety of excellent theories,
among which are those of Burnet, and Woodward,
and Whitehurst; regretting extremely that my time
will not suffer me to give them the notice they
deserve
And
shall conclude with that of the
renowed
Dr. Darwin, which I have reserved to the
last for the sake of going off
with a report
. This
learned Theban, who is as much distinguished for
rhyme as reason, and for good natured credulity as
serious research, and who has recommended himself
wonderfully to the good graces of the ladies, by
letting them into all the gallantries, amours,
debaucheries
,
and other topics of scandal of the court
of Flora; has fallen upon a theory worthy of his
combustible imagination. According to his opinion,
the huge mass of chaos took a sudden occasion to
explode, like a barrel of gunpowder, and in that act
exploded the sunwhich in its flight by a similar
explosion
expelled the earthwhich in like guise
exploded
the moonand thus by a concatenation of
explosions, the whole solar system was produced,
and set most systematically in motion!
[9]
[9]
Darw. Bot. Garden. Part I, Cant. i, l. 105.
By the great variety of theories here alluded to,
every one of which, if thoroughly examined, will
be found surprisingly consistent in all its parts; my
unlearned readers will perhaps be led to conclude,
that the creation of a world is not so difficult a task
as they at first imagined. I have shewn at least a
score of ingenious methods in which a world could
be constructed; and I have no doubt, that had any
of the Philo's above quoted, the use of a good
manageable comet, and the philosophical ware-house
chaos
at his command, he would engage, by the aid
of philosophy to manufacture a planet as good, or
if you would take his word for it, better than this
we inhabit.
And here I cannot help noticing the kindness
of Providence, in creating comets for the great
relief
of bewildered philosophers. By their assistance
more sudden evolutions and transitions are affected
in the system of nature, than are wrought in a
pantomimic
exhibition, by the wonder-working sword
of Harlequin. Should one of our modern sages,
in his theoretical flights among the stars, ever find
himself lost in the clouds, and in danger of tumbling
into the abyss of nonsense and absurdity, he has but
to seize a comet by the beard, mount astride of its
tail, and away he gallops in triumph, like an
enchanter
on his hyppogriff, or a Connecticut witch on
her broomstick, to sweep the cobwebs out of the
sky.
It is an old and vulgar saying, about a beggar
on horse back, which I would not for the world
have applied to our most reverend philosophers;
but I must confess, that some of them, when they
are mounted on one of these fiery steeds, are as
wild in their curvettings as was Phton of yore,
when he aspired to manage the chariot of Phbus.
One drives his comet at full speed against the sun,
and knocks the world out of him with the mighty
concussion; another more moderate, makes his
comet a kind of beast of burden, carrying the sun
a regular supply of food and faggotsa third, of
more combustible disposition, threatens to throw
his comet, like a bombshell into the world, and
blow it up like a powder magazine; while a fourth,
with no great delicacy to this respectable planet,
and its inhabitants, insinuates that some day or
other, his cometmy modest pen blushes while I
write itshall absolutely turn tail upon our world
and deluge it with water!Surely as I have already
observed, comets were bountifully provided by
Providence for the benefit of philosophers, to assist
them in manufacturing theories.
When a man once doffs the straight waistcoat
of common sense, and trusts merely to his
imagination
,
it is astonishing how rapidly he gets forward.
Plodding souls, like myself, who jog along on the
two legs nature has given them, are sadly put to it
to clamber over the rocks and hills, to toil through
the mud and mire, and to remove the continual
obstructions
,
that abound in the path of science. But
your adventurous philosopher launches his theory
like a balloon, and having inflated it with the smoke
and vapours of his own heated imagination, mounts
it in triumph, and soars away to his congenial
regions
in the moon. Every age has furnished its
quota of these adventurers in the realms of fancy,
who voyage among the clouds for a season and are
stared at and admired, until some envious rival
assails
their air blown pageant, shatters its crazy
texture, lets out the smoke, and tumbles the
adventurer
and his theory into the mud. Thus one
race of philosophers demolish the works of their
predecessors, and elevate more splendid fantasies in
their stead, which in their turn are demolished and
replaced by the air castles of a succeeding generation.
Such are the grave eccentricities of genius, and the
mighty soap bubbles, with which the grown up
children of science amuse themselveswhile the
honest vulgar, stand gazing in stupid admiration,
and dignify these fantastic vagaries with the name
of wisdom!surely old Socrates was right in his
opinion that philosophers are but a soberer sort of
madmen, busying themselves in things which are
totally incomprehensible, or which, if they could
be comprehended, would be found not worth the
trouble of discovery.
And now, having adduced several of the most
important theories that occur to my recollection,
I leave my readers at full liberty to choose among
them. They are all the serious speculations of
learned menall differ essentially from each
otherand all have the same title to belief. For
my part, (as I hate an embarrassment of choice)
until the learned have come to an agreement among
themselves, I shall content myself with the account
handed us down by the good old Moses; in which
I do but follow the example of our ingenious
neighbours
of Connecticut; who at their first settlement
proclaimed, that the colony should be governed by
the laws of Goduntil they had time to make
better
.
One thing however appears certainfrom the
unanimous authority of the before quoted
philosophers
,
supported by the evidence of our own
senses
,
(which, though very apt to deceive us, may be
cautiously admitted as additional testimony) it
appears
I say, and I make the assertion deliberately,
without fear of contradiction, that this globe really
was created
, and that it is composed of
land and
water
. It further appears that it is curiously divided
and parcelled out into continents and islands, among
which I boldly declare the renowned
Island of
New York
, will be found, by any one who seeks
for it in its proper place.
Thus it will be perceived, that like an
experienced
historian I confine myself to such points as are
absolutely essential to my subjectbuilding up my
work, after the manner of the able architect who
erected our theatre; beginning with the foundation,
then the body, then the roof, and at last perching
our snug little island like the little cupola on the
top. Having dropt upon this simile by chance I
shall make a moment's further use of it, to illustrate
the correctness of my plan. Had not the
foundation
,
the body, and the roof of the theatre first
been built, the cupola could not have had existence
as a cupolait might have been a centry-boxor
a watchman's boxor it might have been placed in
the rear of the Manager's house and have formed
a temple;but it could never have been considered a
cupola. As therefore the building of the theatre
was necessary to the existence of the cupola, as a
cupolaso the formation of the globe and its
internal
construction, were first necessary to the existence
of this island, as an islandand thus the necessity
and importance of this part of my history, which
in a manner is no part of my history, is logically
proved.
CHAP. III.
How that famous navigator, Admiral Noah, was
shamefully nick-named; and how he committed
an unpardonable oversight in not having four
sons. With the great trouble of philosophers
caused thereby, and the discovery of America
.
Noah
, who is the first sea-faring man we read
of, begat three sons, Shem, Ham, and Japhet.
Authors
it is true, are not wanting, who affirm that the
patriarch had a number of other children. Thus
Berosus makes him father of the gigantic Titans,
Methodius gives him a son called Jonithus, or
Jonicus
,
(who was the first inventor of Johnny cakes,)
and others have mentioned a son, named Thuiscon,
from whom descended the Teutons or Teutonic, or
in other words, the Dutch nation.
I regret exceedingly that the nature of my plan
will not permit me to gratify the laudable curiosity
of my readers, by investigating minutely the history
of the great Noah. Indeed such an undertaking
would be attended with more trouble than many
people would imagine; for the good old patriarch
seems to have been a great traveller in his day, and
to have passed under a different name in every
country that he visited. The Chaldeans for instance
give us his story, merely altering his name into
Xisuthrusa trivial alteration, which to an historian
VOL. I. D
skilled in etymologies, will appear wholly
unimportant
.
It appears likewise, that he had exchanged
his tarpawlin and quadrant among the Chaldeans,
for the gorgeous insignia of royalty, and appears as
a monarch in their annals. The Egyptians celebrate
him under the name of Osiris; the Indians as
Menu; the Greek and Roman writers confound
him with Ogyges, and the Theban with Deucalion
and Saturn. But the Chinese, who deservedly rank
among the most extensive and authentic historians,
inasmuch as they have known the world ever since
some millions of years before it was created, declare
that Noah was no other than Fohi, a worthy
gentleman
,
descended from an ancient and respectable
family of Hong merchants, that flourished in the
middle ages of the empire. What gives this
assertion
some air of credibility is, that it is a fact,
admitted
by the most enlightened literati, that Noah
travelled into China, at the time of the building of
the Tower of Babel (probably to improve himself
in the study of languages) and the learned Dr.
Shackford gives us the additional information, that
the ark rested upon a mountain on the frontiers of
China.
From this mass of rational conjectures and sage
hypotheses, many satisfactory deductions might be
drawn; but I shall content myself with the
unquestionable
fact stated in the Bible, that Noah begat
three sonsShem, Ham, and Japhet.
It may be asked by some inquisitive readers,
not much conversant with the art of history writing,
what have Noah and his sons to do with the subject
of this work? Now though, in strict justice, I am
not bound to satisfy such querulous spirits, yet as
I have determined to accommodate my book to
every capacity, so that it shall not only delight the
learned, but likewise instruct the simple, and edify
the vulgar; I shall never hesitate for a moment to
explain any matter that may appear obscure.
Noah we are told by sundry very credible
historians
,
becoming sole surviving heir and proprietor
of the earth, in fee simple, after the deluge, like a
good father portioned out his estate among his
children. To Shem he gave Asia, to Ham, Africa,
and to Japhet, Europe. Now it is a thousand times
to be lamented that he had but three sons, for had
there been a fourth, he would doubtless have
inherited
America; which of course would have been
dragged forth from its obscurity on the occasion;
and thus many a hard working historian and
philosopher
,
would have been spared a prodigious mass
of weary conjecture, respecting the first discovery
and population of this country. Noah, however,
having provided for his three sons, looked in all
probability
,
upon our country as mere wild unsettled
land, and said nothing about it, and to this
unpardonable
taciturnity of the patriarch may we ascribe
the misfortune, that America did not come into the
world, as early as the other quarters of the globe.
It is true some writers have vindicated him
from this misconduct towards posterity, and
asserted
that he really did discover America. Thus it
was the opinion of Mark Lescarbot, a French
writer possessed of that ponderosity of thought, and
profoundness of reflection, so peculiar to his nation,
that the immediate descendants of Noah peopled
this quarter of the globe, and that the old patriarch
himself, who still retained a passion for the
sea-faring
life, superintended the transmigration. The
pious and enlightened father Charlevoix, a French
Jesuit, remarkable for his veracity and an aversion
to the marvellous, common to all great travellers,
is conclusively of the same opinion; nay, he goes
still further, and decides upon the manner in which
the discovery was effected, which was by sea, and
under the immediate direction of the great Noah.
I have already observed, exclaims the good
father
in a tone of becoming indignation, that it is an
arbitrary supposition that the grand children of
Noah were not able to penetrate into the new world,
or that they never thought of it. In effect, I can
see no reason that can justify such a notion. Who
can seriously believe, that Noah and his immediate
descendants knew less than we do, and that the
builder and pilot of the greatest ship that ever was,
a ship which was formed to traverse an unbounded
ocean, and had so many shoals and quicksands to
guard against, should be ignorant of, or should not
have communicated to his descendants the art of
sailing on the ocean? Therefore they did sail on
the oceantherefore they sailed to America
therefore
America was discovered by Noah!
Now all this exquisite chain of reasoning, which
is so strikingly characteristic of the good father,
being addressed to the faith, rather than the
understanding
,
is flatly opposed by Hans De Laet,
who declares it a real and most ridiculous paradox,
to suppose that Noah ever entertained the thought
of discovering America; and as Hans is a Dutch
writer, I am inclined to believe he must have been
much better acquainted with the worthy crew of
the ark than his competitors, and of course
possessed
of more accurate sources of information. It is
astonishing how intimate historians daily become
with the patriarchs and other great men of antiquity.
As intimacy improves with time, and as the learned
are particularly inquisitive and familiar in their
acquaintance with the ancients, I should not be
surprised, if some future writers should gravely
give us a picture of men and manners as they
existed
before the flood, far more copious and accurate
than the Bible; and that, in the course of another
century, the log book of old Noah should be as
current among historians, as the voyages of Captain
Cook, or the renowned history of Robinson Crusoe.
D 2
I shall not occupy my time by discussing the
huge mass of additional suppositions, conjectures
and probabilities respecting the first discovery of
this country, with which unhappy historians
overload
themselves, in their endeavours to satisfy the
doubts of an incredulous world. It is painful to
see these laborious wights panting and toiling, and
sweating under an enormous burthen, at the very
outset of their works, which on being opened, turns
out to be nothing but a mighty bundle of straw.
As, however, by unwearied assiduity, they seem to
have established the fact, to the satisfaction of all
the world, that this country
has been discovered
,
I shall avail myself of their useful labours to be
extremely brief upon this point.
I shall not therefore stop to enquire, whether
America was first discovered by a wandering
vessel
of that celebrated Phnecian fleet, which,
according
to Herodotus, circumnavigated Africa; or
by that Carthagenian expedition, which Pliny, the
naturalist, informs us, discovered the Canary
Islands
;
or whether it was settled by a temporary
colony from Tyre, as hinted by Aristotle and
Seneca
.
I shall neither enquire whether it was first
discovered by the Chinese, as Vossius with great
shrewdness advances, nor by the Norwegians in
1002, under Biorn; nor by Behem, the German
navigator, as Mr. Otto has endeavoured to prove
to the Savans of the learned city of Philadelphia.
Nor shall I investigate the more modern claims
of the Welsh, founded on the voyage of Prince
Madoc in the eleventh century, who having never
returned, it has since been wisely concluded that
he must have gone to America, and that for a plain
reasonif he did not go there, where else could he
have gone?a question which most Socratically
shuts out all further dispute.
Laying aside, therefore, all the conjectures
above mentioned, with a multitude of others,
equally
satisfactory, I shall take for granted, the vulgar
opinion that America was discovered on the 12th
of October, 1492, by Christovallo Colon, a
Genoese
,
who has been clumsily nick-named Columbus,
but for what reason I cannot discern. Of the
voyages
and adventures of this Colon, I shall say
nothing
,
seeing that they are already sufficiently
known. Nor shall I undertake to prove that this
country should have been called Colonia, after his
name, that being notoriously self evident.
Having thus happily got my readers on this side
of the Atlantic, I picture them to myself, all
impatience
to enter upon the enjoyment of the land of
promise, and in full expectation that I will
immediately
deliver it into their possession. But if I
do, may I ever forfeit the reputation of a regular
bred historian. Nonomost curious and thrice
learned readers, (for thrice learned ye are if ye
have read all that goes before, and nine times
learned shall ye be, if ye read all that comes after)
we have yet a world of work before us. Think
you the first discoverers of this fair quarter of the
globe, had nothing to do but go on shore and find
a country ready laid out and cultivated like a
garden
,
wherein they might revel at their ease? No
such thingthey had forests to cut down,
underwood
to grub up, marshes to drain, and savages to
exterminate.
In like manner, I have sundry doubts to clear
away, questions to resolve, and paradoxes to
explain
,
before I permit you to range at random;
but these difficulties, once overcome, we shall be
enabled to jog on right merrily through the rest of
our history. Thus my work shall, in a manner,
echo the nature of the subject, in the same manner
as the sound of poetry has been found by certain
shrewd critics, to echo the sensethis being an
improvement in history, which I claim the merit
of having invented.
CHAP. IV.
Shewing the great toil and contention which
Philosophers
have had in peopling America.And
how the Aborigines came to be begotten by
accident
to
the great satisfaction and relief of the
author
.
Bless
us!what a hard life we historians have
of it, who undertake to satisfy the doubts of the
world!Here have I been toiling and moiling
through three pestiferous chapters, and my readers
toiling and moiling at my heels; up early and to
bed late, poring over worm-eaten, obsolete,
good-for-nothing
books, and cultivating the acquaintance
of a thousand learned authors, both ancient and
modern, who, to tell the honest truth, are the
stupidest
companions in the worldand after all,
what have we got by it?Truly the mighty
valuable
conclusion, that this country does actually
exist
,
and has been discovered; a self-evident fact
not worth a hap'worth of gingerbread. And what
is worse, we seem just as far off from the city of
New York now, as we were at first. Now for
myself
,
I would not care the value of a brass button,
being used to this dull and learned company; but
I feel for my unhappy readers, who seem most
woefully jaded and fatigued.
Still, however, we have formidable difficulties
to encounter, since it yet remains, if possible, to
shew how this country was originally peopled
a point fruitful of incredible embarrassment, to us
scrupulous historians, but absolutely indispensable
to our works. For unless we prove that the
Aborigines
did absolutely come from some where, it
will be immediately asserted in this age of
scepticism
,
that they did not come at all; and if they did
not come at all, then was this country never
populated
a
conclusion perfectly agreeable to the rules
of logic, but wholly irreconcilable to every feeling
of humanity, inasmuch as it must syllogistically
prove fatal to the innumerable Aborigines of this
populous region.
To avert so dire a sophism, and to rescue from
logical annihilation so many millions of fellow
creatures
,
how many wings of geese have been
plundered
!
what oceans of ink have been benevolently
drained! and how many capacious heads of
learned
historians have been addled and forever
confounded
!
I pause with reverential awe, when I
contemplate the ponderous tomes in different
languages
,
with which they have endeavoured to solve
this question, so important to the happiness of
society
,
but so involved in clouds of impenetrable
obscurity. Historian after historian has engaged
in the endless circle of hypothetical argument, and
after leading us a weary chace through octavos,
quartos, and folios, has let us out at the end of his
work, just as wise as we were at the beginning.
It was doubtless some philosophical wild goose
chace of the kind, that made the old poet
Macrobius
rail in such a passion at curiosity, which he
anathematizes most heartily, as an irksome
agonizing
care, a superstitious industry about
unprofitable
things, an itching humour to see what is not to
be seen, and to be doing what signifies nothing when
it is done.
But come my lusty readers, let us address
ourselves
to our task and fall vigorously to work upon
the remaining rubbish that lies in our way; but I
warrant, had master Hercules, in addition to his
seven labours, been given as an eighth to write a
genuine American history, he would have been
fain to abandon the undertaking, before he got over
the threshold of his work.
Of the claims of the children of Noah to the
original population of this country I shall say
nothing, as they have already been touched upon
in my last chapter. The claimants next in
celebrity
,
are the decendants of Abraham. Thus
Christoval Colon (vulgarly called Columbus) when
he first discovered the gold mines of Hispaniola
immediately concluded, with a shrewdness that
would have done honour to a philosopher, that he
had found the ancient Ophir, from whence
Solomon
procured the gold for embellishing the
temple
at Jerusalem; nay Colon even imagined that
he saw the remains of furnaces of veritable Hebraic
construction, employed in refining the precious ore.
So golden a conjecture, tinctured with such
fascinating
extravagance, was too tempting not to be
immediately snapped at by the gudgeons of
learning
,
and accordingly, there were a host of profound
writers, ready to swear to its correctness, and to
bring in their usual load of authorities, and wise
surmises, wherewithal to prop it up. Vetablus and
Robertus Stephens declared nothing could be more
clearArius Montanus without the least
hesitation
asserts that Mexico was the true Ophir, and
the Jews the early settlers of the country. While
Possevin, Becan, and a host of other sagacious
writers, lug in a
supposed
prophecy of the fourth
book of Esdras, which being inserted in the mighty
hypothesis, like the key stone of an arch, gives it,
in their opinion, perpetual durability.
Scarce however, have they completed their
goodly superstructure, than in trudges a phalanx of
opposite authors, with Hans de Laet the great
Dutchman at their head, and at one blow, tumbles
the whole fabric about their ears. Hans in fact,
contradicts outright all the Israelitish claims to the
first settlement of this country, attributing all those
equivocal symptoms, and traces of Christianity and
Judaism, which have been said to be found in
divers
provinces of the new world, to the
Devil
, who
has always affected to counterfeit the worship of
the true Deity. A remark, says the knowing
old Padre d'Acosta, made by all good authors
who have spoken of the religion of nations newly
discovered, and founded besides on the authority
of the
fathers of the church
.
Some writers again, among whom it is with
great regret I am compelled to mention Lopez de
Gomara, and Juan de Leri, insinuate that the
Canaanites
,
being driven from the land of promise by
the Jews, were seized with such a panic, that they
fled without looking behind them, until stopping
to take breath they found themselves safe in
America
.
As they brought neither their national
language
,
manners nor features, with them, it is
supposed
they left them behind in the hurry of their
flightI cannot give my faith to this opinion.
I pass over the supposition of the learned
Grotius
,
who being both an ambassador and a
Dutchman
to boot, is entitled to great respect; that
North America, was peopled by a strolling
company
of Norwegians, and that Peru was founded
by a colonyfrom ChinaManco or Mungo Capac,
the first Incas, being himself a Chinese. Nor shall
I more than barely mention that father Kircher,
ascribes the settlement of America to the
Egyptians
,
Budbeck to the Scandinavians, Charron to the
Gauls, Juffredus Petri to a skaiting party from
Friesland, Milius to the Celt, Marinocus the
Sicilian
VOL. I. E
to the Romans, Le Compte to the
Phoenicians
,
Postel to the Moors, Martyn d'Angleria to the
Abyssinians, together with the sage surmise of De
Laet, that England, Ireland and the Orcades may
contend for that honour.
Nor will I bestow any more attention or credit
to the idea that America is the fairy region of
Zipangri
,
described by that dreaming traveller Marco
Polo the Venetian; or that it comprizes the
visionary
island of Atlantis, described by Plato. Neither
will I stop to investigate the heathenish assertion of
Paracelsus, that each hemisphere of the globe was
originally furnished with an Adam and Eve. Or
the more flattering opinion of Dr. Romayne
supported
by many nameless authorities, that Adam
was of the Indian raceor the startling conjecture
of Buffon, Helvetius, and Darwin, so highly
honourable
to mankind, and peculiarly complimentary
to the French nation, that the whole human species
are accidentally descended from a remarkable
family
of monkies!
This last conjecture, I must own, came upon
me very suddenly and very ungraciously. I have
often beheld the clown in a pantomime, while
gazing
in stupid wonder at the extravagant gambols
of a harlequin, all at once electrified by a sudden
stroke of the wooden sword across his shoulders.
Little did I think at such times, that it would ever
fall to my lot to be treated with equal discourtesy,
and that while I was quietly beholding these grave
philosophers, emulating the excentric
transformations
of the parti-coloured hero of pantomime, they
would on a sudden turn upon me and my readers,
and with one flourish of their conjectural wand,
metamorphose us into beasts! I determined from
that moment not to burn my fingers with any more
of their theories, but content myself with detailing
the different methods by which they transported the
descendants of these ancient and respectable
monkeys
,
to this great field of theoretical warfare.
This was done either by migrations by land or
transmigrations by water. Thus Padre Joseph D'
Acosta enumerates three passages by land, first by
the north of Europe, secondly by the north of Asia
and thirdly by regions southward of the straits of
Magellan
.
The learned Grotius marches his
Norwegians
by a pleasant route across frozen rivers and
arms of the sea, through Iceland, Greenland,
Estotiland
and Naremberga. And various writers,
among whom are Angleria, De Hornn and Buffon,
anxious for the acommodation of these travellers,
have fastened the two continents together by a
strong chain of deductionsby which means they
could pass over dry shod. But should even this
fail, Pinkerton, that industrious old gentleman, who
compiles books and manufactures Geographies, and
who erst flung away his wig and cane, frolicked
like a naughty boy, and committed a thousand
etourderies, among the
petites filles
of Paris
[10]
[10]
Vide Ed. Review
he I say, has constructed a natural bridge of ice,
from continent to continent, at the distance of four
or five miles from Behring's straitsfor which he
is entitled to the grateful thanks of all the
wandering
aborigines who ever did, or ever will pass over
it.
It is an evil much to be lamented, that none of
the worthy writers above quoted, could ever
commence
his work, without immediately declaring
hostilities
against every writer who had treated of the
same subject. In this particular, authors may be
compared to a certain sagacious bird, which in
building
its nest, is sure to pull to pieces the nests of all
the birds in its neighbourhood. This unhappy
propensity
tends grievously to impede the progress of
sound knowledge. Theories are at best but brittle
productions, and when once committed to the stream,
they should take care that like the notable pots
which were fellow voyagers, they do not crack each
other. But this literary animosity is almost
unconquerable
.
Even I, who am of all men the most
candid and liberal, when I sat down to write this
authentic history, did all at once conceive an
absolute
,
bitter and unutterable contempt, a strange and
unimaginable disbelief, a wondrous and most
ineffable
scoffing of the spirit, for the theories of the
numerous
literati, who have treated before me, of this
country. I called them jolter heads, numsculls,
dunderpates, dom cops, bottericks, domme jordans,
and a thousand other equally indignant appellations.
But when I came to consider the matter coolly and
dispassionately, my opinion was altogether changed.
When I beheld these sages gravely accounting for
unaccountable things, and discoursing thus wisely
about matters forever hidden from their eyes, like
a blind man describing the glories of light, and the
beauty and harmony of colours, I fell back in
astonishment
at the amazing extent of human ingenuity.
Ifcried I to myself, these learned men can weave
whole systems out of nothing, what would be their
productions were they furnished with substantial
materialsif they can argue and dispute thus
ingeniously
about subjects beyond their knowledge,
what would be the profundity of their observations,
did they but know what they were talking about!
Should old Radamanthus, when he comes to decide
upon their conduct while on earth, have the least
idea of the usefulness of their labours, he will
undoubtedly
class them with those notorious wise men
of Gotham, who milked a bull, twisted a rope of
sand, and wove a velvet purse from a sow's ear.
My chief surprise is, that among the many
writers
I have noticed, no one has attempted to prove
that this country was peopled from the moonor
that the first inhabitants floated hither on islands of
E 2
ice, as white bears cruize about the northern oceans
or that they were conveyed here by balloons, as modern
reconauts pass from Dover to Calaisor by
witchcraft
,
as Simon Magus posted among the starsor
after the manner of the renowned Scythian Abaris,
who like the New England witches on full-blooded
broomsticks, made most unheard of journeys on
the back of a golden arrow, given him by the
Hyperborean
Apollo.
But there is still one mode left by which this
country could have been peopled, which I have
reserved
for the last, because I consider it worth all
the rest, it is
by accident!
Speaking of the islands
of Solomon, New Guinea, and New Holland, the
profound
father Charlevoix observes, in fine, all these
countries are peopled, and
it is possible
, some have
been so
by accident
. Now if it could have happened
in that manner, why might it not have been at the
same time
, and by the
same means
, with
the other
parts
of the globe? This ingenious mode of deducing
certain conclusions from possible premises, is an
improvement
in syllogistic skill, and proves the good
father superior even to Archimedes, for he can turn
the world without any thing to rest his lever upon.
It is only surpassed by the dexterity with which the
sturdy old Jesuit, in another place, demolishes the
gordian knotNothing says he, is more easy.
The inhabitants of both hemispheres are certainly the
descendants of the same father. The common father
of mankind, received an express order from Heaven,
to people the world, and
accordingly it has been
peopled
. To bring this about, it was necessary to
overcome all difficulties in the way,
and they have
also been overcome!
Pious Logician! How does
he put all the herd of laborious theorists to the
blush, by explaining in fair words, what it has cost
them volumes to prove they knew nothing about!
They have long been picking at the lock, and
fretting at the latch, but the honest father at once
unlocks the door by bursting it open, and when he
has it once a-jar, he is at full liberty to pour in as
many nations as he pleases. This proves to a
demonstration
that a little piety is better than a
cartload
of philosophy, and is a practical illustration of
that scriptural promiseBy faith ye shall move
mountains.
From all the authorities here quoted, and a
variety
of others which I have consulted, but which
are omitted through fear of fatiguing the unlearned
readerI can only draw the following conclusions,
which luckily however, are sufficient for my purpose
First, That this part of the world has actually
been
peopled
(Q. E. D.) to support which, we have living
proofs in the numerous tribes of Indians that
inhabit
it. Secondly, That it has been peopled in five
hundred different ways, as proved by a cloud of
authors
,
who from the positiveness of their assertions
seem to have been eye witnesses to the fact
Thirdly, That the people of this country had a
variety
of fathers
, which as it may not be thought
much to their credit by the common run of readers,
the less we say on the subject the better. The
question
therefore, I trust, is forever at rest.
CHAP. V.
In which the Author puts a mighty Question to the
rout, by the assistance of the Man in the Moon
which not only delivers thousands of people
from great embarrassment, but likewise
concludes
this introductory book
.
The
writer of a history may, in some respects,
be likened unto an adventurous knight, who having
undertaken a perilous enterprize, by way of
establishing
his fame, feels bound in honour and
chivalry
,
to turn back for no difficulty nor hardship,
and never to shrink or quail whatever enemy he
may encounter. Under this impression, I
resolutely
draw my pen and fall to, with might and
main, at those doughty questions and subtle
paradoxes
,
which, like fiery dragons and bloody giants,
beset the entrance to my history, and would fain
repulse me from the very threshold. And at this
moment a gigantic question has started up, which
I must take by the beard and utterly subdue, before
I can advance another step in my historick
undertaking
but
I trust this will be the last adversary I
shall have to contend with, and that in the next
book, I shall be enabled to conduct my readers in
triumph into the body of my work.
The question which has thus suddenly arisen,
is, what right had the first discoverers of America
to land, and take possession of a country, without
asking the consent of its inhabitants, or yielding
them an adequate compensation for their territory?
My readers shall now see with astonishment,
how easily I will vanquish this gigantic doubt,
which has so long been the terror of adventurous
writers; which has withstood so many fierce
assaults
,
and has given such great distress of mind to
multitudes of kind-hearted folks. For, until this
mighty question is totally put to rest, the worthy
people of America can by no means enjoy the soil
they inhabit, with clear right and title, and quiet,
unsullied consciences.
The first source of right, by which property is
acquired in a country, is DISCOVERY. For as all
mankind have an equal right to any thing, which
has never before been appropriated, so any nation,
that discovers an uninhabited country, and takes
possession thereof, is considered as enjoying full
property, and absolute, unquestionable empire
therein.
[11]
[11]
Grotius. Puffendorf, b. 4. c. 4. Vattel, b. 1. c. 18. et alii.
This proposition being admitted, it follows
clearly, that the Europeans who first visited
America
,
were the real discoverers of the same; nothing
being necessary to the establishment of this fact,
but simply to prove that it was totally uninhabited
by man. This would at first appear to be a point
of some difficulty, for it is well known, that this
quarter of the world abounded with certain
animals
,
that walked erect on two feet, had something
of the human countenance, uttered certain
unintelligible
sounds, very much like language, in short,
had a marvellous resemblance to human beings.
But the host of zealous and enlightened fathers,
who accompanied the discoverers, for the purpose
of promoting the kingdom of heaven, by
establishing
fat monasteries and bishopricks on earth, soon
cleared up this point, greatly to the satisfaction of
his holiness the pope, and of all Christian voyagers
and discoverers.
They plainly proved, and as there were no
Indian
writers arose on the other side, the fact was
considered as fully admitted and established, that
the two legged race of animals before mentioned,
were mere cannibals, detestable monsters, and many
of them giantsa description of vagrants, that
since the times of Gog, Magog and Goliath, have
been considered as outlaws, and have received no
quarter in either history, chivalry or song; indeed,
even the philosopher Bacon, declared the
Americans
to be people proscribed by the laws of nature,
inasmuch as they had a barbarous custom of
sacrificing
men, and feeding upon man's flesh.
Nor are these all the proofs of their utter
barbarism
:
among many other writers of discernment,
the celebrated Ulloa tells us their imbecility is so
visible, that one can hardly form an idea of them
different from what one has of the brutes. Nothing
disturbs the tranquillity of their souls, equally
insensible
to disasters, and to prosperity. Though half
naked, they are as contented as a monarch in his
most splendid array. Fear makes no impression
on them, and respect as little.All this is
furthermore
supported by the authority of M.
Bouguer
.
It is not easy, says he, to describe the
degree of their indifference for wealth and all its
advantages. One does not well know what
motives
to propose to them when one would persuade
them to any service. It is vain to offer them
money
,
they answer that they are not hungry. And
Vanegas confirms the whole, assuring us that
ambition, they have none, and are more desirous
of being thought strong, than valiant. The objects of
ambition with us, honour, fame, reputation, riches,
posts and distinctions are unknown among them.
So that this powerful spring of action, the cause of
so much
seeming
good and
real
evil in the world
has no power over them. In a word, these
unhappy
mortals may be compared to children, in whom
the developement of reason is not completed.
Now all these peculiarities, though in the
unenlightened
states of Greece, they would have
entitled
their possessors to immortal honour, as
having reduced to practice those rigid and
abstemious
maxims, the mere talking about which,
acquired
certain old Greeks the reputation of sages
and philosophers;yet were they clearly proved
in the present instance, to betoken a most abject
and brutified nature, totally beneath the human
character. But the benevolent fathers, who had
undertaken to turn these unhappy savages into
dumb beasts, by dint of argument, advanced still
stronger proofs; for as certain divines of the
sixteenth
century, and among the rest Lullus affirm
the Americans go naked, and have no beards!
They have nothing, says Lullus, of the
reasonable
animal, except the mask.And even that
mask was allowed to avail them but little, for it was
soon found that they were of a hideous copper
complexionand being of a copper complexion, it
was all the same as if they were negroesand
negroes
are black, and black said the pious fathers,
devoutly crossing themselves, is the colour of the
Devil! Therefore so far from being able to own
property, they had no right even to personal
freedom
,
for liberty is too radiant a deity, to inhabit
such gloomy temples. All which circumstances
plainly convinced the righteous followers of Cortes
and Pizarro, that these miscreants had no title to
the soil that they infestedthat they were a
perverse
,
illiterate, dumb, beardless, bare-bottomed
black-seed
mere wild beasts of the forests, and like
them should either be subdued or exterminated.
From the foregoing arguments therefore, and a
VOL. I. F
host of others equally conclusive, which I forbear
to enumerate, it was clearly evident, that this fair
quarter of the globe when first visited by
Europeans
,
was a howling wilderness, inhabited by
nothing
but wild beasts; and that the trans-atlantic
visitors acquired an incontrovertable property
therein
,
by the
right of Discovery
.
This right being fully established, we now
come to the next, which is the right acquired by
cultivation
. The cultivation of the soil we are
told is an obligation imposed by nature on man
kind. The whole world is appointed for the
nourishment of its inhabitants; but it would be
incapable of doing it, was it uncultivated. Every
nation is then obliged by the law of nature to
cultivate the ground that has fallen to its share.
Those people like the ancient Germans and mo
dern Tartars, who having fertile countries, disdain
to cultivate the earth, and choose to live by rapine,
are wanting to themselves, and
deserve to be ex
terminated as savage and pernicious beasts
.
[12]
[12]
VattelB.i, ch. 17. See likewise Grotius, Puffendorf, et alii.
Now it is notorious, that the savages knew
nothing
of agriculture, when first discovered by the
Europeans, but lived a most vagabond, disorderly,
unrighteous life,rambling from place to place, and
prodigally rioting upon the spontaneous luxuries of
nature, without tasking her generosity to yield
them any thing more; whereas it has been most
unquestionably shewn, that heaven intended the
earth should be ploughed and sown, and manured,
and laid out into cities and towns and farms, and
country seats, and pleasure grounds, and public
gardens, all which the Indians knew nothing about
therefore they did not improve the talents
providence
had bestowed on themtherefore they
were careless stewardstherefore they had no
right to the soiltherefore they deserved to be
exterminated
.
It is true the savages might plead that they
drew all the benefits from the land which their
simple
wants requiredthey found plenty of game to
hunt, which together with the roots and
uncultivated
fruits of the earth, furnished a sufficient variety
for their frugal table;and that as heaven merely
designed the earth to form the abode, and satisfy
the wants of man; so long as those purposes were
answered, the will of heaven was accomplished.
But this only proves how undeserving they were
of the blessings around themthey were so much
the more savages, for not having more wants; for
knowledge is in some degree an increase of desires,
and it is this superiority both in the number and
magnitude of his desires, that distinguishes the
man from the beast. Therefore the Indians, in
not having more wants, were very unreasonable
animals; and it was but just that they should make
way for the Europeans, who had a thousand wants
to their one, and therefore would turn the earth to
more account, and by cultivating it, more truly
fulfil the will of heaven. BesidesGrotius and
Lauterbach, and Puffendorff and Titius and a
host of wise men besides, who have considered the
matter properly, have determined, that the
property
of a country cannot be acquired by hunting,
cutting
wood, or drawing water in itnothing but
precise demarcation of limits, and the intention of
cultivation, can establish the possession. Now as
the savages (probably from never having read the
authors above quoted) had never complied with
any of these necessary forms, it plainly follows
that they had no right to the soil, but that it was
completely at the disposal of the first comers, who
had more knowledge and more wants than
themselves
who
would portion out the soil, with
churlish
boundaries; who would torture nature to
pamper
a thousand fantastic humours and capricious
appetites; and who of course were far more
rational
animals than themselves. In entering upon
a newly discovered, uncultivated country
therefore
,
the new comers were but taking possession
of what, according to the aforesaid doctrine, was
their own propertytherefore in opposing them, the
savages were invading their just rights, infringing
the immutable laws of nature and counteracting the
will of heaventherefore they were guilty of
impiety
,
burglary and trespass on the case,therefore
they were hardened offenders against God and
mantherefore they ought to be exterminated.
But a more irresistible right then either that I
have mentioned, and one which will be the most
readily admitted by my reader, provided he is
blessed with bowels of charity and philanthropy, is
the right acquired by civilization. All the world
knows the lamentable state in which these poor
savages
were found. Not only deficient in the
comforts
of life, but what is still worse, most piteously
and unfortunately blind to the miseries of their
situation
.
But no sooner did the benevolent
inhabitants
of Europe behold their sad condition than they
immediately went to work to ameliorate and improve
it. They introduced among them the comforts of life,
consisting of rum, gin and brandyand it is
astonishing
to read how soon the poor savages learnt to
estimate
these blessingsthey likewise made known
to them a thousand remedies, by which the most
inveterate diseases are alleviated and healed, and
that they might comprehend the benefits and enjoy
the comforts of these medicines, they previously
introduced among them the diseases, which they
were calculated to cure. By these and a variety of
other methods was the condition of these poor
savages
,
wonderfully improved; they acquired a
thousand wants, of which they had before been
ignorant
,
and as he has most sources of happiness,
F 2
who has most wants to be gratified, they were
doubtlessly rendered a much happier race of beings.
But the most important branch of civilization,
and which has most strenuously been extolled,
by the zealous and pious fathers of the Roman
Church, is the introduction of the Christian faith.
It was truly a sight that might well inspire horror,
to behold these savages, stumbling among the dark
mountains of paganism, and guilty of the most
horrible
ignorance of religion. It is true, they neither
stole nor defrauded, they were sober, frugal,
continent
,
and faithful to their word; but though they
acted right habitually, it was all in vain, unless they
acted so from precept. The new comers therefore
used every method, to induce them to embrace and
practice the true religionexcept that of setting
them the example.
But notwithstanding all these complicated
labours
for their good, such was the unparalleled
obstinacy
of these stubborn wretches, that they
ungratefully
refused, to acknowledge the strangers as
their benefactors, and persisted in disbelieving the
doctrines they endeavoured to inculcate; most
insolently
alledging, that from their conduct, the
advocates
of Christianity did not seem to believe in it
themselves
.
Was not this too much forhum an patience?
would not one suppose, that the foreign emigrants
from Europe, provoked at their incredulity and
discouraged by their stiff-necked obstinacy, would
forever have abandoned their shores, and consigned
them to their original ignorance and misery?But
noso zealous were they to effect the temporal
comfort and eternal salvation of these pagan
infidels
,
that they even proceeded from the milder
means of persuasion, to the more painful and
troublesome
one of persecutionLet loose among
them, whole troops of fiery monks and furious
blood-houndspurified them by fire and sword,
by stake and faggot; in consequence of which
indefatigable
measures, the cause of Christian love
and charity were so rapidly advanced, that in a very
few years, not one fifth of the number of unbelievers
existed in South America, that were found there at
the time of its discovery.
Nor did the other methods of civilization remain
uninforced. The Indians improved daily and
wonderfully
by their intercourse with the whites. They
took to drinking rum, and making bargains. They
learned to cheat, to lie, to swear, to gamble, to
quarrel, to cut each others throats, in short, to
excel
in all the accomplishments that had originally
marked the superiority of their Christian visitors.
And such a surprising aptitude have they shewn for
these acquirements, that there is very little doubt
that in a century more, provided they survive so
long, the irrisistible effects of civilization; they
will equal in knowledge, refinement, knavery, and
debauchery, the most enlightened, civilized and
orthodox nations of Europe.
What stronger right need the European settlers
advance to the country than this. Have not whole
nations of uninformed savages been made
acquainted
with a thousand imperious wants and
indispensible
comforts of which they were before wholly
ignorantHave they not been literally hunted and
smoked out of the dens and lurking places of
ignorance
and infidelity, and absolutely scourged into
the right path. Have not the temporal things, the
vain baubles and filthy lucre of this world, which
were too apt to engage their worldly and selfish
thoughts, been benevolently taken from them; and
have they not in lieu thereof, been taught to set
their affections on things aboveAnd finally, to use
the words of a reverend Spanish father, in a letter
to his superior in SpainCan any one have the
presumption to say, that these savage Pagans,
have yielded any thing more than an inconsidera
ble recompense to their benefactors; in surren
dering to them a little pitiful tract of this dirty
sublunary planet, in exchange for a glorious inhe
ritance in the kingdom of Heaven!
Here then are three complete and undeniable
sources of right established, any one of which was
more than ample to establish a property in the newly
discovered regions of America. Now, so it has
happened in certain parts of this delightful quarter
of the globe, that the right of discovery has been
so strenuously assertedthe influence of
cultivation
so industriously extended, and the progress of
salvation and civilization so zealously prosecuted,
that, what with their attendant wars, persecutions,
oppressions, diseases, and other partial evils that
often hang on the skirts of great benefitsthe
savage
aborigines have, some how or another, been
utterly annihilatedand this all at once brings me
to a fourth right, which is worth all the others put
togetherFor the original claimants to the soil
bring all dead and buried, and no one remaining to
inherit or dispute the soil, the Spaniards as the next
immediate occupants entered upon the possession,
as clearly as the hang-man succeeds to the clothes
of the malefactorand as they have Blackstone,
[13]
[13]
Black. Com. B. II, c. i.
and all the learned expounders of the law on their
side, they may set all actions of ejectment at
defiance
and
this last right may be entitled, the RIGHT
BY EXTERMINATION, or in other words, the RIGHT
BY GUNPOWDER.
But lest any scruples of conscience should
remain
on this head, and to settle the question of right
forever, his holiness Pope Alexander VI, issued
one of those mighty bulls, which bear down reason,
argument and every thing before them; by which
he generously granted the newly discovered quarter
of the globe, to the Spaniards and Portuguese; who,
thus having law and gospel on their side, and being
inflamed with great spiritual zeal, shewed the
Pagan
savages neither favour nor affection, but
prosecuted
the work of discovery, colonization,
civilization
,
and extermination, with ten times more fury
than ever.
Thus were the European worthies who first
discovered
America, clearly entitled to the soil; and
not only entitled to the soil, but likewise to the
eternal thanks of these infidel savages, for having
come so far, endured so many perils by sea and
land, and taken such unwearied pains, for no other
purpose under heaven but to improve their forlorn,
uncivilized and heathenish conditionfor having
made them acquainted with the comforts of life,
such as gin, rum, brandy, and the small-pox; for
having introduced among them the light of religion,
and finallyfor having hurried them out of the
world, to enjoy its reward!
But as argument is never so well understood by
us selfish mortals, as when it comes home to
ourselves
,
and as I am particularly anxious that this
question should be put to rest forever, I will
suppose
a parallel case, by way of arousing the candid
attention of my readers.
Let us suppose then, that the inhabitants of the
moon, by astonishing advancement in science, and
by a profound insight into that ineffable lunar
philosophy
,
the mere flickerings of which, have of late
years, dazzled the feeble optics, and addled the
shallow brains of the good people of our globe
let us suppose, I say, that the inhabitants of the
moon, by these means, had arrived at such a
command
of their
energies
, such an enviable state of
perfectability
, as to controul the elements, and
navigate
the boundless regions of space. Let us
suppose
a roving crew of these soaring philosophers,
in the course of an rial voyage of discovery among
the stars, should chance to alight upon this
outlandish
planet.
And here I beg my readers will not have the
impertinence to smile, as is too frequently the fault
of volatile readers, when perusing the grave
speculations
of philosophers. I am far from indulging
in any sportive vein at present, nor is the
supposition
I have been making so wild as many may deem
it. It has long been a very serious and anxious
question
with me, and many a time, and oft, in the course
of my overwhelming cares and contrivances for the
welfare and protection of this my native planet, have
I lain awake whole nights, debating in my mind
whether
it was most probable we should first discover and
civilize the moon, or the moon discover and civilize
our globe. Neither would the prodigy of sailing
in the air and cruising among the stars be a whit
more astonishing and incomprehensible to us, than
was the European mystery of navigating floating
castles, through the world of waters, to the simple
savages. We have already discovered the art of
coasting along the rial shores of our planet, by
means of balloons, as the savages had, of venturing
along their sea coasts in canoes; and the disparity
between the former, and the rial vehicles of the
philosophers from the moon, might not be greater,
than that, between the bark canoes of the savages,
and the mighty ships of their discoverers. I might
here pursue an endless chain of very curious,
profound
and unprofitable speculations; but as they
would be unimportant to my subject, I abandon
them to my reader, particularly if he is a
philosopher
,
as matters well worthy his attentive
consideration
.
To return then to my suppositionlet us
suppose
that the aerial visitants I have mentioned,
possessed
of vastly superior knowledge to ourselves;
that is to say, possessed of superior knowledge in the
art of exterminationriding on Hypogriffs,
defended
with impenetrable armourarmed with
concentrated sun beams, and provided with vast
engines, to hurl enormous moon stones: in short,
let us suppose them, if our vanity will permit the
supposition, as superior to us in knowledge, and
consequently in power, as the Europeans were to
the Indians, when they first discovered them. All
this is very possible, it is only our self-sufficiency,
that makes us think otherwise; and I warrant the
poor savages, before they had any knowledge of the
white men, armed in all the terrors of glittering
steel and tremendous gun-powder, were as
perfectly
convinced that they themselves, were the
wisest, the most virtuous, powerful and perfect of
created beings, as are, at this present moment, the
lordly inhabitants of old England, the volatile
populace
of France, or even the self-satisfied citizens of
this most enlightened republick.
Let us suppose, moreover, that the aerial
voyagers
,
finding this planet to be nothing but a howling
wilderness, inhabited by us, poor savages and wild
beasts, shall take formal possession of it, in the
name of his most gracious and philosophic
excellency
,
the man in the moon. Finding however,
that their numbers are incompetent to hold it in
complete subjection, on account of the ferocious
barbarity of its inhabitants; they shall take our
worthy President, the King of England, the
Emperor
of Hayti, the mighty little Bonaparte, and the
great King of Bantam, and returning to their
native
planet, shall carry them to court, as were the
Indian chiefs led about as spectacles in the courts
of Europe.
Then making such obeisance as the etiquette of
the court requires, they shall address the puissant
man in the moon, in, as near as I can conjecture,
the following terms:
VOL. I. G
Most serene and mighty Potentate, whose
dominions
extend as far as eye can reach, who rideth
on the Great Bear, useth the sun as a looking
glass and maintaineth unrivalled controul over
tides, madmen and sea-crabs. We thy liege
subjects
have just returned from a voyage of discovery,
in the course of which we have landed and taken
possession of that obscure little scurvy planet,
which thou beholdest rolling at a distance. The
five uncouth monsters, which we have brought
into this august presence, were once very important
chiefs among their fellow savages; for the
inhabitants
of the newly discovered globe are totally
destitute of the common attributes of humanity,
inasmuch as they carry their heads upon their
shoulders, instead of under their armshave two
eyes instead of oneare utterly destitute of tails,
and of a variety of unseemly complexions,
particularly
of a horrible whitenesswhereas all the
inhabitants
of the moon are pea green!
We have moreover found these miserable
savages
sunk into a state of the utmost ignorance and
depravity, every man shamelessly living with his
own wife, and rearing his own children, instead of
indulging in that community of wives, enjoined
by the law of nature, as expounded by the
philosophers
of the moon. In a word they have scarcely
a gleam of true philosophy among them, but are in
fact, utter heretics, ignoramuses and barbarians.
Taking compassion therefore on the sad condition
of these sublunary wretches, we have
endeavoured
,
while we remained on their planet, to introduce
among them the light of reasonand the comforts
of the moon.We have treated them to mouthfuls
of moonshine and draughts of nitrous oxyde, which
they swallowed with incredible voracity,
particularly
the females; and we have likewise
endeavoured
to instil into them the precepts of lunar
Philosophy
.
We have insisted upon their renouncing the
contemptable shackles of religion and common
sense, and adoring the profound, omnipotent, and
all perfect energy, and the extatic, immutable,
immoveable
perfection. But such was the
unparalleled
obstinacy of these wretched savages, that they
persisted in cleaving to their wives and adhering to
their religion, and absolutely set at naught the
sublime
doctrines of the moonnay, among other
abominable heresies they even went so far as
blasphemously to declare, that this ineffable planet
was made of nothing more nor less than green
cheese!
At these words, the great man in the moon (
being
a very profound philosopher) shall fall into a
terrible passion, and possessing equal authority
over things that do not belong to him, as did
whilome his holiness the Pope, shall forthwith issue
a formidable bull,specifying, Thatwhereas a
certain crew of Lunatics have lately discovered and
taken possession of that little dirty planet, called
the
carth
and that whereas it is inhabited by none but
a race of two legged animals, that carry their heads
on their shoulders instead of under their arms;
cannot
talk the lunatic language; have two eyes
instead
of one; are destitute of tails, and of a
horrible
whiteness, instead of pea greentherefore and
for a variety of other excellent reasonsthey are
considered incapable of possessing any property in
the planet they infest, and the right and title to it
are confirmed to its original discoverers.And
furthermore
,
the colonists who are now about to
depart to the aforesaid planet, are authorized
and commanded to use every means to convert
these infidel savages from the darkness of
Christianity
,
and make them thorough and absolute
lunatics.
In consequence of this benevolent bull, our
philosophic
benefactors go to work with hearty zeal.
They sieze upon our fertile territories scourge us
from our rightful possessions, relieve us from our
wives, and when we are unreasonable enough to
complain, they will turn upon us and say
miserable
barbarians! ungrateful wretches!have we not
come thousands of miles to improve your worthless
planethave we not fed you with moon shine
have we not intoxicated you with nitrous oxyde
does not our moon give you light every night and
have you the baseness to murmur, when we claim
a pitiful return for all these benefits? But finding
that we not only persist in absolute contempt to their
reasoning and disbelief in their philosophy, but
even go so far as daringly to defend our property,
their patience shall be exhausted, and they shall
resort to their superior powers of argumenthunt
us with hypogriffs, transfix us with concentrated
sun-beams, demolish our cities with moonstones;
until having by main force, converted us to the
true faith, they shall graciously permit us to exist
in the torrid deserts of Arabia, or the frozen
regions
of Lapland, there to enjoy the blessings of
civilization and the charms of lunar philosophy
in much the same manner as the reformed and
enlightened
savages of this country, are kindly
suffered
to inhabit the inhospitable forests of the
north, or the impenetrable wildernesses of South
America.
Thus have I clearly proved, and I hope
strikingly
illustrated, the right of the early colonists to
the possession of this countryand thus is this
gigantic
question, completely knocked in the head
so having manfully surmounted all obstacles, and
subdued all opposition, what remains but that I
should forthwith conduct my impatient and
wayworn
readers, into the renowned city, which we
have so long been in a manner besieging.But
hold, before I proceed another step, I must pause
to take breath and recover from the excessive
fatigue
G 2
I have undergone, in preparing to begin this
most accurate of histories. And in this I do but
imitate the example of the celebrated Hans Von
Dunderbottom, who took a start of three miles for
the purpose of jumping over a hill, but having been
himself out of breath by the time he reached the
foot, sat himself quietly down for a few moments
to blow, and then walked over it at his leisure.
END OF BOOK I.
BOOK II.
Treating of the first settlement of the province
of Nieuw Nederlants.
CHAP. I.
How Master Hendrick Hudson, voyaging in
search of a north-west passage discovered the
famous
bay of New York, and likewise the great river
Moheganand how he was magnificently rewarded
by the munificence of their High Mightinesses
.
In the ever memorable year of our Lord 1609,
on the five and twentieth day of March (O. S.)a
fine Saturday morning, when jocund Phbus,
having
his face newly washed, by gentle dews and
spring time showers, looked from the glorious
windows
of the east, with a more than usually shining
countenancethat worthy and irrecoverable
discoverer
,
Master Henry Hudson set sail from
Holland
in a stout vessel,
[14]
[14]
Ogilvie calls it a frigate.
called the Half Moon, being
employed by the Dutch East India Company, to
seek a north-west passage to China.
Of this celebrated voyage we have a narration
still extant, written with true log-book brevity, by
master Robert Juet of Lime house, mate of the
vessel
;
who was appointed historian of the voyage,
partly on account of his uncommon literary talents,
but chiefly, as I am credibly informed, because he
was a countryman and schoolfellow of the great
Hudson, with whom he had often played truant and
sailed chip boats, when he was a little boy. I am
enabled however to supply the deficiencies of
master
Juet's journal, by certain documents furnished
me by very respectable Dutch families, as likewise
by sundry family traditions, handed down from my
great great Grandfather, who accompanied the
expedition
in the capacity of cabin boy.
From all that I can learn, few incidents worthy
of remark happened in the voyage; and it
mortifies
me exceedingly that I have to admit so noted
an expedition into my work, without making any
more of it.Oh! that I had the advantages of that
most authentic writer of yore, Apollonius Rhodius,
who in his account of the famous Argonautic
expedition
,
has the whole mythology at his disposal,
and elevates Jason and his compeers into heroes
and demigods; though all the world knows them
to have been a meer gang of sheep stealers, on a
marauding expeditionor that I had the privileges
of Dan Homer and Dan Virgil to enliven my
narration
,
with giants and Lystrigonians, to entertain
our honest mariners with an occasional concert of
syrens and mermaids, and now and then with the
rare shew of honest old Neptune and his fleet of
frolicksome cruisers. But alas! the good old times
have long gone by, when your waggish deities
would descend upon the terraqueous globe, in
their own proper persons, and play their pranks,
upon its wondering inhabitants. Neptune has
proclaimed
an embargo in his dominions, and the
sturdy tritons, like disbanded sailors, are out of
employ
,
unless old Charon has charitably taken them
into his service, to sound their conchs, and ply as
his ferry-men. Certain it is, no mention has been
made of them by any of our modern navigators,
who are not behind their ancient predecessors in
tampering with the marvellousnor has any notice
been taken of them, in that most minute and
authentic
chronicle of the seas, the New York Gazette
edited by Solomon Lang. Even Castor and
Pollux
,
those flaming meteors that blaze at the
masthead
of tempest tost vessels, are rarely beheld in
these degenerate daysand it is but now and then,
that our worthy sea captains fall in with that
portentous
phantom of the seas, that terror to all
experienced
mariners, that shadowy spectrum of the
nightthe flying Dutchman!
Suffice it then to say, the voyage was prosperous
and tranquilthe crew being a patient people, much
given to slumber and vacuity, and but little troubled
with the disease of thinkinga malady of the mind,
which is the sure breeder of discontent. Hudson
had laid in abundance of gin and sour crout, and
every man was allowed to sleep quietly at his post,
unless the wind blew. True it is, some slight
dissatisfaction
was shewn on two or three occasions,
at certain unreasonable conduct of Commodore
Hudson. Thus for instance, he forbore to shorten
sail when the wind was light, and the weather serene,
which was considered among the most experienced
dutch seamen, as certain
weather breeders
, or
prognostics
,
that the weather would change for the worse.
He acted, moreover, in direct contradiction to that
ancient and sage rule of the dutch navigators, who
always took in sail at nightput the helm a-port,
and turned inby which precaution they had a good
night's restwere sure of knowing where they were
the next morning, and stood but little chance of
running down a continent in the dark. He
likewise
prohibited the seamen from wearing more than
five jackets, and six pair of breeches, under
pretence
of rendering them more alert; and no man
was permitted to go aloft, and hand in sails, with a
pipe in his mouth, as is the invariable Dutch
custom
,
at the present dayAll these grievances,
though they might ruffle for a moment, the
constitutional
tranquillity of the honest Dutch tars, made
but transient impression; they eat hugely, drank
profusely, and slept immeasurably, and being under
the especial guidance of providence, the ship was
safely conducted to the coast of America; where,
after sundry unimportant touchings and standings
off and on, she at length, on the fourth day of
September
entered that majestic bay, which at this
day expands its ample bosom, before the city of
New York, and which had never before been visited
by any European.
True it isand I am not ignorant of the fact,
that in a certain aprocryphal book of voyages,
compiled
by one Hacluyt, is to be found a letter written
to Francis the First, by one Giovanne, or John
Verazzani, on which some writers are inclined to
found a belief that this delightful bay had been
visited nearly a century previous to the voyage of
the enterprizing Hudson. Now this (albeit it has
met with the countenance of certain very judicious
and learned men) I hold in utter disbelief, and
that for various good and substantial reasons
First
, Because on strict examination it will be
found, that the description given by this Verazzani,
applies about as well to the bay of New York, as
it does to my night cap
Secondly
, Because that
this John Verazzani, for whom I already begin to
feel a most bitter enmity, is a native of Florence;
and every body knows the crafty wiles of these
losel Florentines, by which they filched away the
laurels, from the arms of the immortal Colon, (
vulgarly
called Columbus) and bestowed them on
their officious townsman, Amerigo Vespucciand I
make no doubt they are equally ready to rob the
illustrious Hudson, of the credit of discovering this
beauteous island, adorned by the city of New York,
and placing it beside their usurped discovery of
South America. And
thirdly
, I award my decision
in favour of the pretensions of Hendrick Hudson,
inasmuch as his expedition sailed from Holland,
being truly and absolutely a Dutch enterprizeand
though all the proofs in the world were introduced
on the other side, I would set them at naught as
undeserving my attention. If these three reasons
are not sufficient to satisfy every burgher of this
ancient cityall I can say is, they are degenerate
descendants from their venerable Dutch ancestors,
and totally unworthy the trouble of convincing.
Thus, therefore, the title of Hendrick Hudson, to
his renowned discovery is fully vindicated.
It has been traditionary in our family, that when
the great navigator was first blessed with a view of
this enchanting island, he was observed, for the
first and only time in his life, to exhibit strong
symptoms of astonishment and admiration. He is
said to have turned to master Juet, and uttered
these remarkable words, while he pointed towards
this paradise of the new worldsee! there!
and thereupon, as was always his way when he was
uncommonly pleased, he did puff out such clouds
of dense tobacco smoke, that in one minute the
vessel
was out of sight of land, and master Juet was
fain to wait, until the winds dispersed this
impenetrable
fog.
It was indeedas my great great grandfather
used to saythough in truth I never heard him,
for he died, as might be expected, before I was
born.It was indeed a spot, on which the eye
might have revelled forever, in ever new and never
ending beauties. The island of Manna-hata, spread
wide before them, like some sweet vision of fancy,
or some fair creation of industrious magic. Its
hills of smiling green swelled gently one above
another, crowned with lofty trees of luxuriant
growth; some pointing their tapering foliage
towards
the clouds, which were gloriously
transparent
;
and others, loaded with a verdant burthen of
clambering vines, bowing their branches to the
earth, that was covered with flowers. On the
gentle declivities of the hills were scattered in gay
profusion, the dog wood, the sumach, and the wild
briar, whose scarlet berries and white blossoms
glowed brightly among the deep green of the
surrounding
foliage; and here and there, a curling
column of smoke rising from the little glens that
opened along the shore, seemed to promise the weary
voyagers, a welcome at the hands of their fellow
creatures. As they stood gazing with entranced
attention on the scene before them, a red man
crowned with feathers, issued from one of these
VOL. I. II
glens, and after contemplating in silent wonder, the
gallant ship, as she sat like a stately swan
swimming
on a silver lake, sounded the war-whoop, and
bounded into the woods, like a wild deer, to the
utter astonishment of the phlegmatic Dutchmen,
who had never heard such a noise, or witnessed
such a caper in their whole lives.
Of the transactions of our adventurers with the
savages, and how the latter smoked copper pipes,
and eat dried currants; how they brought great
store of tobacco and oysters; how they shot one of
the ship's crew, and how he was buried, I shall say
nothing, being that I consider them unimportant to
my history. After tarrying a few days in the bay,
in order to smoke their pipes and refresh
themselves
after their sea-faring, our voyagers weighed
anchor, and adventurously ascended a mighty river
which emptied into the bay. This river it is said was
known among the savages by the name of the
Shatemuck
;
though we are assured in an excellent little
history published in 1674, by John Josselyn, Gent.
that it was called the
Mohegan
,
[15]
[15]
This river is likewise laid down in Ogilvy's map as
Manhattan
NoordtMontaigne
and Mauritius river.
and master Richard
Bloome, who wrote some time afterwards, asserts
the sameso that I very much incline in favour of
the opinion of these two honest gentlemen. Be
this as it may, the river is at present denominated
the Hudson; and up this stream the shrewd Hen
drick had very little doubt he should discover the
much looked for passage to China!
The journal goes on to make mention of divers
interviews between the crew and the natives, in the
voyage up the river, but as they would be
impertinent
to my history, I shall pass them over in
silence
,
except the following dry joke, played off by
the old commodore and his school-fellow Robert
Juet; which does such vast credit to their
experimental
philosophy, that I cannot refrain from
inserting
it. Our master and his mate determined
to try some of the chiefe men of the countrey,
whether
they had any treacherie in them. So they
tooke them downe into the cabin and gave them so
much wine and acqua vit that they were all
merrie
;
and one of them had his wife with him, which
sate so modestly, as any of our countrey women
would do in a strange place. In the end, one of
them was drunke, which had been aboarde of our
ship all the time that we had beene there, and that
was strange to them, for they could not tell how to
take it.
[16]
[16]
Juet's Journ. Purch. Pil.
Having satisfied himself by this profound
experiment
,
that the natives were an honest, social
race of jolly roysters, who had no objection to a
drinking bout, and were very merry in their cups,
the old commodore chuckled hugely to himself,
and thrusting a double quid of tobacco in his cheek,
directed master Juet to have it carefully recorded,
for the satisfaction of all the natural philosophers of
the university of Leydenwhich done, he
proceeded
on his voyage, with great self-complacency.
After sailing, however, above an hundred miles up
the river, he found the watery world around him,
began to grow more shallow and confined, the
current
more rapid and perfectly freshphenomena
not uncommon in the ascent of rivers, but which
puzzled the honest dutchmen prodigiously. A
consultation of our modern Argonauts was
therefore
called, and having deliberated full six hours,
they were brought to a determination, by the ship's
running agroundwhereupon they unanimously
concluded, that there was but little chance of
getting
to China in this direction. A boat, however,
was dispatched to explore higher up the river,
which on its return, confirmed the opinionupon
this the ship was warped off and put about, with
great difficulty, being like most of her sex,
exceedingly
hard to govern; and the adventurous
Hudson
,
according to the account of my great great
grandfather, returned down the riverwith a
prodigious
flea in his ear!
Being satisfied that there was little likelihood of
getting to China, unless like the blind man, he
returned
from whence he sat out and took a fresh
start; he forthwith re-crossed the sea to Holland,
where he was received with great welcome by the
honourable East-India company, who were very
much rejoiced to see him come back safewith
their ship; and at a large and respectable meeting
of the first merchants and burgomasters of
Amsterdam
,
it was unanimously determined, that as a
munificent
reward for the eminent services he had
performed, and the important discovery he had
made, the great river Mohegan should be called
after his name!and it continues to be called
Hudson
river unto this very day.
H 2
CHAP. II.
Containing an account of a mighty Ark which
floated
,
under the protection of St. Nicholas, from
Holland to Gibbet Islandthe descent of the
strange Animals therefroma great victory,
and a description of the ancient village of
Communipaw
.
The
delectable accounts given by the great
Hudson, and Master Juet, of the country they had
discovered, excited not a little talk and speculation
among the good people of Holland.Letters patent
were granted by government to an association of
merchants, called the West-India company, for the
exclusive trade on Hudson river, on which they
erected a trading house called Fort Aurania, or
Orange, at present the superb and hospitable city
of Albany. But I forbear to dwell on the various
commercial and colonizing enterprizes which took
place; among which was that of Mynheer Adrian
Block, who discovered and gave a name to Block
Island, since famous for its cheeseand shall
barely
confine myself to that, which gave birth to this
renowned city.
It was some three or four years after the return
of the immortal Hendrick, that a crew of honest,
well meaning, copper headed, low dutch colonists
set sail from the city of Amsterdam, for the shores
of America. It is an irreparable loss to history,
and a great proof of the darkness of the age, and
the lamentable neglect of the noble art of
book-making
,
since so industriously cultivated by
knowing
sea-captains, and spruce super-cargoes, that an
expedition so interesting and important in its
results
,
should have been passed over in utter silence.
To my great great grandfather am I again indebted,
for the few facts, I am enabled to give concerning
ithe having once more embarked for this country,
with a full determination, as he said, of ending his
days hereand of begetting a race of
Knickerbockers
,
that should rise to be great men in the
land.
The ship in which these illustrious adventurers
set sail was called the
Goede Vrouw
, or Good Woman,
in compliment to the wife of the President of the
West India Company, who was allowed by every
body (except her husband) to be a singularly sweet
tempered lady, when not in liquor. It was in
truth a gallant vessel, of the most approved dutch
construction, and made by the ablest ship
carpenters
of Amsterdam, who it is well known, always
model their ships after the fair forms of their
country
women. Accordingly it had one hundred feet
in the keel, one hundred feet in the beam, and one
hundred feet from the bottom of the stern post, to
the tafforel. Like the beauteous model, who was
declared the greatest belle in Amsterdam, it was
full in the bows, with a pair of enormous cat-heads,
a copper bottom, and withal, a most prodigious
poop!
The architect, who was somewhat of a religious
man, far from decorating the ship with pagan idols,
such as Jupiter, Neptune, or Hercules (which
heathenish
abominations, I have no doubt, occasion the
misfortunes and shipwrack of many a noble vessel) he
I say, on the contrary, did laudably erect for a head,
a goodly image of St. Nicholas, equipped with a
low, broad brimmed hat, a huge pair of Flemish
trunk hose, and a pipe that reached to the end of the
bow-sprit. Thus gallantly furnished, the staunch
ship floated sideways, like a majestic goose, out of
the harbour of the great city of Amsterdam, and all
the bells, that were not otherwise engaged, rung a
triple bob-major on the joyful occasion.
My great great grandfather remarks, that the
voyage was uncommonly prosperous, for being under
the especial care of the ever-revered St. Nicholas,
the Goede Vrouw seemed to be endowed with
qualities
,
unknown to common vessels. Thus she made
as much lee-way as head-way, could get along very
nearly as fast with the wind a-head, as when it was
a-poopand was particularly great in a calm; in
consequence of which singular advantages, she made
out to accomplish her voyage in a very few months,
and came to anchor at the mouth of the Hudson, a
little to the east of Gibbet Island.
[17]
[17]
So called, because one Joseph Andrews, a pirate and murderer,
was hanged in chains on that Island, the 23d May, 1769.
Editor
.
Here lifting up their eyes, they beheld, on what
is at present called the Jersey shore, a small Indian
village, pleasantly embowered in a grove of
spreading
elms, and the natives all collected on the beach,
gazing in stupid admiration at the Goede Vrouw.
A boat was immediately dispatched to enter into a
treaty with them, and approaching the shore, hailed
them through a trumpet, in the most friendly terms;
but so horribly confounded were these poor savages
at the tremendous and uncouth sound of the low
dutch language, that they one and all took to their
heels, scampered over the Bergen hills, nor did they
stop until they had buried themselves, head and
ears, in the marshes, on the other side, where they
all miserably perished to a manand their bones
being collected, and decently covered by the
Tammany
Society of that day, formed that singular
mound, called
Rattle-snake-hill
, which rises out of
the centre of the salt marshes, a little to the east of
the Newark Causeway.
Animated by this unlooked-for victory our valiant
heroes sprang ashore in triumph, took possession
of the soil as conquerors in the name of their High
Mightinesses the lords states general, and
marching
fearlessly forward, carried the village of
Communipaw
by stormhaving nobody to withstand
them, but some half a score of old squaws, and
poppooses, whom they tortured to death with low
dutch. On looking about them they were so
transported with the excellencies of the place, that
they had very little doubt, the blessed St. Nicholas,
had guided them thither, as the very spot whereon to
settle their colony. The softness of the soil was
wonderfully adapted to the driving of piles; the
swamps and marshes around them afforded ample
opportunities for the constructing of dykes and
dams; the shallowness of the shore was peculiarly
favourable to the building of docksin a word, this
spot abounded with all the singular inconveniences,
and aquatic obstacles, necessary for the foundation
of a great dutch city. On making a faithful
report
therefore, to the crew of the Goede Vrouw,
they one and all determined that this was the
destined
end of their voyage. Accordingly they
descended
from the Goede Vrouw, men women and
children, in goodly groups, as did the animals of
yore from the ark, and formed themselves into a
thriving settlement, which they called by the Indian
name
Communipaw
.
As all the world is perfectly acquainted with
Communipaw, it may seem somewhat superfluous
to treat of it in the present work; but my readers
will please to recollect, that notwithstanding it is
my chief desire to improve the present age, yet I
write likewise for posterity, and have to consult the
understanding and curiosity of some half a score of
centuries yet to come; by which time perhaps,
were it not for this invaluable history, the great
Communipaw, like Babylon, Carthage, Nineveh
and other great cities, might be perfectly extinct
sunk and forgotten in its own mudits inhabitants
turned into oysters,
[18]
[18]
Men by inaction degenerate into Oysters. Kaimes.
and even its situation a
fertile subject of learned controversy and
hardheaded
investigation among indefatigable historians.
Let me then piously rescue from oblivion, the
humble reliques of a place, which was the egg
from whence was hatched the mighty city of New
York!
Communipaw is at present but a small village,
pleasantly situated among rural scenery, on that
beauteous part of the Jersey shore which was
known in ancient legends by the name of Pavonia,
and commands a grand prospect of the superb bay
of New York. It is within but half an hour's sail
of the latter place, provided you have a fair wind,
and may be distinctly seen from the city. Nay,
it is a well known fact, which I can testify from
my own experience, that on a clear still summer
evening, you may hear, from the battery of New
York, the obstreperous peals of broad-mouthed
laughter of the dutch negroes at Communipaw,
who, like most other negroes, are famous for their
risible powers. This is peculiarly the case on
Sunday
evenings; when, it is remarked by an ingenious
and observant philosopher, who has made great
discoveries in the neighbourhood of this city, that
they always laugh loudestwhich he attributes to
the circumstance of their having their holliday
clothes on.
These negroes, in fact, like the monks in the
dark ages, engross all the knowledge of the place,
and being infinitely more adventurous and more
knowing than their masters, carry on all the foreign
trade; making frequent voyages to town in canoes
loaded with oysters, buttermilk and cabbages.
They are great astrologers, predicting the different
changes of weather almost as accurately as an
almanack
they
are moreover exquisite performers
on three stringed fiddles: in whistling they almost
boast the farfamed powers of Orpheus his lyre,
for not a horse or an ox in the place, when at the
plow or in the waggon, will budge a foot until he
hears the well known whistle of his black driver
and companion.And from their amazing skill at
casting up accounts upon their fingers, they are
regarded
with as much veneration as were the
disciples
of Pythagoras of yore, when initiated into the
sacred quaternary of numbers.
As to the honest dutch burghers of
Communipaw
,
like wise men, and sound philosophers, they
never look beyond their pipes, nor trouble their
heads about any affairs out of their immediate
neighbourhood; so that they live in profound and
enviable ignorance of all the troubles, anxieties and
revolutions, of this distracted planet. I am even
told that many among them do verily believe that
Holland, of which they have heard so much from
tradition, is situated somewhere on Long-Island
that
Spiking-devil
and
the Narrows
are the two ends
of the worldthat the country is still under the
dominion of their high mightinesses, and that the
city of New York still goes by the name of Nieuw
Amsterdam. They meet every saturday
afternoon
,
at the only tavern in the place, which bears
as a sign, a square headed likeness of the prince of
Orange; where they smoke a silent pipe, by way
of promoting social conviviality, and invariably
drink a mug of cider to the success of admiral Von
Tromp, who they imagine is still sweeping the
British
channel, with a broom at his mast head.
Communipaw, in short, is one of the numerous
little villages in the vicinity of this most beautiful
of cities, which are so many strong holds and
fastnesses
,
whither the primitive manners of our
dutch forefathers have retreated, and where they
are cherished with devout and scrupulous
strictness
.
The dress of the original settlers is handed
VOL. I. I
down inviolate, from father to sonthe identical
broad brimmed hat, broad skirted coat and broad
bottomed breeches, continue from generation to
generation, and several gigantic knee buckles of
massy silver, are still in wear, that made such
gallant
display in the days of the patriarchs of
Communipaw
.
The language likewise, continues
unadulterated
by barbarous innovations; and so
critically
correct is the village school-master in his
dialect, that his reading of a low dutch psalm, has
much the same effect on the nerves, as the filing of
a hand saw.
CHAP. III.
In which is set forth the true art of making a
bargain
,
together with a miraculous escape of a
great Metropolis in a fogand how certain
adventurers departed from Communipaw on a
perilous colonizing expedition
.
Having
, in the trifling digression with which I
concluded my last chapter, discharged the filial
duty
,
which the city of New York owes to
Communipaw
,
as being the mother settlement; and having
given a faithful picture of it as it stands at present,
I return, with a soothing sentiment of
self-approbation
,
to dwell upon its early history. The crew
of the Goede Vrouw being soon reinforced by fresh
importations from Holland, the settlement went
jollily on, encreasing in magnitude and prosperity.
The neighbouring Indians in a short time became
accustomed to the uncouth sound of the dutch
language
,
and an intercourse gradually took place
between
them and the new comers. The Indians
were much given to long talks, and the Dutch to
long silencein this particular therefore, they
accommodated
each other completely. The chiefs
would make long speeches about the big bull, the
wabash and the great spirit, to which the others
would listen very attentively, smoke their pipes and
grunt
yah myn-her
whereat the poor savages were
wonderously delighted. They instructed the new
settlers in the best art of curing and smoking
tobacco
,
while the latter in return, made them drunk
with true Hollandsand then learned them the art
of making bargains.
A brisk trade for furs was soon opened: the
dutch traders were scrupulously honest in their
dealings, and purchased by weight, establishing it
as an invariable table of avoirdupoise, that the hand
of a dutchman weighed one pound, and his foot
two pounds. It is true, the simple Indians were
often puzzled at the great disproportion between
bulk and weight, for let them place a bundle of
furs, never so large, in one scale, and a dutchman
put his hand or foot in the other, the bundle was
sure to kick the beamnever was a package of
furs known to weigh more than two pounds, in the
market of Communipaw!
This is a singular factbut I have it direct
from my great great grandfather, who had risen to
considerable importance in the colony, being
promoted
to the office of weigh master, on account of
the uncommon heaviness of his foot.
The Dutch possessions in this part of the globe
began now to assume a very thriving appearance,
and were comprehended under the general title of
Nieuw Nederlandts, on account, no doubt, of their
great resemblance to the Dutch Netherlands
excepting
that the former were rugged and
mountainous
,
and the latter level and marshy. About
this time the tranquility of the dutch colonists was
doomed to suffer a temporary interruption. In
1614, captain Sir Samuel Argal, sailing under a
commission from Dale, governor of Virginia,
visited
the dutch settlements on Hudson river, and
demanded
their submission to the English crown and
Virginian dominion.To this arrogant demand,
as they were in no condition to resist it, they
submitted
for the time, like discreet and reasonable men.
It does not appear that the valiant Argal
molested
the settlement of Communipaw; on the
contrary
,
I am told that when his vessel first hove in
sight the worthy burghers were seized with such a
panic, that they fell to smoking their pipes with
astonishing
vehemence; insomuch that they quickly
raised a cloud, which combining with the
surrounding
woods and marshes, completely enveloped and
concealed their beloved village; and overhung the
fair regions of PavoniaSo that the terrible
captain
Argal passed on, totally unsuspicious that a
sturdy little Dutch settlement lay snugly couched
in the mud, under cover of all this pestilent vapour.
In commemoration of this fortunate escape, the
worthy inhabitants have continued to smoke, almost
without intermission, unto this very day; which is
said to be the cause of the remarkable fog that often
hangs over Communipaw of a clear afternoon.
I 2
Upon the departure of the enemy, our
magnanimous
ancestors took full six months to recover
their wind, having been exceedingly discomposed
by the consternation and hurry of affairs. They
then called a council of safety to smoke over the
state of the province. After six months more of
mature deliberation, during which nearly five
hundred
words were spoken, and almost as much
tobacco
was smoked, as would have served a certain
modern general through a whole winter's campaign
of hard drinking, it was determined, to fit out an
armament of canoes, and dispatch them on a voyage
of discovery; to search if peradventure some more
sure and formidable position might not be found,
where the colony would be less subject to vexatious
visitations.
This perilous enterprize was entrusted to the
superintendance of Mynheers Oloffe Van
Kortlandt
,
Abraham Hardenbroek, Jacobus Van Zandt
and Weinant Ten Broekfour indubitably great
men, but of whose history, though I have made
diligent
enquiry, I can learn but little, previous to
their leaving Holland. Nor need this occasion
much surprize; for adventurers, like prophets,
though they make great noise abroad, have seldom
much celebrity in their own countries; but this
much is certain, that the overflowings and
off-scourings
of a country, are invariably composed of the
richest parts of the soil. And here I cannot help
remarking how convenient it would be to many
of our great men and great families of doubtful
origin, could they have the privilege of the heroes
of yore, who, whenever their origin was
involved
in obscurity, modestly announced themselves
descended from a godand who never visited a
foreign country, but what they told some cock and
bull stories, about their being kings and princes at
home. This venial trespass on the truth, though
it has occasionally been played off by some pseudo
marquis, baronet, and other illustrious foreigner,
in our land of good natured credulity, has been
completely discountenanced in this sceptical, matter
of fact ageAnd I even question whether any
tender
virgin, who was accidentally and unaccountably
enriched with a bantling, would save her character
at parlour fire-sides and evening tea-parties, by
ascribing
the phenomenon to a swan, a shower of gold
or a river god.
Thus being totally denied the benefit of
mythology
and classic fable, I should have been
completely
at a loss as to the early biography of my heroes,
had not a gleam of light been thrown upon their
origin from their names.
By this simple means have I been enabled to
gather some particulars, concerning the adventurers
in question. Van Kortlandt for instance, was one of
those peripatetic philosophers, who tax providence
for a livelihood, and like Diogenes, enjoy a free
and unincumbered estate in sunshine. He was
usually arrayed in garments suitable to his fortune,
being curiously fringed and fangled by the hand of
time; and was helmeted with an old fragment
of a hat which had acquired the shape of a
sugarloaf
;
and so far did he carry his contempt for the
adventitious distinction of dress, that it is said,
the remnant of a shirt, which covered his back,
and dangled like a pocket handkerchief out of a
hole in his breeches, was never washed, except by
the bountiful showers of heaven. In this garb was
he usually to be seen, sunning himself at noon day,
with a herd of philosophers of the same sect, on
the side of the great canal of Amsterdam. Like
your nobility of Europe, he took his name of
Kortlandt
(or
lack land
) from his landed estate, which
lay some where in Terra incognita.
Of the next of our worthies, might I have had
the benefit of mythological assistance, the want of
which I have just lamentedI should have made
honourable mention, as boasting equally illustrious
pedigree, with the proudest hero of antiquity.
His name was
Van Zandt
, which freely translated,
signifies
from the dirt
, meaning, beyond a doubt,
that like Triptolemus, Themisthe Cyclops and
the Titans, he sprung from dame Terra or the
earth! This supposition is strongly corroborated by
his size, for it is well known that all the progeny of
mother earth were of a gigantic stature; and Van
Zandt, we are told, was a tall raw-boned man, above
six feet highwith an astonishingly hard head.
Nor is this origin of the illustrious Van Zandt a
whit more improbable or repugnant to belief, than
what is related and universally admitted of certain
of our greatest, or rather richest men; who we are
told, with the utmost gravity, did originally spring
from a dung-hill!
Of the third hero, but a faint description has
reached to this time, which mentions, that he was
a sturdy, obstinate, burley, bustling little man; and
from being usually equipped with an old pair of
buck-skins, was familiarly dubbed Harden broek,
or
Tough Breeches
.
Ten Broek completed this junto of adventurers.
It is a singular but ludicrous fact, which, were I
not scrupulous in recording the whole truth, I
should almost be tempted to pass over in silence,
as incompatible with the gravity and dignity of
my history, that this worthy gentleman should
likewise have been nicknamed from the most
whimsical part of his dress. In fact the small
clothes seems to have been a very important
garment in the eyes of our venerated ancestors,
owing in all probability to its really being the
largest article of raiment among them. The name
of Ten Broek, or Tin Broek is indifferently
translated
into Ten Breeches and Tin Breechesthe
high dutch commentators incline to the former
opinion; and ascribe it to his being the first who
introduced into the settlement the ancient dutch
fashion
of wearing ten pair of breeches. But the
most elegant and ingenious writers on the subject,
declare in favour of Tin, or rather
Thin
Breeches;
from whence they infer, that he was a poor, but
merry rogue, whose galligaskins were none of the
soundest, and who was the identical author of that
truly philosophical stanza:
Then why should we quarrel for riches,
Or any such glittering toys;
A light heart and
thin pair of breeches
,
Will go thorough the world my brave boys!
Such was the gallant junto that fearlessly set
sail at the head of a mighty armament of canoes, to
explore the yet unknown country about the mouth
of the Hudsonand heaven seemed to shine
propitious
on their undertaking.
It was that delicious season of the year, when
nature, breaking from the chilling thraldom of old
winter, like a blooming damsel, from the tyranny
of a sordid old hunks of a father, threw herself
blushing with ten thousand charms, into the arms,
of youthful spring. Every tufted copse and
blooming
grove resounded with the notes of hymeneal
love; the very insects as they sipped the morning
dew, that gemmed the tender grass of the meadows,
lifted up their little voices to join the joyous
epithalamium
the
virgin bud timidly put forth its
blushes, and the heart of man dissolved away in
tenderness. Oh sweet Theocritus! had I thy
oaten reed, wherewith thou erst didst charm the
gay Sicilian plains; or oh gentle Bion! thy
pastoral
pipe, in which the happy swains of the
Lesbian
isle so much delighted; then would I attempt
to sing, in soft Bucolic or negligent Idyllium, the
rural beauties of the sceneBut having nothing but
this jaded goose quill, wherewith to wing my flight,
I must fain content myself to lay aside these poetic
disportings of the fancy and pursue my faithful
narrative
in humble prosecomforting myself with the
reflection, that though it may not commend itself
so sweetly to the imagination of my reader, yet
will it insinuate itself with virgin modesty, to his
better judgment, clothed as it is in the chaste and
simple garb of truth.
In the joyous season of spring then, did these
hardy adventurers depart on this eventful
expedition
,
which only wanted another Virgil to rehearse
it, to equal the oft sung story of the EneidMany
adventures did they meet with and divers bitter
mishaps did they sustain, in their wanderings from
Communipaw to oyster Islandfrom oyster
Island
to gibbet island, from gibbet island to governors
island, and from governors island through
buttermilk
channel, (a second streights of Pylorus) to
the Lord knows where; until they came very nigh
being ship wrecked and lost forever, in the tremen
dous vortexes of
Hell gate
,
[19]
[19]
This is a fearful combination of rocks and whirlpools, in the
sound above New York, dangerous to ships unless under the care
of a skillful pilot. Certain wise men who instruct these modern
days have softened this characterestic name into
Hurl gate
, on what
authority, I leave them to explain. The name as given by our
author
is supported by Ogilvie's History of America published 1671,
as also by a journal still extant, written in the 16th century, and to
be found in Hazard's state papers. The original name, as laid
down in all the Dutch manuscripts and maps, was
Helle gat
, and
an old MS. written in French, speaking of various alterations in
names about this city observes De
Helle gat
trou d'Enfer, ils ont
fait
Hell gate
, Porte d'Enfer.Printer's Devil.
which for terrors,
and frightful perils, might laugh old Scylla and
Charybdis to utter scornIn all which cruize they
encountered as many Lystrigonians and Cyclops
and Syrens and unhappy Didos, as did ever the
pious Eneas, in his colonizing voyage.
At length, after wandering to and fro, they
were attracted by the transcendant charms of a vast
island, which lay like a gorgeous stomacher,
dividing
the beauteous bosom of the bay, and to which
the numerous mighty islands among which they
had been wandering, seemed as so many foils and
appendages. Hither they bent their course, and
old Neptune, as if anxious to assist in the choice of
a spot, whereon was to be founded a city that
should serve as his strong hold in this western
world, sent half a dozen potent billows, that rolled
the canoes of our voyagers, high and dry on the
very point of the island, where at present stands the
delectable city of New York.
The original name of this beautiful island is in
some dispute, and has already undergone a vitiation,
which is a proof of the melancholy instability of
sublunary things, and of the industrious perversions
of modern orthographers. The name which is
most current among the vulgar (such as members
of assembly and bank directors) is
Manhattan
which is said to have originated from a custom
among the squaws, in the early settlement, of
wearing
men's wool hats, as is still done among many
tribes. Hence, we are told by an old governor,
somewhat of a wag, who flourished almost a
century
since, and had paid a visit to the wits of
Philadelphia
Hence
arose the appellation of
Manhat-on
,
first given to the Indians, and afterwards
to the islanda stupid joke!but well enough for
a governor.
Among the more ancient authorities which
deserve
very serious consideration, is that contained in
the valuable history of the American possessions,
written by master Richard Blome in 1687,
wherein
it is called
Manhadaes
, or
Manahanent;
nor
must I forget the excellent little book of that
authentic
historian, John Josselyn, Gent. who
explicitly
calls it
Manadaes
.
But an authority still more ancient, and still
more deserving of credit, because it is sanctioned
VOL. I. K
by the countenance of our venerated dutch
ancestors
,
is that founded on certain letters still
extant
,
which passed between the early governors,
and their neighbour powers; wherein it is
variously
called the Monhattoes, Munhatos and
Manhattoes
an
unimportant variation, occasioned by the
literati of those days having a great contempt for
those spelling book and dictionary researches, which
form the sole study and ambition of so many
learned
men and women of the present times. This
name is said to be derived from the great Indian
spirit Manetho, who was supposed to have made
this island his favourite residence, on account of
its uncommon delights. But the most venerable
and indisputable authority extant, and one on which
I place implicit confidence, because it confers a
name at once melodious, poetical and significant, is
that furnished by the before quoted journal of the
voyage of the great Hudson, by Master Juet; who
clearly and correctly calls it
Manna-hata
that is
to say, the island of Manna; or in other words
a land flowing with milk and honey!
CHAP. IV.
In which are contained divers very sound reasons
why a man should not write in a hurry:
together
with the building of New Amsterdam,
and the memorable dispute of Mynheers Ten
Breeches and Tough Breeches thereupon
.
My great grandfather, by the mother's side,
Hermanus Van Clattercop, when employed to build
the large stone church at Rotterdam, which stands
about three hundred yards to your left, after you
turn off from the Boomkeys, and which is so
conveniently
constructed, that all the zealous Christians
of Rotterdam prefer sleeping through a sermon
there, to any other church in the cityMy great
grandfather, I say, when employed to build that
famous church, did in the first place send to Delft
for a box of long pipes; then having purchased a
new spitting box and a hundred weight of the best
Virginia, he sat himself down, and did nothing for
the space of three months, but smoke most
laboriously
.
Then did he spend full three months
more in trudging on foot, and voyaging in
Trekschuit
,
from Rotterdam to Amsterdamto Delft
to Haerlemto Leydento the Hague, knocking
his head and breaking his pipe, against every church
in his road. Then did he advance gradually,
nearer and nearer to Rotterdam, until he came in
full sight of the identical spot, whereon the church
was to be built. Then did he spend three months
longer in walking round it and round it;
contemplating
it, first from one point of view, and then
from anothernow would he be paddled by it on
the canalnow would he peep at it through a
telescope
,
from the other side of the Meuse, and now
would he take a bird's eye glance at it, from the
top of one of those gigantic wind mills, which protect
the gates of the city. The good folks of the place
were on the tiptoe of expectation and impatience
notwithstanding all the turmoil of my great
grand-father
,
not a symptom of the church was yet to be
seen; they even began to fear it would never be
brought into the world, but that its great projector
would lie down, and die in labour, of the mighty
plan he had conceived. At length, having occupied
twelve good months in puffing and paddling, and
talking and walkinghaving travelled over all
Holland
,
and even taken a peep into France and
Germany
having
smoked five hundred and ninety-nine
pipes, and three hundred weight of the best Virginia
tobacco; my great grandfather gathered together
all that knowing and industrious class of citizens,
who prefer attending to any body's business sooner
than their own, and having pulled off his coat and
five pair of breeches, he advanced sturdily up, and
laid the corner stone of the church, in the presence
of the whole multitudejust at the commencement
of the thirteenth month.
In a similar manner and with the example of
my worthy ancestor full before my eyes, have I
proceeded in writing this most authentic history.
The honest Rotterdammers no doubt thought my
great grandfather was doing nothing at all to the
purpose, while he was making such a world of
prefatory bustle, about the building of his church
and many of the ingenious inhabitants of this fair
city, (whose intellects have been thrice stimulated
and quickened, by transcendant nitrous oxyde, as
were those of Chrysippus, with hellebore,) will
unquestionably suppose that all the preliminary
chapters, with the discovery, population and final
settlement of America, were totally irrelevant and
superfluousand that the main business, the history
of New York, is not a jot more advanced, than if I
had never taken up my pen. Never were wise
people more mistaken in their conjectures; in
consequence
of going to work slowly and deliberately,
the church came out of my grandfather's hands, one
of the most sumptuous, goodly and glorious edifices
in the known worldexcepting, that, like our
transcendant capital at Washington, it was began on
such a grand scale, the good folks could not afford
to finish more than the wing of it.
In the same manner do I prognosticate, if ever
I am enabled to finish this history, (of which in
K 2
simple truth, I often have my doubts,) that it will
be handed down to posterity, the most complete,
faithful, and critically constructed work that ever
was readthe delight of the learned, the ornament
of libraries, and a model for all future historians.
There is nothing that gives such an expansion of
mind, as the idea of writing for posterityAnd
had Ovid, Herodotus, Polybius or Tacitus, like
Moses
from the top of Mount Pisgah, taken a view of
the boundless region over which their offspring
were destined to wanderlike the good old
Israelite
,
they would have lain down and died contented.
I hear some of my captious readers questioning
the correctness of my arrangementbut I have no
patience with these continual interruptionsnever
was historian so pestered with doubts and queries,
and such a herd of discontented quid-nunes! if
they continue to worry me in this manner, I shall
never get to the end of my work. I call Apollo
and his whole seraglio of muses to witness, that I
pursue the most approved and fashionable plan of
modern historians; and if my readers are not
pleased with my matter, and my manner, for God's
sake let them throw down my work, take up a pen
and write a history to suit themselvesfor my part
I am weary of their incessant interruptions, and beg
once for all, that I may have no more of them.
The island of Manna-hata, Manhattoes, or as it
is vulgarly called Manhattan, having been
discovered
,
as was related in the last chapter; and being
unanimously pronounced by the discoverers, the
fairest spot in the known world, whereon to build a
city, that should surpass all the emporiums of
Europe
,
they immediately returned to Communipaw
with the pleasing intelligence. Upon this a
considerable
colony was forthwith fitted out, who after a
prosperous voyage of half an hour, arrived at Manna
hata, and having previously purchased the land of
the Indians, (a measure almost unparalleled in the
annals of discovery and colonization) they
settled
upon the south-west point of the island, and
fortified themselves strongly, by throwing up a mud
battery, which they named
Fort Amsterdam
.
A number of huts soon sprung up in the
neighbourhood
,
to protect which, they made an enclosure of
strong pallisadoes. A creek running from the
East river, through what at present is called
Whitehall
street, and a little inlet from Hudson river to
the bowling green formed the original boundarles;
as though nature had kindly designated the cradle,
in which the embryo of this renowned city was to
be nestled. The woods on both sides of the creek
were carefully cleared away, as well as from the
space of ground now occupied by the bowling green.
These precautions were taken to protect the fort
from either the open attacks or insidious advances
of its savage neighbours, who wandered in hordes
about the forests and swamps that extended over
those tracts of country, at present called broad way,
Wall street, William street and Pearl street.
No sooner was the colony once planted, than
like a luxuriant vine, it took root and throve
amazingly
;
for it would seem, that this thrice favoured
island is like a munificent dung hill, where every
thing finds kindly nourishment, and soon shoots up
and expands to greatness. The thriving state of the
settlement, and the astonishing encrease of houses,
gradually awakened the leaders from a profound
lethargy, into which they had fallen, after having
built their mud fort. They began to think it was
high time some plan should be devised, on which
the encreasing town should be built; so taking pipe
in mouth, and meeting in close divan, they
forthwith
fell into a profound deliberation on the
subject
.
At the very outset of the business, an
unexpected
difference of opinion arose, and I mention
it with regret, as being the first internal altercation
on record among the new settlers. An ingenious
plan was proposed by Mynheer Ten Broek to cut
up and intersect the ground by means of canals;
after the manner of the most admired cities in
Holland
;
but to this Mynheer Hardenbroek was
diametrically
opposed; suggesting in place thereof,
that they should run out docks and wharves, by
means of piles driven into the bottom of the river,
on which the town should be builtBy this means
said he triumphantly, shall we rescue a
considerable
space of territory from these immense rivers,
and build a city that shall rival Amsterdam, Venice,
or any amphibious city in Europe. To this
proposition
,
Ten Broek (or Ten breeches) replied, with
a look of as much scorn as he could possibly
assume
.
He cast the utmost censure upon the plan
of his antagonist, as being preposterous, and against
the very order of things, as he would leave to every
true hollander. For what; said he, is a town
without canals?it is like a body without veins
and arteries, and must perish for want of a free
circulation of the vital fluidTough breeches, on
the contrary, retorted with a sarcasm upon his
antagonist
,
who was somewhat of an arid, dry boned
habit of body; he remarked that as to the
circulation
of the blood being necessary to existence,
Mynheer Ten breeches was a living contradiction
to his own assertion; for every body knew there
had not a drop of blood circulated through his
wind dried carcass for good ten years, and yet
there was not a greater busy body in the whole
colony. Personalities have seldom much effect in
making converts in argumentnor have I ever
seen a man convinced of error, by being convicted
of deformity. At least such was not the case at
present. Ten Breeches was very acrimonious in
reply, and Tough Breeches, who was a sturdy little
man, and never gave up the last word, rejoined
with encreasing spiritTen Breeches had the
advantage
of the greatest volubility, but Tough
Breeches
had that invaluable coat of mail in argument called
obstinacyTen Breeches had, therefore, the most
mettle, but Tough Breeches the best bottomso
that though Ten Breeches made a dreadful
clattering
about his ears, and battered and belaboured
him with hard words and sound arguments, yet
Tough Breeches hung on most resolutely to the
last. They parted therefore, as is usual in all
arguments
where both parties are in the right,
without
coming to any conclusionbut they hated
each other most heartily forever after, and a similar
breach with that between the houses of Capulet and
Montague, had well nigh ensued between the
families
of Ten Breeches and Tough Breeches.
I would not fatigue my reader with these dull
matters of fact, but that my duty as a faithful
historian
,
requires that I should be particularand in
truth, as I am now treating of the critical period,
when our city, like a young twig, first received the
twists and turns, that have since contributed to give
it the present picturesque irregularity for which it
is celebrated, I cannot be too minute in detailing
their first causes.
After the unhappy altercation I have just
mentioned
,
I do not find that any thing further was
said on the subject, worthy of being recorded. The
council, consisting of the largest and oldest heads
in the community, met regularly once a week, to
ponder on this momentous subject.But either
they were deterred by the war of words they had
witnessed, or they were naturally averse to the
exercise
of the tongue, and the consequent exercise
of the brainscertain it is, the most profound
silence
was maintainedthe question as usual lay on
the tablethe members quietly smoked their pipes,
making but few laws, without ever enforcing any,
and in the mean time the affairs of the settlement
went onas it pleased God.
As most of the council were but little skilled in
the mystery of combining pot hooks and hangers,
they determined most judiciously not to puzzle
either themselves or posterity, with voluminous
records. The secretary however, kept the minutes
of each meeting with tolerable precision, in a large
vellum folio, fastened with massy brass clasps, with
a sight of which I have been politely favoured by
my highly respected friends, the Goelets, who have
this invaluable relique, at present in their possession.
On perusal, however, I do not find much
information
The
journal of each meeting consists but of
two lines, stating in dutch, that, the council sat this
day, and smoked twelve pipes, on the affairs of the
colony.By which it appears that the first settlers
did not regulate their time by hours, but pipes, in
the same manner as they measure distances in
Holland
at this very time; an admirably exact
measurement
,
as a pipe in the mouth of a genuine
dutchman is never liable to those accidents and
irregularities, that are continually putting our clocks
out of order.
In this manner did the profound council of
New Amsterdam
smoke, and doze, and ponder,
from week to week, month to month, and year to
year, in what manner they should construct their
infant settlementmean while, the own took care
of itself, and like a sturdy brat which is suffered to
run about wild, unshackled by clouts and bandages,
and other abominations by which your notable
nurses
and sage old women cripple and disfigure the
children of men, encreased so rapidly in strength
and magnitude, that before the honest
burgomasters
had determined upon a plan, it was too late to
put it in executionwhereupon they wisely
abandoned
the subject altogether.
CHAP V.
In which the Author is very unreasonably afflicted
about nothing.Together with divers Ancedotes
of the prosperity of New Amsterdam, and the
wisdom of its Inhabitants.And the sudden
introduction
of a Great Man
.
Grievous
, and very much to be commiserated,
is the task of the feeling historian, who writes the
history of his native land. If it falls to his lot to
be the sad recorder of calamity or crime, the
mournful
page is watered with his tearsnor can he recal
the most prosperous and blissful eras, without a
melancholy sigh at the reflection, that they have
passed away forever! I know not whether it be
owing to an immoderate love for the simplicity of
former times, or to a certain tenderness of heart,
natural to a sentimental historian; but I candidly
confess, I cannot look back on the halcyon days of
the city, which I now describe, without a deep
dejection
of the spirits. With faultering hand I
withdraw
the curtain of oblivion, which veils the modest
merits of our venerable dutch ancestors, and as
their revered figures rise to my mental vision,
humble
myself before the mighty shades.
Such too are my feelings when I revisit the
VOL. I. L
family mansion of the Knickerbockers and spend a
lonely hour in the attic chamber, where hang the
portraits of my forefathers, shrowded in dust like
the forms they represent. With pious reverence
do I gaze on the countenances of those renowned
burghers, who have preceded me in the steady
march of existencewhose sober and temperate
blood now meanders through my veins, flowing
slower and slower in its feeble conduits, until its
lingering current shall soon be stopped forever!
These, say I to myself, are but frail memorials
of the mighty men, who flourished in the days of
the patriarchs; but who, alas, have long since
mouldered in that tomb, towards which my steps
are insensibly and irresistibly hastening! As I
pace the darkened chamber and lose myself in
melancholy
musings, the shadowy images around me,
almost seem to steal once more into existence
their countenances appear for an instant to assume
the animation of lifetheir eyes to pursue me in
every movement! carried away by the delusion of
fancy, I almost imagine myself surrounded by the
shades of the departed, and holding sweet
converse
with the worthies of antiquity!Luckless
Diedrich! born in a degenerate ageabandoned to
the buffettings of fortunea stranger and a weary
pilgrim in thy native land; blest with no weeping
wife, nor family of helpless childrenbut doomed
to wander neglected through those crowded streets,
and elbowed by foreign upstarts from those fair
abodes, where once thine ancestors held sovereign
empire. Alas! alas! is then the dutch spirit
forever
extinct? The days of the patriarchs, have they
fled forever? Returnreturn sweet days of
simplicity
and easedawn once more on the lovely
island of Manna hata!Bear with me my worthy
readers, bear with the weakness of my natureor
rather let us sit down together, indulge the full flow
of filial piety, and weep over the memories of our
great great grand-fathers.
Having thus gratified those feelings irresistibly
awakened by the happy scenes I am describing, I
return with more composure to my history.
The town of New Amsterdam, being, as I
before
mentioned, left to its own course and the
fostering
care of providence, increased as rapidly in
importance, as though it had been burthened with a
dozen panniers full of those sage laws, which are
usually heaped upon the backs of young citiesin
order to make them grow. The only measure that
remains on record of the worthy council, was to
build a chapel within the fort, which they dedicated
to the great and good
St. Nicholas
, who
immediately
took the infant town of New Amsterdam
under
his peculiar patronage, and has ever since been,
and I devoutly hope will ever be, the tutelar saint
of this excellent city. I am moreover told, that
there is a little legendary book somewhere extant,
written in low dutch, which says that the image
of this renowned saint, which whilome graced the
bowsprit of the Goede Vrouw, was placed in front
of this chapel; and the legend further treats of
divers miracles wrought by the mighty pipe which
the saint held in his mouth; a whiff of which was
a sovereign cure for an indigestion, and consequently
of great importance in this colony of huge feeders.
But as, notwithstanding the most diligent search,
I cannot lay my hands upon this little book, I
entertain
considerable doubt on the subject.
This much is certain, that from the time of the
building of this chapel, the town throve with
tenfold
prosperity, and soon became the metropolis of
numerous settlements, and an extensive territory.
The province extended on the north, to Fort
Aurania
or Orange, now known by the name of Albany,
situated about 160 miles up the Mohegan or
Hudson
River. Indeed the province claimed quite to
the river St. Lawrence; but this claim was not
much insisted on at the time, as the country beyond
Fort Aurania was a perfect wilderness, reported to
be inhabited by cannibals, and termed Terra
Incognita
.
Various accounts were given of the people of
these unknown parts; by some they are described
as being of the race of the
Acephali
, such as
Herodotus
describes, who have no heads, and carry their
eyes in their bellies. Others affirm they were of
that race whom father Charlevoix mentions, as hav
ing but one leg; adding gravely, that they were
exceedingly alert in running. But the most
satisfactory
account is that given by the reverend Hans
Megapolensis, a missionary in these parts, who, in
a letter still extant, declares them to be the
Mohagues
or Mohawks; a nation, according to his
description
,
very loose in their morals, but withal most
rare wags. For, says he, if theye can get to bedd
with another mans wife, theye thinke it a piece of
wit.
[20]
[20]
Let. of I. Megapol. Hag. S. P.
This excellent old gentleman gives moreover
very important additional information, about this
country of monsters; for he observes, theye have
plenty of tortoises here, and within land, from two
and three to four feet long; some with two heads,
very mischievous and addicted to biting.
Ogilvie, in his excellent account of America, speaking of
these parts, makes mention of Lions, which abounded on a high
mountain, and likewise observes, On the borders of Canada there
is seen sometimes a kind of beast which hath some resemblance
with a horse, having cloven feet, shaggy mayn, one horn just on
the forehead, a tail like that of a wild hog, and a deer's neck.
He furthermore gives a picture of this strange beast, which
resembles
exceedingly an unicorn.It is much to be lamented by
philosophers
,
that this miraculous breed of animals, like that of the
horned frog, is totally extinct.
On the south the province reached to Fort
Nassau
,
on the South River, since called the Delaware
and on the east it extended to Varshe (or Fresh)
River, since called Connecticut River. On this
L 2
frontier was likewise erected a mighty fort and
trading house, much about the spot where at present
is situated the pleasant town of Hartford; this port
was called
Fort Goed Hoop
, or Good Hope, and
was intended as well for the purpose of trade as
defence
;
but of this fort, its valiant garrison, and
staunch commander, I shall treat more anon, as they
are destined to make some noise in this eventful and
authentic history.
Thus prosperously did the province of New
Nederlandts
encrease in magnitude; and the early
history
of its metropolis, presents a fair page, unsullied
by crime or calamity. Herds of painted savages
still lurked about the tangled woods and the rich
bottoms of the fair island of Manna-hatathe
hunter
still pitched his rude bower of skins and branches,
beside the wild brooks, that stole through the cool
and shady valleys; while here and there were seen
on some sunny knoll, a group of indian wigwams,
whose smoke rose above the neighbouring trees and
floated in the clear expanse of heaven. The
uncivilized
tenants of the forest remained peaceable
neighbours
of the town of New Amsterdam; and our
worthy ancestors endeavoured to ameliorate their
situation as much as possible, by benevolently giving
them gin, rum and glass beads, in exchange for all
the furs they brought; for it seems the kind hearted
dutchmen had conceived a great friendship for their
savage neighbourson account of the facility with
which they suffered themselves to be taken in. Not
that they were deficient in understanding, for
certain
of their customs give tokens of great
shrewdness
,
especially that mentioned by Ogilvie, who says,
for the least offence the bridegroom soundly beats
the wife, and turns her out of doors and marries
another, insomuch that some of them have every
year a new wife.
True it is, that good understanding between our
worthy ancestors and their savage neighbours, was
liable to occasional interruptionsand I recollect
hearing my grandmother, who was a very wise old
woman, well versed in the history of these parts,
tell a long story of a winter evening, about a battle
between the New Amsterdammers and the Indians,
which was known, but why, I do not recollect, by
the name of the
Peach War
, and which took place
near a peach orchard, in a dark and gloomy glen,
overshadowed by cedars, oaks and dreary hemlocks.
The legend of this bloody encounter, was for a long
time current among the nurses, old women, and
other ancient chroniclers of the place; and the
dismal
seat of war, went, for some generations, by the
name of
Murderers' Valley;
but time and
improvement
have equally obliterated the tradition and the
place of this battle, for what was once the
bloodstained
valley, is now in the centre of this populous
city, and known by the name of
Dey-street
.
[21]
[21]
This battle is said by some to have happened much later than
the date assigned by our historian. Some of the ancient inhabitants
of our city, place it in the beginning of the last century. It is more
than probable, however, that Mr. Knickerbocker is correct, as he
has doubtless investigated the matter.
Print. Dev
.
For a long time the new settlement depended
upon the mother country for most of its supplies.
The vessels which sailed in search of a north west
passage, always touched at New Amsterdam, where
they unloaded fresh cargoes of adventurers, and
unheard of quantities of gin, bricks, tiles, glass
beads, gingerbread and other necessaries; in
exchange
for which they received supplies of pork and
vegetables, and made very profitable bargains for
furs and bear skins. Never did the simple islanders
of the south seas, look with more impatience for the
adventurous vessels, that brought them rich ladings
of old hoops, spike nails and looking glasses, than did
our honest colonists, for the vessels that brought them
the comforts of the mother country. In this
particular
they resembled their worthy but simple
descendants
,
who prefer depending upon Europe for
necessaries
,
which they might produce or manufacture at
less cost and trouble in their own country. Thus have
I known a very shrewd family, who being removed
to some distance from an inconvenient draw well,
beside which they had long sojourned, always
preferred
to send to it for water, though a plentiful
brook ran by the very door of their new habitation.
How long the growing colony might have looked
to its parent Holland for supplies, like a chubby
overgrown urchin, clinging to its mother's breast,
even after it is breeched, I will not pretend to say,
for it does not become an historian to indulge in
conjecturesI can only assert the fact, that the
inhabitants
,
being obliged by repeated emergencies,
and frequent disappointments of foreign supplies, to
look about them and resort to contrivances, became
nearly as wise as people generally are, who are
taught wisdom by painful experience. They
therefore
learned to avail themselves of such expedients
as presentedto make use of the bounties of nature,
where they could get nothing betterand thus
became
prodigiously enlightened, under the scourge
of inexorable necessity; gradually opening one eye
at a time, like the Arabian impostor receiving the
bastinado.
Still however they advanced from one point of
knowledge to another with characteristic slowness
and circumspection, admitting but few
improvements
and inventions, and those too, with a jealous
reluctance that has ever distinguished our
respectable
dutch yeomanry; who adhere, with pious and
praiseworthy obstinacy, to the customs, the fashions,
the manufactures and even the very utensils,
however
inconvenient, of their revered forefathers. It
was long after the period of which I am writing,
before they discoved the surprising secret, that it
was more economic and commodious, to roof their
houses with shingles procured from the adjacent
forests, than to import tiles for the purpose from
Holland; and so slow were they in believing that
the soil of a young country, could possibly make
creditable bricks; that even at a late period of the
last century, ship loads have been imported from
Holland, by certain of its most orthodox
descendants
.
The accumulating wealth and consequence of
New Amsterdam and its dependencies, at length
awakened the serious solicitude of the mother
country; who finding it a thriving and opulent
colony
,
and that it promised to yield great profit and
no trouble; all at once became wonderfully anxious
about its safety, and began to load it with tokens of
regard; in the same manner that people are sure
to oppress rich relations with their affection and
loving kindness, who could do much better without
their assistance.
The usual marks of protection shewn by
mother
countries to wealthy colonies, were
forthwith
evincedthe first care always being to send
rulers to the new settlement, with orders to squeeze
as much revenue from it as it will yield.
Accordingly
in the year of our Lord 1629 mynheer
Wouter Van Twiller
was appointed governor
of the province of Nieuw Nederlandts, under the
controul of their High Mightinesses the lords
states general of the United Netherlands, and the
privileged West India company.
This renowned old gentleman arrived at New
Amsterdam in the merry month of June, the
sweetest month in all the year; when Dan Apollo
seems to dance up the transparent firmamentwhen
the robin, the black-bird, the thrush and a thousand
other wanton songsters make the woods to resound
with amorous ditties, and the luxurious little
Boblincon
revels among the clover blossoms of the
meadows
.All
which happy coincidence, persuaded
the old ladies of New Amsterdam, who were
skilled
in the art of foretelling events, that this was to
be a happy and prosperous administration.
But as it would be derogatory to the
consequence
of the first dutch governor of the great
province
of Nieuw Nederlandts, to be thus scurvily
introduced
at the end of a chapter, I will put an
end to this second book of my history, that I may
usher him in, with the more dignity in the
beginning
of my next.
END OF BOOK II.
BOOK III.
In which is recorded the golden reign of Wouter
Van Twiller.
CHAP. I.
Setting forth the unparalleled virtues of the
renowned
Wouter Van Twiller, as likewise his
unutterable
wisdom in the law case of Wandle
Schoonhoven
and Barent Bleeckerand the great
admiration
of the public thereat
.
The
renowned
Wouter
(or Walter)
Van
Twiller
, was descended from a long line of
dutch burgomasters, who had successively dozed
away their lives and grown fat upon the bench of
magistracy in Rotterdam; and who had comported
themselves with such singular wisdom and
propriety
,
that they were never either heard or talked of
which, next to being universally applauded, should
be the object of ambition of all sage magistrates and
rulers.
His surname of Twiller, is said to be a
corruption
of the original
Twijfler
, which in English
means
doubter
; a name admirably descriptive of
his deliberative habits. For though he was a man,
shut up within himself like an oyster, and of such a
profoundly reflective turn, that he scarcely ever spoke
except in monosyllables, yet did he never make up
his mind, on any doubtful point. This was clearly
accountd for by his adherents, who affirmed that
he always conceived every subject on so
comprehensive
a scale, that he had not room in his head,
to turn it over and examine both sides of it, so that
he always remained in doubt, merely in
consequence
of the astonishing magnitude of his ideas!
There are two opposite ways by which some
men get into noticeone by talking a vast deal
and thinking a little, and the other by holding
their tongues and not thinking at all. By the first
many a vapouring, superficial pretender acquires
the reputation of a man of quick partsby the other
many a vacant dunderpate, like the owl, the
stupidest
of birds, comes to be complimented, by a
discerning
world, with all the attributes of wisdom.
This, by the way, is a mere casual remark, which
I would not for the universe have it thought, I
apply
to Governor Van Twiller. On the contrary he
was a very wise dutchman, for he never said a
foolish
thingand of such invincible gravity, that he
was never known to laugh, or even to smile, through
the course of a long and prosperous life. Certain
however it is, there never was a matter proposed,
however simple, and on which your common
narrow
VOL. I. M
minded mortals, would rashly determine at the
first glance, but what the renowned Wouter, put on
a mighty mysterious, vacant kind of look, shook
his capacious head, and having smoked for five
minutes with redoubled earnestness, sagely
observed
,
that he had his doubts about the matter
which in process of time gained him the character
of a man slow of belief, and not easily imposed on.
The person of this illustrious old gentleman
was as regularly formed and nobly proportioned, as
though it had been moulded by the hands of some
cunning dutch statuary, as a model of majesty and
lordly grandeur. He was exactly five feet six
inches in height, and six feet five inches in
circumference
.
His head was a perfect sphere, far
excelling
in magnitude that of the great Pericles (who
was thence waggishly called
Schenocephalus
, or
onion head)indeed, of such stupendous
dimensions
was it, that dame nature herself, with all her
sex's ingenuity, would have been puzzled to
construct
a neck, capable of supporting it; wherefore
she wisely declined the attempt, and settled it
firmly on the top of his back bone, just between the
shoulders; where it remained, as snugly bedded,
as a ship of war in the mud of the Potowmac.
His body was of an oblong form, particularly
capacious
at bottom; which was wisely ordered by
providence, seeing that he was a man of sedentary
habits, and very averse to the idle labour of
walking
.
His legs, though exceeding short, were
sturdy
in proportion to the weight they had to sustain;
so that when erect, he had not a little the
appearance
of a robustious beer barrel, standing on skids.
His face, that infallible index of the mind, presented
a vast expanse perfectly unfurrowed or deformed by
any of those lines and angles, which disfigure the
human countenance with what is termed expression.
Two small grey eyes twinkled feebly in the midst,
like two stars of lesser magnitude, in a hazy
firmament
;
and his full fed cheeks, which seemed to
have taken toll of every thing that went into his
mouth, were curiously mottled and streaked with
dusky red, like a spitzenberg apple.
His habits were as regular as his person. He
daily took his four stated meals, appropriating
exactly
an hour to each; he smoked and doubted
eight hours, and he slept the remaining twelve of
the four and twenty. Such was the renowned
Wouter Van Twillera true philosopher, for his
mind was either elevated above, or tranquilly
settled
below, the cares and perplexities of this world.
He had lived in it for years, without feeling the
least curiosity to know whether the sun revolved
round it, or it round the sun; and he had even
watched for at least half a century, the smoke
curling
from his pipe to the ceiling, without once
troubling
his head with any of those numerous theories,
by which a philosopher would have perplexed his
brain, in accounting for its rising above the
surrounding
atmosphere.
In his council he presided with great state and
solemnity. He sat in a huge chair of solid oak
hewn in the celebrated forest of the Hague,
fabricated
by an experienced Timmerman of
Amsterdam
,
and curiously carved about the arms and feet,
into exact imitations of gigantic eagle's claws.
Instead of a sceptre he swayed a long turkish pipe,
wrought with jasmin and amber, which had been
presented to a stadtholder of Holland, at the
conclusion
of a treaty with one of the petty Barbary
powers.In this stately chair would he sit, and
this magnificent pipe would he smoke, shaking his
right knee with a constant motion, and fixing his
eye for hours together upon a little print of
Amsterdam
,
which hung in a black frame, against the
opposite wall of the council chamber. Nay, it has
ever been said, that when any deliberation of
extraordinary
length and intricacy was on the carpet,
the renowned Wouter would absolutely shut his
eyes for full two hours at a time, that he might not
be disturbed by external objectsand at such times
the internal commotion of his mind, was evinced
by certain regular guttural sounds, which his
admirers
declared were merely the noise of conflict,
made by his contending doubts and opinions.
It is with infinite difficulty I have been enabled
to collect these biographical anecdotes of the great
man under consideration. The facts respecting
him were so scattered and vague, and divers of
them so questionable in point of authenticity, that
I have had to give up the search after many, and
decline the admission of still more, which would
have tended to heighten the colouring of his
portrait
.
I have been the more anxious to delineate fully,
the person and habits of the renowned Van Twiller,
from the consideration that he was not only the first,
but also the best governor that ever presided over
this ancient and respectable province; and so
tranquil
and benevolent was his reign, that I do not find
throughout the whole of it, a single instance of any
offender being brought to punishment:a most
indubitable
sign of a merciful governor, and a case
unparalleled, excepting in the reign of the illustrious
King Log, from whom, it is hinted, the renowned
Van Twiller was a lineal descendant.
The very outset of the career of this excellent
magistrate, like that of Solomon, or to speak more
appropriately, like that of the illustrious governor of
Barataria, was distinguished by an example of legal
acumen, that gave flattering presage of a wise and
equitable administration. The very morning after
he had been solemnly installed in office, and at the
moment that he was making his breakfast from a
prodigious earthen dish, filled with milk and Indian
pudding, he was suddenly interrupted by the
appearance
M 2
of one Wandle Schoonhoven, a very important
old burgher of New Amsterdam, who complained
bitterly of one Barent Bleecker, inasmuch as he
fraudulently refused to come to a settlement of
accounts
,
seeing that there was a heavy balance in
favour of the said Wandle. Governor Van Twiller,
as I have already observed, was a man of few words,
he was likewise a mortal enemy to multiplying
writingsor being disturbed at his breakfast.
Having
therefore listened attentively to the statement of
Wandle Schoonhoven, giving an occasional grunt,
as he shovelled a mighty spoonful of Indian
pudding
into his moutheither as a sign that he relished
the dish, or comprehended the storyhe called unto
him his constable, and pulling out of his breeches
pocket a huge jack-knife, dispatched it after the
defendant
as a summons, accompanied by his tobacco
box as a warrant.
This summary process was as effectual in those
simple days, as was the seal ring of the great Haroun
Alraschid, among the true believersthe two
parties
,
being confronted before him, each produced a
book of accounts, written in a language and
character
that would have puzzled any but a High Dutch
commentator, or a learned decypherer of Egyptian
obelisks, to understand. The sage Wouter took
them one after the other, and having poised them
in his hands, and attentively counted over the
number
of leaves, fell straightway into a very great doubt,
and smoked for half an hour without saying a word;
at length, laying his finger beside his nose, and
shutting
his eyes for a moment, with the air of a man
who has just caught a subtle idea by the tail, he
slowly took his pipe from his mouth, puffed forth a
column of tobacco smoke, and with marvellous
gravity
and solemnity pronouncedthat having
carefully
counted over the leaves and weighed the books,
it was found, that one was just as thick and as heavy
as the othertherefore it was the final opinion of
the court that the accounts were equally balanced
therefore Wandle should give Barent a receipt, and
Barent should give Wandle a receiptand the
constable
should pay the costs.
This decision being straightway made known,
diffused general joy throughout New Amsterdam,
for the people immediately perceived, that they had
a very wise and equitable magistrate to rule over
them. But its happiest effect was, that not another
law suit took place throughout the whole of his
administration
and
the office of constable fell into
such decay, that there was not one of those lossel
scouts known in the province for many years. I am
the more particular in dwelling on this transaction,
not only because I deem it one of the most sage
and righteous judgments on record, and well worthy
the attention of modern magistrates, but because it
was a miraculous event in the history of the
renowned
Wouterbeing the only time he was ever known
to come to a decision, in the whole course of his
life.
CHAP. II.
Containing some account of the grand Council of
New Amsterdam, as also divers especial good
philosophical reasons why an Alderman should
be fatwith other particulars touching the
state of the Province
.
In
treating of the early governors of the
province
,
I must caution my readers against
confounding
them, in point of dignity and power, with those
worthy gentlemen, who are whimsically
denominated
governors, in this enlightened republica set
of unhappy victims of popularity, who are in fact
the most dependent, hen-pecked beings in
community
:
doomed to bear the secret goadings and
corrections
of their own party, and the sneers and
revilings
of the whole world beside.Set up, like
geese, at christmas hollidays, to be pelted and shot
at by every whipster and vagabond in the land. On
the contrary, the dutch governors enjoyed that
uncontrolled
authority vested in all commanders of
distant colonies or territories. They were in a
manner, absolute despots in their little domains,
lording it, if so disposed, over both law and gospel,
and accountable to none but the mother country;
which it is well known is astonishingly deaf to all
complaints against its governors, provided they
discharge the main duty of their station
squeezing
out a good revenue. This hint will be of
importance
,
to prevent my readers from being seized
with doubt and incredulity, whenever, in the course
of this authentic history, they encounter the
uncommon
circumstance, of a governor, acting with
independence, and in opposition to the opinions of
the multitude.
To assist the doubtful Wouter, in the arduous
business of legislation, a board of magistrates was
appointed, which presided immediately over the
police. This potent body consisted of a schout or
bailiff, with powers between those of the present
mayor and sherifffive burgermeesters, who were
equivalent to aldermen, and five schepens, who
officiated
as scrubs, sub-devils, or bottle-holders to
the burgermeesters, in the same manner as do
assistant
aldermen to their principals at the present
day; it being their duty to fill the pipes of the lordly
burgermeesterssee that they were accommodated
with spitting boxeshunt the markets for
delicacies
for corporation dinners, and to discharge such
other little offices of kindness, as were occasionally
required. It was moreover, tacitly understood,
though not specifically enjoined, that they should
consider themselves as butts for the blunt wits of
the burgermeesters, and should laugh most heartily
at all their jokes; but this last was a duty as rarely
called in action in those days, as it is at present,
and was shortly remitted, in consequence of the
tragical death of a fat little Schepenwho
actually
died of suffocation in an unsuccessful effort
to force a laugh, at one of Burgermeester Van
Zandt's best jokes.
In return for these humble services, they
were permitted to say
yes
and
no
at the council
board, and to have that enviable privilege, the
run of the public kitchenbeing graciously
permitted
to eat, and drink, and smoke, at all those
snug junkettings and public gormandizings, for
which the ancient magistrates were equally
famous
with their more modern successors. The
post of Schepen therefore, like that of assistant
alderman, was eagerly coveted by all your
burghers
of a certain description, who have a huge
relish for good feeding, and a humble ambition to
be great men, in a small waywho thirst after a
little brief authority, that shall render them the
terror of the alms house, and the bridewellthat
shall enable them to lord it over obsequious
poverty
,
vagrant vice, outcast prostitution, and hunger
driven dishonestythat shall place in their hands
the lesser, but galling scourge of the law, and give
to their beck a hound like pack of catchpoles and
bum bailiffstenfold greater rogues than the
culprits
they hunt down!My readers will excuse
this sudden warmth, which I confess is unbecoming
of a grave historianbut I have a mortal antipathy
to catchpoles, bum bailiffs, and little great men.
The ancient magistrates of this city,
corresponded
with those of the present time, no less in
form, magnitude and intellect, than in prerogative
and privilege. The burgomasters, like our
aldermen
,
were generally chosen by weightand not
only the weight of the body, but likewise the weight
of the head. It is a maxim practically observed in
all honest, plain thinking, regular cities, that an
alderman
should be fatand the wisdom of this can
be proved to a certainty. That the body is in some
measure an image of the mind, or rather that the
mind is moulded to the body, like melted lead to
the clay in which it is cast, has been insisted on by
many men of science, who have made human nature
their peculiar studyFor as a learned gentleman
of our city observes there is a constant relation
between the moral character of all intelligent
creatures
,
and their physical constitutionbetween their
habits and the structure of their bodies. Thus we
see, that a lean, spare, diminutive body, is generally
accompanied by a petulant, restless, meddling mind
either the mind wears down the body, by its
continual
motion; or else the body, not affording the
mind sufficient house room, keeps it continually in
a state of fretfulness, tossing and worrying about
from the uneasiness of its situation. Whereas your
round, sleek, fat, unwieldly periphery is ever
attended
by a mind, like itself, tranquil, torpid and
at ease; and we may always observe, that your
well fed, robustious burghers are in general very
tenacious of their ease and comfort; being great
enemies to noise, discord and disturbanceand
surely none are more likely to study the public
tranquillity than those who are so careful of their
ownWho ever hears of fat men heading a riot, or
herding together in turbulent mobs?nonoit
is your lean, hungry men, who are continually
worrying
society, and setting the whole community by
the ears.
The divine Plato, whose doctrines are not
sufficiently
attended to by philosophers of the present
age, allows to every man three soulsone,
immortal
and rational, seated in the brain, that it may
overlook and regulate the bodya second
consisting
of the surly and irascible passions, which
like belligerent powers lie encamped around the
hearta third mortal and sensual, destitute of
reason, gross and brutal in its propensities, and
enchained in the belly, that it may not disturb the
divine soul, by its ravenous howlings. Now,
according
to this excellent theory what can be more
clear, than that your fat alderman, is most likely
to have the most regular and well conditioned mind.
His head is like a huge, spherical chamber,
containing
a prodigious mass of soft brains, whereon the
rational soul lies softly and snugly couched, as on a
feather bed; and the eyes, which are the windows
of the bed chamber, are usually half closed that its
VOL. I. N
slumberings may not be disturbed by external
objects
.
A mind thus comfortably lodged, and
protected
from disturbance, is manifestly most likely
to perform its functions with regularity and ease.
By dint of good feeding, moreover, the mortal and
malignant soul, which is confined in the belly, and
which by its raging and roaring, puts the irritable
soul in the neighbourhood of the heart in an
intolerable
passion, and thus renders men crusty and
quarrelsome when hungry, is completely pacified,
silenced and put to restwhereupon a host of
honest good fellow qualities and kind hearted
affections
,
which had lain perdue, slily peeping out of
the loop holes of the heart, finding this cerberus
asleep, do pluck up their spirits, turn out one and all
in their holliday suits, and gambol up and down the
diaphragmdisposing their possessor to laughter,
good humour and a thousand friendly offices towards
his fellow mortals.
As a board of magistrates, formed on this
model
,
think but very little, they are the less likely to
differ and wrangle about favourite opinionsand as
they generally transact business upon a hearty
dinner
,
they are naturally disposed to be lenient and
indulgent in the administration of their duties.
Charlemagne was conscious of this, and therefore
(a pitiful measure, for which I can never forgive
him), ordered in his cartularies, that no judge
should hold a court of justice, except in the
morning
,
on an empty stomach.A rule which, I
warrant
,
bore hard upon all the poor culprits in his
kingdom. The more enlightened and humane
generation
of the present day, have taken an opposite
course, and have so managed that the aldermen are
the best fed men in the community; feasting lustily
on the fat things of the land, and gorging so
heartily
on oysters and turtles, that in process of time they
acquire the activity of the one, and the form, the
waddle
,
and the green fat of the other. The consequence
is, as I have just said; these luxurious feastings do
produce such a dulcet equanimity and repose of the
soul, rational and irrational, that their transactions
are proverbial for unvarying monotonyand the
profound laws, which they enact in their dozing
moments, amid the labours of digestion, are quietly
suffered to remain as dead letters, and never
enforced
,
when awake. In a word your fair
round-bellied
burgomaster, like a full fed mastiff, dozes
quietly at the house-door, always at home, and always
at hand to watch over its safetybut as to electing
a lean, meddling candidate to the office, as has now
and then been done, I would as leave put a
greyhound
,
to watch the house, or a race horse to drag
an ox waggon.
The Burgo-masters then, as I have already
mentioned, were wisely chosen by weight, and the
Schepens, or assistant aldermen, were appointed to
attend upon them, and
help them eat;
but the latter,
in the course of time, when they had been fed and
fattened into sufficient bulk of body and drowsiness
of brain, became very eligible candidates for the
Burgomasters' chairs, having fairly eaten themselves
into office, as a mouse eats his way into a
comfortable
lodgement in a goodly, blue-nosed, skim'd
milk, New England cheese.
Nothing could equal the profound deliberations
that took place between the renowned Wouter, and
these his worthy compeers, unless it be the sage
divans
of some of our modern corporations. They
would sit for hours smoking and dozing over
public
affairs, without speaking a word to interrupt that
perfect stillness, so necessary to deep reflection
faithfully observing an excellent maxim, which the
good old governor had caused to be written in
letters
of gold, on the walls of the council chamber
Stille Seugen eten at den draf op.
which, being rendered into English for the benefit of
modern legislatures, means
The sow that's still
Sucks all the swill.
Under the sober way, therefore, of the
renowned
Van Twiller, and the sage superintendance of
his burgomasters, the infant settlement waxed
vigorous
apace, gradually emerging from the swamps
and forests, and exhibiting that mingled appearance
of town and country, customary in new cities, and
which at this day may be witnessed in the great city
of Washington; that immense metropolis, which
makes such a glorious appearanceupon paper.
Ranges of houses began to give the idea of
streets and lanes, and wherever an interval occurred,
it was over-run by a wilderness of sweet smelling
thorn apple, vulgarly called stinkweed. Amid
these fragrant bowers, the honest burghers, like so
many patriarchs of yore, sat smoking their pipes of
a sultry afternoon, inhaling the balmy odours
wafted
on every gale, and listening with silent
gratulation
to the clucking of their hens, the cackling of
their geese, or the sonorous gruntings of their
swine; that combination of farm-yard melody,
which may truly be said to have a silver sound,
inasmuch
as it conveys a certain assurance of
profitable
marketing.
The modern spectator, who wanders through
the crowded streets of this populous city, can scarce
form an idea, of the different appearance which
every object presented, in those primitive times.
The busy hum of commerce, the noise of revelry,
the rattling equipages of splendid luxury, were
unknown
in the peaceful settlement of New
Amsterdam
.
The bleating sheep and frolicksome calves
sported about the verdant ridge, where now their
legitimate successors, the Broadway loungers, take
their morning's stroll; the cunning fox or ravenous
N 2
wolf, skulked in the woods, where now are to be
seen the dens of Gomez and his righteous
fraternity
of money brokers, and flocks of vociferous
geese cackled about the field, where now the
patriotic
tavern of Martling echoes with the
wranglings
of the mob.
[22]
[22]
De Vries mentions a place where they over-haul their ships,
which he calls
Smits Vleye
, there is still to this day a place in New
York called by that name, where a market is built called the Fly
market.
Old MS.
There are few native inhabitants, I trow, of this great city,
who when boys were not engaged in the renowned feuds of
Broadway
and Smith flythe subject of so many fly market romances
and schoolboy rhymes.
Editor
.
The whole island, at least such
parts of it as were inhabited, bloomed like a second
Eden; every dwelling had its own cabbage garden,
and that esculent vegetable, while it gave promise
of bounteous loads of sour crout, was also
emblematic
of the rapid growth and regular habits of the
youthful colony.
Such are the soothing scenes presented by a fat
government. The province of the New
Netherlands
,
destitute of wealth, possessed a sweet
tranquillity
that wealth could never purchase. It
seemed
indeed as if old Saturn had again commenced
his reign, and renewed the golden days of primeval
simplicity. For the golden age, says Ovid, was
totally destitute of gold, and for that very reason
was called the golden age, that is, the happy and
fortunate agebecause the evils produced by the
precious metals, such as avarice, covetuousness,
theft, rapine, usury, banking, note-shaving,
lottery-insuring
,
and the whole catalogue of crimes and
grievances were then unknown. In the iron age
there was abundance of gold, and on that very
account it was called the iron age, because of the
hardships, the labours, the dissentions, and the
wars, occasioned by the thirst of gold.
The genial days of Wouter Van Twiller
therefore
,
may truly be termed the golden age of our
city. There were neither public commotions, nor
private quarrels; neither parties, nor sects, nor
schisms; neither prosecutions, nor trials, nor
punishments
;
nor were there counsellors, attornies,
catch-poles or hangmen. Every man attended to
what little business he was lucky enough to have,
or neglect it if he pleased, without asking the
opinion
of his neighbour.In those days nobody
meddled
with concerns above his comprehension, nor
thrust his nose into other people's affairs; nor
neglected
to correct his own conduct, and reform his
own character, in his zeal to pull to pieces the
characters of othersbut in a word, every
respectable
citizen eat when he was not hungry, drank
when he was not thirsty, and went regularly to bed,
when the sun set, and the fowls went to roost,
whether he was sleepy or not; all which, being
agreeable to the doctrines of Malthus, tended so
remarkably to the population of the settlement, that
I am told every dutiful wife throughout New
Amsterdam
,
made a point of always enriching her
husband
with at least one child a year, and very often
a bracethis superabundance of good things
clearly
constituting the true luxury of life, according to
the favourite dutch maxim that more than enough
constitutes a feast. Every thing therefore went
on exactly as it should do, and in the usual words
employed by historians to express the welfare of a
country, the profoundest
tranquillity
and
repose
reigned throughout the province.
CHAP. III.
How the town of New Amsterdam arose out of the
mud, and came to be marvellously polished and
politetogether with a picture of the manners
of our great great Grandfathers
.
Manifold
are the tastes and dispositions of
the enlightened literati, who turn over the pages of
history. Some there be whose hearts are brim
full of the yeast of courage, and whose bosoms do
work, and swell, and foam with untried valour,
like a barrel of new cider, or a train-band captain,
fresh from under the hands of his taylor. This
doughty class of readers can be satisfied with
nothing
but bloody battles, and horrible encounters;
they must be continually storming forts, sacking
cities, springing mines, marching up to the
muzzles
of cannons, charging bayonet through every
page, and revelling in gun-powder and carnage.
Others, who are of a less martial, but equally
ardent
imagination, and who, withal, are a little given
to the marvellous, will dwell with wonderous
satisfaction
on descriptions of prodigies, unheard of
events, hair-breadth escapes, hardy adventures, and
all those astonishing narrations, that just amble
along the boundary line of possibility.A third
class, who, not to speak slightingly of them, are of
a lighter turn, and skin over the records of past
times, as they do over the edifying pages of a
novel
,
merely for relaxation and innocent amusement;
do singularly delight in treasons, executions,
sabine
rapes, tarquin outrages, conflagrations,
murders
,
and all the other catalogue of hideous crimes,
that like Cayenne in cookery, do give a pungency
and flavour, to the dull detail of historywhile a
fourth class, of more philosophic habits, do
diligently
pore over the musty chronicles of time, to
investigate the operations of the human mind, and
watch the gradual changes in men and manners,
effected by the progress of knowledge, the
vicissitudes
of events, or the influence of situation.
If the three first classes find but little
wherewithal
to solace themselves, in the tranquil reign of
Wouter Van Twiller, I entreat them to exert their
patience for a while, and bear with the tedious
picture
of happiness, prosperity and peace, which my
duty as a faithful historian obliges me to draw;
and I promise them, that as soon as I can possibly
light upon any thing horrible, uncommon or
impossible
,
it shall go hard, but I will make it afford
them entertainment. This being premised, I turn
with great complacency to the fourth class of my
readers, who are men, or, if possible, women, after
my own heart; grave, philosophical and
investigating
;
fond of analyzing characters, of taking a start
from first causes, and so hunting a nation down,
through all the mazes of innovation and
improvement
.
Such will naturally be anxious to witness
the first development of the newly hatched
colony
,
and the primitive manners and customs,
prevalent
among its inhabitants, during the halcyon reign
of Van Twiller or the doubter.
To describe minutely the gradual advances,
from the rude log hut, to the stately dutch
mansion
,
with a brick front, glass windows, and
shingle
rooffrom the tangled thicket, to the luxuriant
cabbage garden, and from the skulking Indian to
the ponderous burgomaster, would probably be
fatiguing
to my reader, and certainly very
inconvenient
to myself; suffice it to say, trees were cut
down, stumps grubbed up, bushes cleared away,
until the new city rose gradually from amid swamps
and stinkweeds, like a mighty fungus, springing
from a mass of rotten wood.
The sage council, as has been mentioned in a
preceding chapter, not being able to determine upon
any plan for the building of their citythe cows,
in a laudable fit of patriotism, took it under their
particular charge, and as they went to and from
pasture, established paths through the bushes, on
each side of which the good folks built their houses;
which is one cause of the rambling and picturesque
turns and labyrinths, which distinguish certain
streets of New York, at this very day.
Some, it must be noted, who were strenuous
partizans of Mynheer Ten Breeches, (or Ten
Brock) vexed that his plan of digging canals was
not adopted, made a compromise with their
inclinations
,
by establishing themselves on the margins
of those creeks and inlets, which meandered through
various parts of the ground laid out for
improvement
.
To these may be particularly ascribed the first
settlement of Broad street; which originally was
built along a creek, that ran up, to what at present
is called Wall street. The lower part soon became
very busy and populous; and a ferry house
[23]
[23]
This house has been several times repaired, and at present is
a small yellow brick house, No. 23, Broad Street, with the gable
end to the street, surmounted with an iron rod, on which, until
within three or four years, a little iron ferry boat officiated as
weather cock.
was
in process of time established at the head of it;
being at that day called the head of inland
navigation
.
The disciples of Mynheer Toughbreeches, on
the other hand, no less enterprising, and more
industrious
than their rivals, stationed themselves
along the shore of the river, and laboured with
unexampled
perseverance, in making little docks and
dykes, from which originated that multitude of
mud traps with which this city is fringed. To
these docks would the old Burghers repair, just at
those hours when the falling tide had left the beach
uncovered, that they might snuff up the fragrant
effluvia of mud and mire; which they observed had
a true wholesome smell, and reminded them of the
canals of Holland. To the indefatigable labours,
and praiseworthy example of this latter class of
projectors, are we indebted for the acres of artificial
ground, on which several of our streets, in the
vicinity of the rivers are built; and which, if we
may credit the assertions of several learned
physicians
of this city, have been very efficacious in
producing the yellow fever.
The houses of the higher class, were generally
constructed of wood, excepting the gable end, which
was of small black and yellow dutch bricks, and
always faced on the street, as our ancestors, like
their descendants, were very much given to outward
shew, and were noted for putting the best leg
foremost
.
The house was always furnished with
abundance of large doors and small windows on
every floor, the date of its erection was curiously
designated by iron figures on the front, and on the
top of the roof was perched a fierce little weather
cock, to let the family into the important secret,
which way the wind blew. These, like the weather
cocks on the tops of our steeples, pointed so many
different ways, that every man could have a wind
to his mind; and you would have thought old Eolus
had set all his bags of wind adrift, pell mell, to
gambol about this windy metropolisthe most
Some, it must be noted, who were strenuous
partizans of Mynheer Ten Breeches, (or Ten
Brock) vexed that his plan of digging canals was
not adopted, made a compromise with their
inclinations
,
by establishing themselves on the margins
of those creeks and inlets, which meandered through
various parts of the ground laid out for
improvement
.
To these may be particularly ascribed the first
settlement of Broad street; which originally was
built along a creek, that ran up, to what at present
is called Wall street. The lower part soon became
very busy and populous; and a ferry house
[24]
[24]
This house has been several times repaired, and at present is
a small yellow brick house, No. 23, Broad Street, with the gable
end to the street, surmounted with an iron rod, on which, until
within three or four years, a little iron ferry boat officiated as
weather cock.
was
in process of time established at the head of it;
being at that day called the head of inland
navigation
.
The disciples of Mynheer Toughbreeches, on
the other hand, no less enterprising, and more
industrious
than their rivals, stationed themselves
along the shore of the river, and laboured with
unexampled
perseverance, in making little docks and
dykes, from which originated that multitude of
mud traps with which this city is fringed. To
these docks would the old Burghers repair, just at
those hours when the falling tide had left the beach
have the tails of mermaidsbut this I look upon
to be a mere sport of fancy, or what is worse, a
wilful misrepresentation.
The grand parlour was the sanctum sanctorum,
where the passion for cleaning was indulged
without
controul. In this sacred apartment no one
was permitted to enter, excepting the mistress and
her confidential maid, who visited it once a week,
for the purpose of giving it a thorough cleaning,
and putting things to rightsalways taking the
precaution of leaving their shoes at the door, and
entering devoutly, on their stocking feet. After
scrubbing the floor, sprinkling it with fine white
sand, which was curiously stroked into angles, and
curves, and rhomboids, with a broomafter
washing
the windows, rubbing and polishing the
furniture
,
and putting a new bunch of evergreens in the
fire-placethe window shutters were again closed
to keep out the flies, and the room carefully locked
up until the revolution of time, brought round the
weekly cleaning day.
As to the family, they always entered in at the
gate, and most generally lived in the kitchen. To
have seen a numerous household assembled around
the fire, one would have imagined that he was
transported back to those happy days of primeval
simplicity, which float before our imaginations like
golden visions. The fire-places were of a truly
patriarchal magnitude, where the whole family,
old and young, master and servant, black and
white, nay even the very cat and dog, enjoyed a
community of privilege, and had each a prescriptive
right to a corner. Here the old burgher would set
in perfect silence, puffing his pipe, looking in the
fire with half shut eyes, and thinking of nothing
for hours together; the goede vrouw on the
opposite
side would employ herself diligently in
spinning
her yarn, or knitting stockings. The young
foks would crowd around th hearth, listening with
breathless attention to some old crone of a negro,
who was the oracle of the family,--and who,
perched
like a raven in a corner of the chimney, would
croak forth for a long winter afternoon, a string of
incredible
stories about New England witches--
grisly
ghosts--horses without heads--and hairbreadth
scapes and bloody encounters among the Indians.
In those happy days a well regulated family
always rose with the dawn, dined at eleven, and
went to bed at sun down. Dinner was invariably
a private meal, and the fat old burghers shewed
incontestible
symptoms of disappropriation and
uneasiness
,
at being surpised by a visit from a
neighbour
on such occasions. But though our worthy
ancestors were thus singularly averse to giving
dinners
,
yet they kept up the social bands of intimacy
by occasional banquettings, called tea parties.
As this is the first introduction of those
delectable
orgies which have since become so fashionable
in this city, I am conscious my fair readers will be
very curious to receive information on the subject.
Sorry am I, that there will be but little in my
description
calculated to excite their admiration. I
can neither delight them with accounts of
suffocating
crowds, nor brilliant drawing rooms, nor
towering feathers, nor sparkling diamonds, nor
immeasurable
trains. I can detail no choice
anecdotes
of scandal, for in those primitive times the
simple folk were either too stupid, or too good
natured
to pull each other's characters to pieces
nor can I furnish any whimsical anecdotes of brag
how one lady cheated, or another bounced into a
passion
;
for as yet there was no junto of dulcet old
dowagers, who met to win each other's money, and
lose their own tempers at a card table.
These fashionable parties were generally
confined
to the higher classes, or noblesse, that is to
say, such as kept their own cows, and drove their
own waggons. The company commonly
assembled
at three o'clock, and went away about six,
unless
it was in winter time, when the fashionable
hours were a little earlier, that the ladies might
get home before dark. I do not find that they
ever treated their company to iced creams, jellies
or syllabubs; or regaled them with musty almonds,
mouldy raisins, or sour oranges, as is often done in
the present age of refinement.Our ancestors were
fond of more sturdy, substantial fare. The tea
table
O 2
was crowned with a huge earthen dish, well
stored with slices of fat pork, fried brown, cut up
into mouthfuls, and swimming in doup or gravy.
The company being seated around the genial board,
and each furnished with a fork, evinced their
dexterity
in launching at the fattest pieces in this
mighty dishin much the same manner as sailors
harpoon porpoises at sea, or our Indians spear
salmon
in the lakes. Sometimes the table was graced
with immense apple pies, or saucers full of
preserved
peaches and pears; but it was always sure to
boast an enormous dish of balls of sweetened
dough, fried in hog's fat, and called dough nuts, or
oly koeksa delicious kind of cake, at present,
scarce known in this city, excepting in genuine
dutch families; but which retains its pre-eminent
station at the tea tables in Albany.
The tea was served out of a majestic delft
teapot
,
ornamented with paintings of fat little dutch
shepherds and shepherdesses, tending pigswith
boats sailing in the air, and houses built in the
clouds, and sundry other ingenious dutch fantasies.
The beaux distinguished themselves by their
adroitness
in replenishing this pot, from a huge copper
tea kettle, which would have made the pigmy
macaronies
of these degenerate days, sweat, merely to
look at it. To sweeten the beverage, a lump of
sugar was laid beside each cupand the company
alternately nibbled and sipped with great decorum,
until an improvement was introduced by a shrewd
and economic old lady, which was to suspend a
large lump directly over the tea table, by a string
from the ceiling, so that it could be swung from
mouth to mouthan ingenious expedient, which is
still kept up by some families in Albany; but which
prevails without exception, in Communipaw,
Bergen
,
Flat-Bush, and all our uncontaminated dutch
villages.
At these primitive tea-parties the utmost
propriety
and dignity of deportment prevailed. No
flirting nor coquettingno gambling of old ladies
nor hoyden chattering and romping of young ones
No self satisfied struttings of wealthy gentlemen
with their brains in their pocketsnor amusing
conceits, and monkey divertisements of smart young
gentlemen, with no brains at all. On the contrary,
the young ladies seated themselves demurely in
their rush-bottomed chairs, and knit their own
woollen stockings; nor ever opened their lips,
excepting
to say
yah Mynher
, or
yah, ya Vrouw
, to
any question that was asked them; behaving in all
things, like decent, well educated damsels. As to
the gentlemen, each of them tranquilly smoked his
pipe, and seemed lost in contemplation of the blue
and white tiles, with which the fire-places were
decorated
;
wherein sundry passages of scripture,
were piously pourtrayedTobit and his dog
figured
to great advantage; Haman swung
conspicuously
on his gibbet, and Jonah appeared most
manfully
bouncing out of the whale, like Harlequin
through a barrel of fire.
The parties broke up without noise and without
confusionfor, strange as it may seem, the ladies
and gentlemen were content to take their own cloaks
and shawls and hats; not dreaming, simple souls!
of the ingenious system of exchange established in
modern days; by which those who first leave a
party are authorized to choose the best shawl or hat
they can finda custom which has doubtless arisen
in consequence of our commercial habits. They
were carried home by their own carriages, that is
to say, by the vehicles nature had provided them,
excepting such of the wealthy, as could afford to
keep a waggon. The gentlemen gallantly attended
their fair ones to their respective abodes, and took
leave of them with a hearty smack at the door:
which as it was an established piece of etiquette,
done in perfect simplicity and honesty of heart,
occasioned
no scandal at that time, nor should it at
the presentif our great grandfathers approved of
the custom, it would argue a great want of
reverence
in their descendants to say a word against it.
CHAP IV.
Containing further particulars of the Golden Age,
and what constituted a fine Lady and Gentleman
in the days of Walter the Doubter
.
In this dulcet period of my history, when the
beauteous island of Mannahata presented a scene,
the very counterpart of those glowing pictures drawn
by old Hesiod of the golden reign of Saturn, there
was a happy ignorance, an honest simplicity
prevalent
among its inhabitants, which were I even able
to depict, would be but little understood by the
degenerate
age for which I am doomed to write.
Even the female sex, those arch innovaters upon the
tranquillity, the honesty, and grey-beard customs of
society, seemed for a while to conduct themselves
with incredible sobriety and comeliness, and indeed
behaved almost as if they had not been sent into the
world, to bother mankind, baffle philosophy, and
confound the universe.
Their hair untortured by the abominations of art,
was scrupulously pomatomed back from their
foreheads
with a candle, and covered with a little cap
of quilted calico, which fitted exactly to their heads.
Their petticoats of linsey woolsey, were striped with
a variety of gorgeous dyes, rivalling the many
coloured
robes of Iristhough I must confess these
gallant garments were rather short, scarce reaching
below the knee; but then they made up in the
number, which generally equalled that of the
gentlemen's
small clothes; and what is still more
praise-worthy
,
they were all of their own manufactureof
which circumstance, as may well be supposed, they
were not a little vain.
These were the honest days, in which every
woman staid at home, read the bible and wore
pocketsaye, and that too of a goodly size,
fashioned
with patch-work into many curious devices, and
ostentatiously worn on the outside. These in fact,
were convenient receptacles, where all good
house-wives
carefully stored away such things as they
wished to have at hand; by which means they often
came to be incredibly crammedand I remember
there was a story current when I was a boy, that
the lady of Wouter Van Twiller, having occasion
to empty her right pocket in search of a wooden
ladle, the contents filled three corn baskets, and the
utensil was at length discovered lying among some
rubbish in one cornerbut we must not give too
much faith to all these stories; the anecdotes of
these remote periods being very subject to
exaggeration
.
Beside these notable pockets, they likewise wore
scissars and pincushions suspended from their
girdles by red ribbands, or among the more opulent
and shewy classes, by brass and even silver chains
indubitable tokens of thrifty housewives and
industrious
spinsters. I cannot say much in vindication
of the shortness of the petticoats; it doubtless was
introduced for the purpose of giving the stockings
a chance to be seen, which were generally of blue
worsted with magnificent red clocksor perhaps
to display a well turned ankle, and a neat, though
serviceable foot; set off by a high-heel'd leathern
shoe, with a large and splendid silver buckle. Thus
we find, that the gentle sex in all ages, have shewn
the same disposition to infringe a little upon the
laws of decorum, in order to betray a lurking beauty,
or gratify an innocent love of finery.
From the sketch here given it will be seen, that
our good grandmothers differed considerably in
their ideas of a fine figure, from their scantily dressed
descendants of the present day. A fine lady, in
those times, waddled under more clothes even on
a fair summer's day, than would have clad the
whole bevy of a modern ball room. Nor were
they the less admired by the gentlemen in
consequence
thereof. On the contrary, the greatness of
a lover's passion seemed to encrease in proportion
to the magnitude of its objectand a voluminous
damsel, arrayed in a dozen of petticoats, was
declared
by a low-dutch sonnetteer of the province, to
be radiant as a sunflower, and luxuriant as a full
blown cabbage. Certain it is, that in those days,
the heart of a lover could not contain more than
one lady at a time; whereas the heart of a modern
gallant has often room enough to accommodate half
a dozenThe reason of which I conclude to be,
either that the hearts of the gentlemen have grown
larger, or the persons of the ladies smallerthis
however is a question for physiologists to determine.
But there was a secret charm in these petticoats,
which no doubt entered into the consideration of
the prudent gallant. The wardrobe of a lady was
in those days her only fortune; and she who had
a good stock of petticoats and stockings, was as
absolutely an heiress, as is a Kamschatka damsel
with a store of bear skins, or a Lapland belle with a
plenty of rein deer. The ladies therefore, were
very anxious to display these powerful attractions
to the greatest advantage; and the best rooms in
the house instead of being adorned with caricatures
of dame nature, in water colours and needle work,
were always hung round with abundance of
home-spun
garments; the manufacture and property of
the femalesa piece of laudable ostentation that
still prevails among the heiresses of our dutch
villages. Such were the beauteous belles of the
ancient city of New Amsterdam, rivalling in
prim
val
simplicity of manners, the renowned and
courtly dames, so loftily sung by Dan Homer
who tells us that the princess Nausicaa, washed the
family linen, and the fair Penelope wove her own
petticoats.
The gentlemen in fact, who figured in the circles
of the gay world in these ancient times, corresponded
in most particulars, with the beauteous damsels
whose smiles they were ambitious to deserve.
True it is, their merits would make but a very
inconsiderable
impression, upon the heart of a modern
fair; they neither drove in their curricles nor
sported
their tandems, for as yet those gaudy vehicles
were not even dreamt ofneither did they
distinguish
themselves by their brilliance at the table, and
their consequent rencoutres with watchmen, for our
forefathers were of too pacific a disposition to need
those guardians of the night, every soul throughout
the town being in full snore before nine o'clock.
Neither did they establish their claims by gentility
at the expense of their taylorsfor as yet those
offenders against the pockets of society, and the
tranquillity of all aspiring young gentlemen, were
unknown in New Amsterdam; every good
house-wife
made the clothes of her husband and family,
and even the goede vrouw of Van Twiller himself,
thought it no disparagement to cut out her husband's
linsey woolsey galligaskins.
Not but what there were some two or three
youngsters who manifested the first dawnings of
what is called fire and spirit. Who held all
labour
in contempt; skulked about docks and market
places; loitered in the sun shine; squandered what
little money they could procure at hustle cap and
VOL. I. P
chuck farthing, swore, boxed, fought cocks, and
raced their neighbours' horsesin short who
promised
to be the wonder, the talk and abomination of
the town, had not their stylish career been
unfortunately
cut short, by an affair of honour with a
whipping post.
Far other, however, was the truly fashionable
gentleman of those dayshis dress, which served
for both morning and evening, street and drawing
room, was a linsey woolsey coat, made perhaps by
the fair hands of the mistress of his affections, and
gallantly bedecked with abundance of large brass
buttons.Half a score of breeches heightened the
proportions of his figurehis shoes were
decorated
by enormous copper bucklesa low crowned
broad brimmed hat overshadowed his burley visage,
and his hair dangled down his back, in a prodigious
queue of eel skin.
Thus equipped, he would manfully sally forth
with pipe in mouth to besiege some fair damsel's
obdurate
heartnot such a pipe, good reader, as that
which Acis did sweetly tune in praise of his
Galatea
,
but one of true delft manufacture and furnished
with a charge of fragrant Cow-pen tobacco. With
this would he resolutely set himself down before
the fortress, and rarely failed in the process of time
to smoke the fair enemy into a surrender, upon
honourable terms.
Such was the happy reign of Wouter Van
Twiller, celebrated in many a long forgotten song
as the real golden age, the rest being nothing but
counterfeit copper-washed coin. In that delightful
period, a sweet and holy calm reigned over the
whole province. The Burgomaster smoked his
pipe in peacethe substantial solace of his
domestic
house, his well petticoated
yffrouw
, after her
daily cares were done, sat soberly at her door, with
arms crossed over her apron of snowy white,
without
being insulted by ribald street walkers or
vagabond
boysthose unlucky urchins, who do so infest
our streets, displaying under the roses of youth,
the thorns and briars of iniquity. Then it was that
the lover with ten breeches and the damsel with
petticoats of half a score indulged in all the
innocent
endearments of virtuous love, without fear
and without reproachfor what had that virtue to
fear, which was defended by a shield of good
linsey woolseys, equal at least to the seven bull
hides of the invincible Ajax.
Thrice happy, and never to be forgotten age!
when every thing was better than it has ever been
since, or ever will be againwhen Buttermilk
channel was quite dry at low waterwhen the
shad in the Hudson were all salmon, and when the
moon shone with a pure and resplendent whiteness,
instead of that melancholy yellow light, which is the
consequence of her sickening at the abominations
she every night witnesses in this degenerate city!
CHAP. V.
In which the reader is beguiled into a delectable walk,
which ends very differently from what it
commenced
.
In the year of our Lord, one thousand eight
hundred and four, on a fine afternoon, in the mellow
month of October, I took my customary walk upon
the battery, which is at once the pride and bulwark
of this ancient and impregnable city of New York.
I remember well the season, for it immediately
preceded
that remarkably cold winter, in which our
sagacious corporation, in a spasm of economical
philanthropy, pulled to pieces, at an expense of
several
hundred dollars, the wooden ramparts, which
had cost them several thousand; and distributed
the rotten fragments, which were worth
considerably
less than nothing, among the shivering poor of
the citynever, since the fall of the walls of
Jericho
,
or the heaven built battlements of Troy, had
there been known such a demolitionnor did it go
unpunished; five men, eleven old women and
nineteen
children, besides cats, dogs and negroes, were
blinded, in vain attempts to smoke themselves warm,
with this charitable substitute for firewood, and an
epidemic complaint of sore eyes was moreover
produced
,
which has since recurred every winter;
particularly
among those who undertake to burn rotten
logswho warm themselves with the charity of
othersor who use patent chimnies.
On the year and month just designated, did I
take my accustomed walk of meditation, on that
same battery, which, though at present, no battery,
furnishes the most delightful walk, and commands
the noblest prospect, in the whole known world.
The ground on which I trod was hallowed by
recollections
of the past, and as I slowly wandered
through the long alleys of poplars, which, like so
many birch brooms standing on end, diffused a
melancholy
and lugubrious shade, my imagination
drew a contrast between the surrounding scenery,
and what it was in the classic days of our
forefathers
.
Where the government house by name,
but the custom house by occupation, proudly
reared
its brick walls and wooden pillars; there whilome
stood the low but substantial, red tiled mansion of
the renowned Wouter Van Twiller. Around it
the mighty bulwarks of fort Amsterdam frowned
defiance to every absent foe; but, like many a
whiskered
warrior and gallant militia captain, confined
their martial deeds to frowns alonealas! those
threatening bulwarks had long since been sapped by
time, and like the walls of Carthage, presented no
traces to the enquiring eye of the antiquarian. The
mud breast works had long been levelled with the
P 2
earth, and their scite converted into the green lawns
and leafy alleys of the battery; where the gay
apprentice
sported his sunday coat, and the laborious
mechanic, relieved from the dirt and drudgery of
the week, poured his septennial tale of love into the
half averted ear of the sentimental chambermaid.
The capacious bay still presented the same
expansive
sheet of water, studded with islands, sprinkled
with fishing boats, and bounded by shores of
picturesque
beauty. But the dark forests which once
clothed these shores had been violated by the
savage hand of cultivation, and their tangled mazes,
and impracticable thickets, had degenerated into
teeming orchards and waving fields of grain. Even
Governors Island, once a smiling garden,
appertaining
to the sovereigns of the province, was now
covered with fortifications, inclosing a tremendous
block houseso that this once peaceful island
resembled
a fierce little warrior in a big cocked hat,
breathing gunpowder and defiance to the world!
For some time did I indulge in this pensive train
of thought; contrasting in sober sadness, the
present
day, with the hallowed years behind the
mountains
;
lamenting the melancholy progress of
improvement
,
and praising the zeal, with which our
worthy burghers endeavour to preserve the wrecks
of venerable customs, prejudices and errors, from
the overwhelming tide of modern innovation
when by degrees my ideas took a different turn,
and I insensibly awakened to an enjoyment of the
beauties around me.
It was one of those rich autumnal days which
heaven particularly bestows upon the beauteous
island of Mannahata and its vicinitynot a
floating
cloud obscured the azure firmamentthe sun,
rolling in glorious splendour through his
etherial
course, seemed to expand his honest dutch
countenance into an unusual expression of
benevolence
,
as he smiled his evening salutation upon a
city, which he delights to visit with his most
bounteous
beamsthe very winds seemed to hold in
their breaths in mute attention, lest they should
ruffle the tranquillity of the hourand the
waveless
bosom of the bay presented a polished mirror,
in which nature beheld herself and smiled!The
standard of our city, which, like a choice
handkerchief
,
is reserved for days of gala, hung motionless
on the flag staff, which forms the handle to a
gigantic
churn; and even the tremulous leaves of the
poplar and the aspen, which, like the tongues of the
immortal sex, are seldom still, now ceased to
vibrate
to the breath of heaven. Every thing seemed
to acquiesce in the profound repose of nature.
The formidable eighteen pounders slept in the
embrazures
of the wooden batteries, seemingly
gathering
fresh strength, to fight the battles of their
country
on the next fourth of Julythe solitary drum
on Governor's island forgot to call the garrison to
their
shovels
the evening gun had not yet sounded
its signal, for all the regular, well meaning poultry
throughout the country, to go to roost; and the
fleet of canoes, at anchor between Gibbet Island
and Communipaw, slumbered on their rakes, and
suffered the innocent oysters to lie for a while
unmolested
,
in the soft mud of their native banks!
My own feelings sympathized in the contagious
tranquillity, and I should infallibly have dozed
upon
one of those fragments of benches, which our
benevolent magistrates have provided for the
benefit
of convalescent loungers, had not the
extraordinary
inconvenience of the couch set all repose at
defiance.
In the midst of this soothing slumber of the soul,
my attention was attracted to a black speck, peering
above the western horizon, just in the rear of
Bergen
steeplegradually it augments and overhangs
the would-be cities of Jersey, Harsimus and
Hoboken
,
which, like three jockies, are starting cheek by
jowl on the career of existence, and jostling each
other at the commencement of the race. Now it
skirts the long shore of ancient Pavonia, spreading
its wide shadows from the high settlements at
Weehawk
quite to the lazaretto and quarentine, erected
by the sagacity of our police, for the embarrassment
of commercenow it climbs the serene vault of
heaven, cloud rolling over cloud, like successive
billows
,
shrouding the orb of day, darkening the vast
expanse, and bearing thunder and hail, and tempest
in its bosom. The earth seems agitated at the
confusion
of the heavensthe late waveless mirror is
lashed into furious waves, that roll their broken
surges in hollow murmurs to the shorethe oyster
boats that erst sported in the placid vicinity of
Gibbet
Island, now hurry affrighted to the shorethe
late dignified, unbending poplar, writhes and twists,
before the merciless blastdescending torrents of
drenching rain and sounding hail deluge the battery
walks, the gates are thronged by 'prentices, servant
maids and little Frenchmen, with their pocket
handkerchiefs over their hats, scampering from the
stormthe late beauteous prospect presents one
scene of anarchy and wild uproar, as though old
chaos had resumed his reign, and was hurling back
into one vast turmoil, the conflicting elements of
nature. Fancy to yourself, oh reader! the awful
combat sung by old Hesiod, of Jupiter, and the
Titansfancy to yourself the long rebellowing
artillery
of heaven, streaming at the heads of the
gigantic
sons of earth.In short, fancy to yourself
all that has ever been said or sung, of tempest, storm
and hurricaneand you will save me the trouble
of describing it.
Whether I fled from the fury of the storm, or
remained boldly at my post, as our gallant train
band captains, who march their soldiers through
the rain without flinching, are points which I leave
to the conjecture of the reader. It is possible he
may be a little perplexed also, to know the reason
why I introduced this most tremendous and
unheard
of tempest, to disturb the serenity of my
work. On this latter point I will gratuitously
instruct
his ignorance. The panorama view of the
battery was given, merely to gratify the reader with
a correct description of that celebrated place, and
the parts adjacentsecondly, the storm was played
off, partly to give a little bustle and life to this
tranquil part of my work, and to keep my drowsy
readers from falling asleepand partly to serve as
a preparation, or rather an overture, to the
tempestuous
times, that are about to assail the pacific
province of Nieuw Nederlandtand that over-hang
the slumbrous administration of the renowned
Wouter Van Twiller. It is thus the experienced
play-wright puts all the fiddles, the french horns,
the kettle drums and trumpets of his orchestra in
requisition, to usher in one of those horrible and
brimstone uproars, called Melodramesand it is
thus he discharges his thunder, his lightening, his
rosin and saltpetre, preparatory to the raising of a
ghost, or the murdering of a heroWe will now
proceed with our history.
Whatever Plato, Aristotle, Grotius, Puffendorf,
Sydney, Thomas Jefferson or Tom Paine may say
to the contrary, I insist that, as to nations, the old
maxim that honesty is the best policy, is a sheer
and ruinous mistake. It might have answered well
enough in the honest times when it was made; but
in these degenerate days, if a nation pretends to
rely merely upon the justice of its dealings, it will
fare something like an honest man among thieves,
who unless he has something more than his honest
to depend upon, stands but a poor chance of profiting
by his company. Such at least was the case with
the guileless government of the New Netherlands;
which, like a worthy unsuspicious old burgher,
quietly settled itself down into the city of New
Amsterdam
,
as into a snug elbow chairand fell into a
comfortable napwhile in the mean time its cunning
neighbours stepp'd in and picked its pockets. Thus
may we acribe the commencement of all the woes
of this great province, and its magnificent
metropolis
,
to the tranquil security, or to speak more
accurately, to the unfortunate honesty of its
government
.
But as I dislike to begin an important part
of my history, towards the end of a chapter; and
as my readers like myself must doubtless be
exceedingly
fatigued with the long walk we have
taken, and the tempest we have sustainedI hold
it meet we shut up the book, smoke a pipe and
having thus refreshed our spirits; take a fair start
in the next chapter.
CHAP. VI.
Faithfully describing the ingenious people of
Connecticut
and thereaboutsShewing moreover the
true meaning of liberty of conscience, and a
curious
device among these sturdy barbarians, to keep
up a harmony of intercourse and promote
population
.
That my readers may the more fully
comprehend
the extent of the calamity, at this very
moment
impending over the honest, unsuspecting
province
of Nieuw Nederlandts, and its dubious
Governor
,
it is necessary that I should give some account
of a horde of strange barbarians, bordering upon the
eastern frontier.
Now so it came to pass, that many years
previous
to the time of which we are treating, the sage
cabinet of England had adopted a certain national
creed, a kind of public walk of faith, or rather a
religious turnpike in which every loyal subject was
directed to travel to Ziontaking care to pay the
toll gatherers
by the way.
Albeit a certain shrewd race of men, being very
much given to indulge their own opinions, on all
manner of subjects (a propensity, exceedingly
obnoxious
to your free governments of Europe) did
most presumptuously dare to think for themselves
in matters of religion, exercising what they
considered
a natural and unextinguishable rightthe liberty
of conscience.
As however they possessed that ingenious habit
of mind which always thinks aloud; which in a
manner
rides cock-a-hoop on the tongue, and is forever
galloping into other people's ears, it naturally
followed
that their liberty of conscience likewise implied
liberty of speech
, which being freely indulged, soon
put the country in a hubbub, and aroused the pious
indignation of the vigilant fathers of the church.
The usual methods were adopted to reclaim
them, that in those days were considered so
efficacious
in bringing back stray sheep to the fold;
that is to say, they were coaxed, they were
admonished
,
they were menaced, they were buffeted
line upon line, precept upon precept, lash upon lash,
here a little and there a great deal, were
exhausted
without mercy, but without success; until at
length the worthy pastors of the church wearied out
by their unparalleled stubbornness, were driven in
the excess of their tender mercy, to adopt the
scripture text, and literally heaped live embers on
their heads.
Nothing however could subdue that invincible
spirit of independence which has ever distinguished
this singular race of people, so that rather than
submit
to such horrible tyranny, they one and all
embarked
VOL. I. Q
for the wilderness of America, where they
might enjoy unmolested, the inestimable luxury of
talking. No sooner did they land on this
loquacious
soil, than as if they had caught the disease
from the climate, they all lifted up their voices at
once, and for the space of one whole year, did keep
up such a joyful clamour, that we are told they
frightened every bird and beast out of the
neighbourhood
,
and so completely dumb-founded
certain
fish, which abound on their coast, that they
have been called
dumb-fish
ever since.
From this simple circumstance, unimportant
as it may seem, did first originate that renowned
privilege so loudly boasted of throughout this
countrywhich is so eloquently exercised in
news-papers
,
pamphlets, ward meetings, pot-house
committees
and congressional deliberationswhich
establishes
the right of talking without ideas and
without informationof misrepresenting public
affairs
;
of decrying public measuresof aspersing
great characters, and destroying little ones; in
short, that grand palladium of our country, the
liberty of speech;
or as it has been more vulgarly
denominatedthe
gift of the gab
.
The simple aborigenes of the land for a while
contemplated these strange folk in utter
astonishment
,
but discovering that they wielded harmless
though noisy weapons, and were a lively, ingenious,
good-humoured race of men, they became very
friendly and sociable, and gave them the name of
Yanokies
, which in the Mais-Tchusaeg (or
Massachusett
)
language signifies
silent men
a waggish
appellation, since shortened into the familiar epithet
of
Yankees
, which they retain unto the present
day.
True it is, and my fidelity as an historian will
not allow me to pass it over in silence, that the zeal
of these good people, to maintain their rights and
privileges unimpaired, did for a while betray them
into errors, which it is easier to pardon than
defend
.
Having served a regular apprenticeship in
the school of persecution, it behoved them to shew
that they had become proficients in the art. They
accordingly employed their leisure hours in
banishing
,
scourging or hanging, divers heretical papists,
quakers and anabaptists, for daring to abuse the
liberty of conscience;
which they now clearly
proved
to imply nothing more, than that every man
should think as he pleased in matters of religion
provided
he thought
right;
for otherwise it would
be giving a latitude to damnable heresies. Now as
they (the majority) were perfectly convinced that
they alone
thought right, it consequently followed,
that whoever thought different from them though
wrongand whoever thought wrong and
obstinately
persisted in not being convinced and converted,
was a flagrant violater of the inestimable liberty of
conscience, and a corrupt and infectious member of
the body politic, and deserved to be lopped off and
cast into the fire.
Now I'll warrant, there are hosts of my
readers
,
ready at once to lift up their hands and eyes,
with that virtuous indignation with which we
always
contemplate the faults and errors of our
neighbours, and to exclaim at these well meaning
but mistaken people, for inflicting on others the
injuries
they had suffered themselvesfor indulging
the preposterous idea of convincing the mind by
toasting the carcass, and establishing the doctrine
of charity and forbearance, by intolerant
persecution
.But
soft you, my very captious sirs! what
are we doing at this very day, and in this very
enlightened
nation, but acting upon the very same
principle, in our political controversies. Have we
not within but a few years released ourselves from
the shackles of a government, which cruelly denied
us the privilege of governing ourselves, and using
in full latitude that invaluable member, the tongue?
and are we not at this very moment striving our
best to tyrannise over the opinions, tie up the
tongues, or ruin the fortunes of one another? What
are our great political societies, but mere political
inquisitionsour pot-house committees, but little
tribunals of denunciationour news-papers but
mere whipping posts and pillories, where
unfortunate
individuals are pelted with rotten eggsand
our council of appointmentbut a grand
auto de f
,
where culprits are annually sacrificed for their
political
heresies?
Where then is the difference in principle
between
our measures and those you are so ready to
condemn among the people I am treating of? There
is none; the difference is merely circumstantial.
Thus we
denounce
, instead of banishingWe
libel
instead of scourgingwe
turn out of office
instead
of hangingand where they burnt an offender in
propria personwe either tar and feather or
burn
him in effigy
this political persecution being, some
how or other, the grand palladium of our liberties,
and an incontrovertible proof that this is
a free
country!
But notwithstanding the fervent zeal with which
this holy war was prosecuted against the whole race
of unbelievers, we do not find that the population of
this new colony was in any wise hindered thereby;
on the contrary they multiplied to a degree, which
would be incredible to any man unacquainted with
the marvellous fecundity of this growing country.
This amazing increase, may indeed be partly
ascribed to a singular custom prevalent among them,
and which was probably borrowed from the ancient
republic of Sparta; where we are told the young
ladies, either from being great romps and hoydens, or
else like many modern heroines, very fond of
meddling
with matters that did not appertain to their
sex, used frequently to engage with the men, in
Q 2
wrestling, and other athletic exercises of the
gymnasium
.
The custom to which I allude was
vulgarly
known by the name of
bundling
a
superstitious
rite observed by the young people of both
sexes, with which they usually terminated their
festivities
;
and which was kept up with religious
strictness, by the more bigoted and vulgar part
of the community. This ceremony was
likewise
,
in those primitive times considered as an
indispensible
preliminary to matrimony; their
courtships
commencing, where ours usually finishby
which means they acquired that intimate
acquaintance
with each others good qualities before
marriage
,
that has been pronounced by philosophers
the sure basis of a happy union. Thus early did
this cunning and ingenious people, display a
shrewdness
at making a bargain which has ever since
distinguished
themand a strict adherence to the good
old vulgar maxim about buying a pig in a poke.
To this sagacious custom, therefore, do I
chiefly
attribute the unparalleled increase of the yanokie
or yankee tribe; for it is a certain fact, well
authenticated
by court records and parish registers, that
wherever the practice of bundling prevailed, there
was an amazing number of sturdy brats
annually
born unto the state, without the license of
the law, or the benefit of clergy; and it is truly
astonishing
that the learned Malthus, in his treatise on
population, has entirely overlooked this singular
fact. Neither did the irregularity of their birth
operate in the least to their disparagement. On
the contrary they grew up a long sided, raw boned,
hardy race of whoreson whalers, wood cutters,
fishermen
and pedlars, and strapping corn-fed wenches;
who by their united efforts tended marvellously
towards
populating those notable tracts of country,
called Nantucket, Piscataway and Cape Cod.
CHAP. VII.
How these singular barbarians turned out to be
notorious squatters. How they built air castles,
and attempted to initiate the Nederlanders in
the mystery of bundling
.
In
the last chapter, my honest little reader, I
have given thee a faithful and unprejudiced account,
of the origin of that singular race of people,
inhabiting
the country eastward of the Nieuw Nederlandts;
but I have yet to mention certain peculiar habits
which rendered them exceedingly obnoxious to our
ever honoured dutch ancestors.
The most prominent of these was a certain
rambling propensity, with which, like the sons of
Ishmael, they seem to have been gifted by heaven,
and which continually goads them on, to shift their
residence from place to place, so that a Yankey
farmer is in a constant state of migration;
tarrying
occasionally here and there; clearing lands for
other people to enjoy, building houses for others to
inhabit, and in a manner may be considered the
wandering Arab of America.
His first thought, on coming to the years of
manhood, is to
settle
himself in the worldwhich
means nothing more nor less than to begin his
rambles
.
To this end he takes unto himself for a wife,
some dashing country heiress; that is to say, a
buxom rosy cheeked wench, passing rich in red
ribbands, glass beads and mock tortoise-shell combs,
with a white gown and morocco shoes for Sunday,
and deeply skilled in the mystery of making apple
sweetmeats, long sauce and pumpkin pie.
Having thus provided himself, like a true pedlar
with a heavy knapsack, wherewith to regale his
shoulders through the journey of life, he literally
sets out on the peregrination. His whole family,
household furniture and farming utensils are hoisted
into a covered cart; his own and his wife's
wardrobe
packed up in a firkinwhich done, he
shoulders his axe, takes staff in hand, whistles
yankee doodle and trudges off to the woods,
as confident of the protection of providence, and
relying as cheerfully upon his own resources, as did
ever a patriarch of yore, when he journeyed into a
strange country of the Gentiles. Having buried
himself in the wilderness, he builds himself a log
hut, clears away a cornfield and potatoe patch, and,
providence smiling upon his labours, is soon
surrounded
by a snug farm and some half a score of
flaxen headed urchins, who by their size, seem to
have sprung all at once out of the earth, like a crop
of toad-stools.
But it is not the nature of this most
indefatigable
of speculators, to rest contented with any state
of sublunary enjoyment
improvement
is his darling
passion, and having thus improved his lands the
next care is to provide a mansion worthy the
residence
of a land holder. A huge palace of pine
boards immediately springs up in the midst of the
wilderness, large enough for a parish church, and
furnished with windows of all dimensions, but so
rickety and flimsy withal, that every blast gives it
a fit of the ague.
By the time the outside of this mighty air
castle
is completed, either the funds or the zeal of our
adventurer are exhausted, so that he barely
manages
to half finish one room within, where the whole
family burrow togetherwhile the rest of the house
is devoted to the curing of pumpkins, or storing of
carrots and potatoes, and is decorated with fanciful
festoons of wilted peaches and dried apples. The
outside remaining unpainted, grows venerably black
with time: the family wardrobe is laid under
contribution
for old hats, petticoats and breeches to
stuff into the broken windows, while the four winds
of heaven keep up a whistling and howling about
this aerial palace, and play as many unruly
gambols
,
as they did of yore, in the cave of old Eolus.
The humble log hut, which whilome nestled
this
improving
family snugly within its narrow but
comfortable walls, stands hard by in ignominious
contrast, degraded into a cow house or pig stye;
and the whole scene reminds one forcibly of a
fable
,
which I am surprised has never been recorded,
of an aspiring snail who quit his humble habitation
which he filled with great respectability, to crawl
into the empty shell of a lobsterwhere he would
no doubt have resided with great style and
splendour
,
the envy and hate of all the pains-taking snails
of his neighbourhood, had he not accidentally
perished with cold, in one corner of his stupendous
mansion.
Being thus completely settled, and to use his
own words, to rights, one would imagine that
he would begin to enjoy the comforts of his
situation
,
to read newspapers, talk politics, neglect his
own business, and attend to the affairs of the nation,
like a useful and patriotic citizen; but now it is
that his wayward disposition begins again to operate.
He soon grows tired of a spot, where there is no
longer any room for improvementsells his farm,
air castle, petticoat windows and all, reloads his
cart, shoulders his axe, puts himself at the head of
his family, and wanders away in search of new
landsagain to fell treesagain to clear
cornfields
again
to build a shingle palace, and again to
sell off, and wander.
Such were the people of Connecticut, who
bordered
upon the eastern frontier of Nieuw
Nederlandts
,
and my readers may easily imagine what
obnoxious neighbors this light hearted but restless
tribe must have been to our tranquil progenitors.
If they cannot, I would ask them, if they have ever
known one of our regular, well organized,
antediluvian
dutch families, whom it hath pleased heaven
to afflict with the neighbourhood of a French
boarding
house. The honest old burgher cannot take
his afternoon's pipe, on the bench before his door,
but he is persecuted with the scraping of fiddles,
the chattering of women, and the squalling of
children
he
cannot sleep at night for the horrible
melodies
of some amateur, who chooses to serenade
the moon, and display his terrible proficiency in
execution
, by playing demisemiquavers in alt on the
clarionet, the hautboy, or some other soft toned
instrument
nor
can he leave the street door open,
but his house is defiled by the unsavoury visits of a
troop of pug dogs, who even sometimes carry their
loathsome ravages into the sanctum sanctorum, the
parlour!
If my readers have ever witnessed the sufferings
of such a family, so situated, they may form some
idea, how our worthy ancestors were distressed by
their mercurial neighbours of Connecticut.
Gangs of these marauders we are told,
penetrated
into the New Netherland settlements and
threw whole villages into consternation by their
unparalleled volubility and their intolerable
inquisitiveness
two
evil habits hitherto unknown in those
parts, or only known to be abhorred; for our
ancestors
were noted, as being men of truly spartan
taciturnity, and who neither knew nor cared aught
about any body's concerns but their own. Many
enormities were committed on the high ways, where
several unoffending burghers were brought to a
stand, and so tortured with questions and guesses,
that it was a miracle they escaped with their five
senses.
Great jealousy did they likewise stir up, by their
intermeddling and successes among the divine sex;
for being a race of brisk, likely, pleasant tongued
varlets, they soon seduced the light affections of
the simple damsels, from their honest but
ponderous
dutch gallants. Among other hideous customs
they attempted to introduce among them that of
bundling
, which the dutch lasses of the
Nederlandts
,
with that eager passion for novelty and
foreign
fashions, natural to their sex, seemed very
well inclined to follow, but that their mothers,
being
more experienced in the world, and better
acquainted
with men and things strenuously
discountenanced
all such outlandish innovations.
But what chiefly operated to embroil our
ancestors
with these strange folk, was an
unwarrantable
liberty which they occasionally took, of
entering
in hordes into the territories of the New
Netherlands, and settling themselves down, without
leave or licence, to
improve
the land, in the manner
I have before noticed. This unceremonious mode
of taking possession of
new land
was technically
termed
squatting
, and hence is derived the
appellation
VOL. I. R
of
squatters;
a name odious in the ears of all
great landholders, and which is given to those
enterprizing
worthies, who seize upon land first, and
take their chance to make good their title to it
afterwards.
All these grievances, and many others which
were constantly accumulating, tended to form that
dark and portentous cloud, which as I observed in
a former chapter, was slowly gathering over the
tranquil province of New Netherlands. The
pacific
cabinet of Van Twiller, however, as will be
perceived in the sequel, bore them all with a
magnanimity
that redounds to their immortal credit
becoming by passive endurance inured to this
increasing
mass of wrongs; like the sage old woman
of Ephesus, who by dint of carrying about a calf,
from the time it was born, continued to carry it
without difficulty, when it had grown to be an ox.
CHAP. VIII.
How the Fort Goed Hoop was fearfully
beleaguered
how
the renowned Wouter fell into a
profound
doubt, and how he finally evaporated
.
By
this time my readers must fully perceive,
what an arduous task I have undertaken
collecting
and collating with painful minuteness, the
chronicles
of past times, whose events almost defy the
powers of researchraking in a little kind of
Herculaneum
of history, which had lain nearly for
ages, buried under the rubbish of years, and almost
totally forgottenraking up the limbs and
fragments
of disjointed facts, and endeavouring to put
them scrupulously together, so as to restore them
to their original form and connectionnow lugging
forth the character of an almost forgotten hero, like
a mutilated statuenow decyphering a half defaced
inscription, and now lighting upon a mouldering
manuscript, which after painful study, scarce repays
the trouble of perusal.
In such case how much has the reader to depend
upon the honour and probity of his author, lest like
a cunning antiquarian, he either impose upon him
some spurious fabrication of his own, for a precious
relique from antiquityor else dress up the
dismembered
fragment, with such false trappings, that
it is scarcely possible to distinguish the truth from
the fiction with which it is enveloped. This is a
grievance which I have more than once had to
lament
,
in the course of my wearisome researches
among the works of my fellow historians; who have
strangely disguised and distorted the facts
respecting
this country; and particularly respecting the
great province of New Netherlands; as will be
perceived by any who will take the trouble to
compare
their romantic effusions, tricked out in the
meretricious gauds of fable, with this excellent
little
historyuniversally to be renowned for its
severe
simplicity and unerring truth.
I have had more vexations of the kind to
encounter
,
in those parts of my history which treat
of the transactions on the eastern border, than in
any other, in consequence of the troops of
historians
who have infested these quarters, and have
shewn the honest people of New Nederlandt no
mercy in their works. Among the rest, Mr.
Benjamin Trumbull arrogantly declares that the
Dutch were always mere intruders.Now to this
I shall make no other reply, than to proceed in the
steady narration of my history, which will contain
not only proofs that the Dutch had clear title and
possession in the fair valleys of the Connecticut,
and that they were wrongfully dispossessed
thereof
but
likewise that they have been scandalously
maltreated ever since, by the misrepresentations of
the crafty historians of New England. And in this
I shall be guided by a spirit of truth and
impartiality
,
and a regard to my immortal famefor I
would not wittingly dishonour my work by a single
falsehood, misrepresentation or prejudice, though
it should gain our forefathers the whole
country
of New England.
It was at an early period of the province, and
previous
to the arrival of the renowned Wouterthat
the cabinet of Nieuw Nederlandts purchased the
lands about the Connecticut, and established, for
their superintendance and protection, a fortified post
on the banks of the river, which was called Fort Goed
Hoop, and was situated hard by the present fair
city of Hartford. The command of this important
post, together with the rank, title, and appointments
of commissary, were given in charge to the gallant
Jacobus Van Curlet, or as some historians will have
it Van Curlisa most doughty soldier of that
stomachful
class of which we have such numbers on
parade
dayswho are famous for eating all they kill.
He was of a very soldierlike appearance, and would
have been an exceeding tall man, had his legs been
in proportion to his body; but the latter being long,
and the former uncommonly short, it gave him the
uncouth appearance of a tall man's body, mounted
upon a little man's legs. He made up for this
turnspit
construction of body by throwing his legs to
such an extent when he marched, that you would
R 2
have sworn he had on the identical seven league
boots of the farfamed Jack the giant killer; and so
astonishingly high did he tread on any great
military
occasion, that his soldiers were oft times
alarmed
,
lest the little man should trample himself under
foot.
But notwithstanding the erection of this fort,
and the appointment of this ugly little man of war
as a commander, the intrepid Yankees, continued
those daring interlopings which I have hinted at in
my last chapter; and taking advantage of the
character which the cabinet of Wouter Van
Twiller
soon acquired, for profound and phlegmatic
tranquillitydid audaciously invade the
territories
of the Nieuw Nederlandts, and
squat
themselves
down within the very jurisdiction of fort
Goed Hoop.
On beholding this outrage, the long bodied Van
Curlet proceeded as became a prompt and valiant
officer. He immediately protested against these
unwarrantable encroachments, in low dutch, by
way of inspiring more terror, and forthwith
dispatched
a copy of the protest to the governor at
New Amsterdam, together with a long and bitter
account of the aggressions of the enemy. This
done, he ordered his men, one and all to be of good
cheershut the gate of the fort, smoked three
pipes, went to bed and awaited the result with a
resolute and intrepid tranquillity, that greatly ani
mated his adherents, and no doubt struck sore
dismay
and affright into the hearts of the enemy.
Now it came to pass, that about this time, the
renowned Wouter Van Twiller, full of years and
honours, and council dinners, had reached that
period
of life and faculty which, according to the
great Gulliver, entitle a man to admission into
the ancient order of Struldbruggs. He employed
his time in smoking his turkish pipe, amid an
assemblage
of sages, equally enlightened, and nearly
as venerable as himself, and who for their silence,
their gravity, their wisdom, and their cautious
averseness to coming to any conclusion in business,
are only to be equalled by certain profound
corporations
which I have known in my time. Upon
reading the protest of the gallant Jacobus Van Curlet
therefore, his excellency fell straightway into one
of the deepest doubts that ever he was known to
encounter; his capacious head gradually drooped
on his chest,
[25]
[25]
Perplexed with vast affairs of state and town,
`His great head being overset, hangs down.
Telecides, on Pericles.
he closed his eyes and inclined his
ear to one side, as if listening with great attention to
the discussion that was going on in his belly;
which all who knew him, declared to be the huge
court-house, or council chamber of his thoughts;
forming to his head what the house of
representatives
does to the senate. An inarticulate sound,
very much resembling a snore, occasionally
escaped
himbut the nature of this internal cogitation,
was never known, as he never opened his lips on
the subject to man, woman or child. In the mean
time, the protest of Van Curlet laid quietly on the
table
,
where it served to light the pipes of the venerable
sages assembled in council; and in the great smoke
which they raised, the gallant Jacobus, his protest,
and his mighty Fort Goed Hoop, were soon as
completely beclouded and forgotten, as is a
question
of emergency swallowed up in the speeches
and resolutions of a modern session of congress.
There are certain emergencies when your
profound
legislators and sage deliberative councils, are
mightily in the way of a nation; and when an
ounce of hair-brained decision, is worth a pound of
sage doubt, and cautious discussion. Such at least
was the case at present; for while the renowned
Wouter Van Twiller was daily battling with his
doubts, and his resolution growing weaker and
weaker in the contest, the enemy pushed further
and further into his territories, and assumed a most
formidable appearance in the neighbourhood of
Fort Goed Hoop. Here they founded the mighty
town of
Pyquag
, or as it has since been called
Weathersfield
, a place which, if we may credit the
assertions of that worthy historian John Josselyn,
Gent. hath been infamous by reason of the witches
therein.And so daring did these men of Pyquag
become, that they extended those plantations of
onions, for which their town is illustrious, under
the very noses of the garrison of Fort Goed Hoop
insomuch that the honest dutchmen could not look
toward that quarter, without tears in their eyes.
This crying injustice was regarded with proper
indignation by the gallant Jacobus Van Curlet. He
absolutely trembled with the amazing violence of
his choler and the exacerbations of his valour;
which seemed to be the more turbulent in their
workings, from the length of the body, in which
they were agitated. He forthwith proceeded to
strengthen his redoubts, heighten his breastworks,
deepen his fosse, and fortify his position with a
double row of abbatis; after which valiant
precautions
,
he with unexampled intrepidity, dispatched a
fresh courier with tremendous accounts of his
perilous
situation. Never did the modern hero, who
immortalized himself at the second Sabine war,
shew greater valour in the art of letter writing, or
distinguish himself more gloriously upon paper,
than the heroic Van Curlet.
The courier chosen to bear these alarming
dispatches
,
was a fat, oily little man, as being least
liable to be worn out, or to lose leather on the
journey
;
and to insure his speed, he was mounted on
the fleetest waggon horse in the garrison; remarkable
for his length of limb, largeness of bone, and
hardness
of trot; and so tall, that the little messenger
was obliged to climb on his back by means of his
tail and crupper. Such extraordinary speed did he
make, that he arrived at Fort Amsterdam in little
less than a month, though the distance was full two
hundred pipes, or about 120 miles.
The extraordinary appearance of this portentous
stranger would have thrown the whole town of
New Amsterdam into a quandary, had the good
people troubled themselves about any thing more
than their domestic affairs. With an appearance
of great hurry and business, and smoking a short
travelling pipe, he proceeded on a long swing trot
through the muddy lanes of the metropolis,
demolishing
whole batches of dirt pies, which the little
dutch children were making in the road; and for
which kind of pastry the children of this city have
ever been famousOn arriving at the governor's
house he climbed down from his steed in great
trepidation
;
roused the grey headed door keeper, old Skaats
who like his lineal decendant, and faithful
representative
,
the venerable crier of our court, was nodding
at his postrattled at the door of the council
chamber
,
and startled the members as they were dozing
over a plan for establishing a public market.
At that very moment a gentle grunt, or rather a
deep drawn snore was heard from the chair of the
governor; a whiff of smoke was at the same instant
observed to escape from his lips, and a slight cloud
to ascend from the bowl of his pipe. The council
of course supposed him engaged in deep sleep for
the good of the community, and according to
custom
in all such cases established, every man bawled
out silence, in order to maintain tranquillity; when
of a sudden, the door flew open and the little
courier
straddled into the apartment, cased to the middle
in a pair of Hessian boots, which he had got into for
the sake of expedition. In his right hand he held forth
the ominous dispatches, and with his left he grasped
firmly the waist-band of his galligaskins; which
had unfortunately given way, in the exertion of
descending from his horse. He stumped
resolutely
up to the governor, and with more hurry than
perspicuity delivered his message. But
fortunately
his ill tidings came too late, to ruffle the
tranquillity
of this most tranquil of rulers. His
venerable
excellency had just breathed and smoked his
lasthis lungs and his pipe having been exhausted
together, and his peaceful soul, as Dan Homer
would have said, having escaped in the last whiff
that curled from his tobacco pipe.In a word the
renowned Wouter Van Twiller, alias Walter the
Doubter, who had so often slumbered with his
cotemporaries
,
now slept with his fathers, and
Wilhelmus
Kieft governed in his stead.
END OF BOOK III
BOOK IV.
Containing the Chronicles of the reign of William
the Testy.
CHAP. I.
Exposing the craftiness and artful devices of those
arch Free Booters, the Book Makers, and their
trusty Squires, the Book Sellers. Containing
furthermore, the universal acquirements of
William
the Testy, aud how a man may learn so
much as to render himself good for nothing
.
If
ever I had my readers completely by the
button
,
it is at this moment. Here is a redoubtable
fortress reduced to the greatest extremity; a valiant
commander in a state of the most imminent
jeopardy
and
a legion of implacable foes thronging upon
every side. The sentimental reader is preparing to
indulge his sympathies, and bewail the sufferings of
the brave. The philosophic reader, to come with
his first principles, and coolly take the dimensions
and ascertain the proportions of great actions, like
an antiquary, measuring a pyramid with a two-foot
rulewhile the mere reader, for amusement,
promises
to regale himself after the monotonous pages
through which he has dozed, with murders, rapes,
ravages, conflagrations, and all the other glorious
incidents, that give eclat to victory, and grace the
triumph of the conqueror.
Thus every reader must press forwardhe
cannot
refrain, if he has the least spark of curiosity in
his disposition, from turning over the ensuing page.
Having therefore gotten him fairly in my clutches
what hinders me from indulging in a little
recreation
,
and varying the dull task of narrative by
stultifying
my readers with a drove of sober reflections
about this, that and the other thingby pushing
forward a few of my own darling opinions; or
talking
a little about myselfall which the reader will
have to peruse, or else give up the book altogether,
and remain in utter ignorance of the mighty deeds,
and great events, that are contained in the sequel.
To let my readers into a great literary secret,
your experienced writers, who wish to instil
peculiar
tenets, either in religion, politics or morals, do
often resort to this expedientillustrating their
favourite
doctrines by pleasing fictions on established
facts---and so mingling historic truth, and subtle
speculation together, that the unwary million never
perceive the medley; but, running with open
mouth, after an interesting story, are often made to
swallow the most heterodox opinions, ridiculous
theories, and abominable heresies. This is
particularly
VOL. I. S
the case with the industrious advocates of
the modern philosophy, and many an honest
unsuspicious
reader, who devours their works under an
idea of acquiring solid knowledge, must not be
surprised
if, to use a pious quotation, he finds his
belly filled with the east wind.
This same expedient is likewise a literary artifice,
by which one sober truth, like a patient and laborious
pack horse, is made to carry a couple of
panniers
of rascally little conjectures on its back.
In this manner books are encreased, the pen is kept
going and trade flourishes; for if every writer were
obliged to tell merely what he knew, there would
soon be an end of great books, and Tom Thumb's
folio would be considered as a gigantic production
A man might then carry his library in his pocket, and
the whole race of book makers, book printers, book
binders and book sellers might starve together;
but by being entitled to tell every thing he thinks,
and every thing he does not thinkto talk about
every thing he knows, or does not knowto
conjecture
,
to doubt, to argue with himself, to laugh
with and laugh at his reader, (the latter of which
we writers do nine times out of tenin our sleeves)
to indulge in hypotheses, to deal in dashesand
stars **** and a thousand other innocent
indulgencies
all
these I say, do marvelously concur to
fill the pages of books, the pockets of booksellers,
and the hungry stomachs of authorsdo contribute
to the amusement and edification of the reader, and
redound to the glory, the encrease and the profit of
the craft!
Having thus, therefore, given my readers the
whole art and mystery of book making, they have
nothing further to do, than to take pen in hand, set
down and write a book for themselveswhile in
the mean time I will proceed with my history,
without claiming any of the privileges above
recited
.
Wilhelmus Kieft
who in 1634 ascended the
Gubernatorial
chair, (to borrow a favourite, though
clumsy appellation of modern phraseologists) was
in form, feature and character, the very reverse of
Wouter Van Twiller, his renowned predecessor.
He was of very respectable descent, his father being
Inspector of Windmills in the ancient town of
Saardam; and our hero we are told made very
curious investigations into the nature and operations
of these machines when a little boy, which is one
reason why he afterwards came to be so ingenious
a governor. His name according to the most
ingenious
etymologists was a corruption of
Kyver
,
that is to say a
wrangler
or
scolder
, and expressed
the hereditary disposition of his family; which for
nearly two centuries, had kept the windy town of
Saardam in hot water, and produced more tartars
and brimstones than any ten families in the place
and so truly did Wilhelmus Kieft inherit this family
endowment, that he had scarcely been a year in the
discharge of his government, before he was
universally
known by the appellation of
William the
Testy
.
He was a brisk, waspish, little old gentleman,
who had dried and wilted away, partly through the
natural process of years, and partly from being
parched and burnt up by his fiery soul; which
blazed like a vehement rush light in his bosom,
constantly inciting him to most valourous broils,
altercations and misadventures. I have heard it
observed by a profound and philosophical judge of
human nature, that if a woman waxes fat as she
grows old, the tenure of her life is very precarious,
but if haply she wilts, she lives foreversuch
likewise
was the case with William the Testy, who grew
tougher in proportion as he dried. He was some
such a little dutchman as we may now and then see,
stumping briskly about the streets of our city, in a
broad skirted coat, with buttons nearly as large as
the shield of Ajax, which makes such a figure in
Dan Homer, an old fashioned cocked hat stuck on
the back of his head, and a cane as high as his chin.
His visage was broad, but his features sharp, his
nose turned up with a most petulant curl; his
cheeks, like the region of Terra del Fuego, were
scorched into a dusky reddoubtless in
consequence
of the neighbourhood of two fierce little
grey eyes, through which his torrid soul beamed as
fervently, as a tropical sun blazing through a pair
of burning glasses. The corners of his mouth were
curiously modeled into a kind of fret work, not a
little resembling the wrinkled proboscis of an
irritable
pug dogin a word he was one of the
most positive, restless, ugly little men, that ever
put himself in a passion about nothing.
Such were the personal endowments of
William
the Testy, but it was the sterling riches of his
mind that raised him to dignity and power. In
his youth he had passed with great credit through a
celebrated academy at the Hague, noted for
producing
finished scholars, with a dispatch
unequalled
,
except by certain of our American colleges,
which seem to manufacture bachelors of arts, by
some patent machine. Here he skirmished very
smartly on the frontiers of several of the sciences,
and made such a gallant inroad into the dead
languages
,
as to bring off captive a host of Greek
nouns and Latin verbs, together with divers pithy
saws and apothegms, all which he constantly
paraded
in conversation and writing, with as much
vain glory as would a triumphant general of yore
display the spoils of the countries he had ravaged.
He had moreover puzzled himself considerably
with logic, in which he had advanced so far as to
attain a very familiar acquaintance, by name at
least, with the whole family of syllogisms and
dilemmas
;
but what he chiefly valued himself on,
S 2
was his knowledge of metaphysics, in which,
having
once upon a time ventured too deeply, he came
well nigh being smothered in a slough of
unintelligible
learninga fearful peril, from the effects of
which he never perfectly recovered.In plain
words, like many other profound intermeddlers in
this abstruse bewildering science, he so confused his
brain, with abstract speculations which he could not
comprehend, and artificial distinctions which he
could not realize, that he could never think clearly
on any subject however simple, through the whole
course of his life afterwards. This I must confess
was in some measure a misfortune, for he never
engaged in argument, of which he was exceeding
fond, but what between logical deductions and
metaphysical jargon, he soon involved himself and
his subject in a fog of contradictions and
perplexities
,
and then would get into a mighty passion with
his adversary, for not being convinced gratis.
It is in knowledge, as in swimming, he who
ostentatiously sports and flounders on the surface,
makes more noise and splashing, and attracts more
attention, than the industrious pearl diver, who
plunges in search of treasures to the bottom. The
universal acquirements of William Kieft, were
the subject of great marvel and admiration among
his countrymenhe figured about at the Hague
with as much vain glory, as does a profound Bonze
at Pekin, who has mastered half the letters of the
Chinese alphabet; and in a word was unanimously
pronounced an
universal genius!
I have known
many universal geniuses in my time, though to
speak my mind freely I never knew one, who, for
the ordinary purposes of life, was worth his weight
in strawbut for the purposes of government, a little
sound judgment and plain common sense, is worth
all the sparkling genius that ever wrote poetry, or
invented theories.
Strange as it may sound therefore, the
universal
acquirements
of the illustrious Wilhelmus, were
very much in his way, and had he been a less
learned
little man, it is possible he would have been a
much greater governor. He was exceedingly fond
of trying philosophical and political experiments;
and having stuffed his head full of scraps and
remnants
of ancient republics, and oligarchies, and
aristocracies
,
and monarchies, and the laws of Solon
and Lycurgus and Charondas, and the imaginary
commonwealth of Plato, and the Pandects of
Justinian
,
and a thousand other fragments of venerable
antiquity, he was forever bent upon introducing
some one or other of them into use; so that between
one contradictory measure and another, he
entangled
the government of the little province of Nieuw
Nederlandts in more knots during his
administration
,
than half a dozen successors could have untied.
No sooner had this bustling little man been
blown by a whiff of fortune into the seat of
government
,
than he called together his council and
delivered
a very animated speech on the affairs of the
province. As every body knows what a glorious
opportunity a governor, a president, or even an
emperor has, of drubbing his enemies in his
speeches, messages and bulletins, where he has the
talk all on his own side, they may be sure the high
mettled William Kieft did not suffer so favourable
an occasion to escape him, of evincing that
gallantry
of tongue, common to all able legislators.
Before
he commenced, it is recorded that he took out
of his pocket a red cotton handkerchief, and gave a
very sonorous blast of the nose, according to the
usual custom of great orators. This in general I
believe is intended as a signal trumpet, to call the
attention of the auditors, but with William the
testy it boasted a more classic cause, for he had
read of the singular expedient of that famous
demagogue
Caius Gracchus, who when he harangued
the Roman populace, modulated his tones by an
oratorical flute or pitch-pipewhich, said the
shrewd Wilhelmus, I take to be nothing more nor
less, than an elegant and figurative mode of saying
he previously blew his nose.
This preparatory symphony being performed,
he commenced by expressing a humble sense of his
own want of talents---his utter unworthiness of the
honour conferred upon him, and his humiliating
incapacity to discharge the important duties of his
new station---in short, he expressed so
contemptible
an opinion of himself, that many simple country
members present, ignorant that these were mere
words of course, always used on such occasions,
were very uneasy, and even felt wrath that he
should accept an office, for which he was
consciously
so inadequate.
He then proceeded in a manner highly classic,
profoundly erudite, and nothing at all to the purpose,
being nothing more than a pompous account of all
the governments of ancient Greece, and the wars of
Rome and Carthage, together with the rise and fall
of sundry outlandish empires, about which the
assembly
knew no more than their great grand
children
who were yet unborn. Thus having, after the
manner of your learned orators, convinced the
audience
that he was a man of many words and great
erudition, he at length came to the less important
part of his speech, the situation of the province---
and here he soon worked himself into a fearful rage
against the Yankees, whom he compared to the
Gauls who desolated Rome, and the Goths and
Vandals who overran the fairest plains of Europe
nor did he forget to mention, in terms of adequate
opprobrium, the insolence with which they had
encroached
upon the territories of New Netherlands,
and the unparalleled audacity with which they had
commenced the town of New Plymouth, and
planted
the onion patches of Weathersfield under the
very
walls, or rather mud batteries of Fort Goed Hoop.
Having thus artfully wrought up his tale of
terror
to a climax, he assumed a self satisfied look,
and declared, with a nod of knowing import, that
he had taken measures to put a final stop to these
encroachmentsthat he had been obliged to have
recourse to a dreadful engine of warfare, lately
invented
,
awful in its effects, but authorized by
direful
necessity. In a word, he was resolved to
conquer
the Yankees---by proclamation!
For this purpose he had prepared a tremendous
instrument of the kind ordering, commanding and
enjoining the intruders aforesaid, forthwith to
remove
,
depart and withdraw from the districts,
regions
and territories aforesaid, under pain of
suffering
all the penalties, forfeitures, and punishments
in such case made and provided, &c. This
proclamation
he assured them, would at once exterminate
the enemy from the face of the country, and he
pledged his valour as a governor, that within two
months after it was published, not one stone should
remain on another, in any of the towns which they
had built.
The council remained for some time silent,
after
he had finished; whether struck dumb with
admiration
at the brilliancy of his project, or put to
sleep by the length of his harangue, the history of
the times doth not mention. Suffice it to say, they at
length gave a universal grunt of acquiescencethe
proclamation was immediately dispatched with due
ceremony, having the great seal of the province,
which was about the size of a buckwheat pancake,
attached to it by a broad red ribband. Governor
Kieft having thus vented his indignation, felt
greatly
relieved---adjourned the council
sine die
put on
his cocked hat and corduroy small clothes, and
mounting a tall raw boned charger, trotted out to
his country seat, which was situated in a sweet,
sequestered
swamp, now called Dutch street, but more
commonly known by the name of Dog's Misery.
Here, like the good Numa, he reposed from
the toils of legislation, taking lessons in
government
,
not from the Nymph Egeria, but from the
honoured wife of his bosom; who was one of that
peculiar kind of females, sent upon earth a little
after the flood, as a punishment for the sins of
mankind, and commonly known by the appellation
of
knowing women
. In fact, my duty as an
historian
obliges me to make known a circumstance
which was a great secret at the time, and
consequently
was not a subject of scandal at more than
half the tea tables in New Amsterdam, but which
like many other great secrets, has leaked out in
the lapse of yearsand this was, that the great
Wilhelmus the Testy, though one of the most
potent
little men that ever breathed, yet submitted at
at home to a species of government, neither laid
down in Aristotle, nor Plato; in short, it partook of
the nature of a pure, unmixed tyranny, and is
familarly denominated
petticoat government
.An
absolute sway, which though exceedingly common
in these modern days, was very rare among the
ancients, if we may judge from the rout made
about the domestic economy of honest Socrates;
which is the only ancient case on record.
The great Kieft however, warded off all the
sneers and sarcasms of his particular friends, who
are ever ready to joke with a man on sore points
of the kind, by alledging that it was a government
of his own election, which he submitted to through
choice; adding at the same time that it was a
profound
maxim which he had found in an ancient
author
he
who would aspire to
govern
, should first
learn to
obey
.
CHAP. II.
In which are recorded the sage Projects of a Ruler
of universal Genius.The art of Fighting by
Proclamation,and how that the valiant
Jacobus
Van Curlet came to be foully dishonoured at
Fort Goed Hoop
.
Never
was a more comprehensive, a more
expeditious
,
or, what is still better, a more
economical
measure devised, than this of defeating the
Yankees by proclamationan expedient, likewise,
so humane, so gentle and pacific; there were ten
chances to one in favour of its succeeding,but
then there was one chance to ten that it would not
succeedas the ill-natured fates would have it,
that single chance carried the day! The
proclamation
was perfect in all its parts, well constructed,
well written, well sealed and well publishedall
that was wanting to insure its effect, was that the
Yankees should stand in awe of it; but,
provoking
to relate, they treated it with the most
absolute
contempt, applied it to an unseemly purpose,
which shall be nameless, and thus did the first
war-like
proclamation come to a shameful enda fate
which I am credibly informed, has befallen but too
many of its successors.
VOL. I. T
It was a long time before Wilhelmus Kieft could
be persuaded by the united efforts of all his
counsellors
,
that his war measure had failed in producing
any effect.On the contrary, he flew in a passion
whenever any one dared to question its efficacy;
and swore, that though it was slow in operating, yet
when once it began to work, it would soon purge
the land from these rapacious intruders. Time
however, that tester of all experiments both in
philosophy
and politics, at length convinced the great
Kieft, that his proclamation was abortive; and that
notwithstanding he had waited nearly four years, in
a state of constant irritation, yet he was still further
off than ever from the object of his wishes. His
implacable adversaries in the east became more
and more troublesome in their encroachments, and
founded the thriving colony of Hartford close upon
the skirts of Fort Goed Hoop. They moreover
commenced
the fair settlement of Newhaven (alias the
Red Hills) within the domains of their high
mightinesses
while
the onion patches of Pyquag were
a continual eye sore to the garrison of Van Curlet.
Upon beholding therefore the inefficacy of his
measure
,
the sage Kieft like many a worthy practitioner
of physic, laid the blame, not to the medicine, but
the quantity administered, and resolutely resolved
to double the dose.
In the year 1638 therefore, that being the fourth
year of his reign, he fulminated against them a
second
proclamation, of heavier metal than the
former
;
written in thundering long sentences, not one
word of which was under five syllables. This, in
fact, was a kind of non-intercourse bill, forbidding
and prohibiting all commerce and connexion,
between
any and every of the said Yankee intruders,
and the said fortified post of Fort Goed Hoop, and
ordering, commanding and advising, all his trusty,
loyal and well-beloved subjects, to furnish them
with no supplies of gin, gingerbread or sour crout;
to buy none of their pacing horses, meazly pork,
apple brandy, Yankee rum, cyder water, apple
sweetmeats, Weathersfield onions or wooden bowls,
but to starve and exterminate them from the face of
the land.
Another pause of a twelve month ensued,
during
which the last proclamation received the same
attention, and experienced the same fate as the
firstat the end of which term, the gallant Jacobus
Van Curlet dispatched his annual messenger, with
his customary budget of complaints and entreaties.
Whether the regular interval of a year, intervening
between the arrival of Van Curlet's couriers, was
occasioned by the systematic regularity of his
movements, or by the immense distance at which
he was stationed from the seat of government is a
matter of uncertainty. Some have ascribed it to
the slowness of his messengers, who, as I have
before
noticed, were chosen from the shortest and
fattest
of his garrison, as least likely to be worn out
on the road; and who, being pursy, short winded
little men, generally travelled fifteen miles a day,
and then laid by a whole week, to rest. All
these, however, are matters of conjecture; and I
rather think it may be ascribed to the immemorial
maxim of this worthy countryand which has ever
influenced all its public transactionsnot to do
things in a hurry.
The gallant Jacobus Van Curlet in his
dispatches
respectfully represented, that several years had
now elapsed, since his first application to his late
excellency, the renowned Wouter Van Twiller:
during which interval, his garrison had been
reduced
nearly one-eighth, by the death of two of his
most valiant, and corpulent soldiers, who had
accidentally
over eaten themselves on some fat salmon,
caught in the Varsche rivier. He further stated
that the enemy persisted in their inroads, taking no
notice of the fort or its inhabitants; but squatting
themselves down, and forming settlements all
around it; so that, in a little while, he should find
himself enclosed and blockaded by the enemy, and
totally at their mercy.
But among the most atrocious of his
grievances
,
I find the following still on record, which may
serve to shew the bloody minded outrages of these
savage intruders. In the meane time, they of
Hartford have not onely usurped and taken in the
lands of Connecticott, although unrighteously and
against the lawes of nations, but have hindered our
nation in sowing theire owne purchased broken up
lands, but have also sowed them with corne in the
night, which the Netherlanders had broken up and
intended to sowe: and have beaten the servants of
the high and mighty the honored companie, which
were labouring upon theire master's lands, from
theire lands, with sticks and plow staves in hostile
manner laming, and amongst the rest, struck Ever
Duckings
[26]
[26]
This name is no doubt misspelt. In some old Dutch MSS.
of the time, we find the name of Evert Duyckingh, who is
unquestionably
the unfortunate hero above alluded to.
a hole in his head, with a stick, soe that
the blood ran downe very strongly downe upon his
body!
But what is still more atrocious
Those of Hartford sold a hogg, that belonged
to the honored companie, under pretence that it had
eaten of theire grounde grass, when they had not
any foot of inheritance. They proferred the hogg
for
5s
. if the commissioners would have given
5s
.
for damage; which the commissioners denied,
because
noe mans owne hogg (as men use to say) can
trespasse upon his owne master's grounde.
Haz. Col. Stat. Pass.
The receipt of this melancholy intelligence
incensed
the whole communitythere was something
in it that spoke to the dull comprehension, and
T 2
touched the obtuse feelings even of the puissant
vulgar, who generally require a kick in the rear, to
awaken their slumbering dignity. I have known
my profound fellow citizens bear without murmur,
a thousand essential infringements of their rights,
merely because they were not immediately obvious
to their sensesbut the moment the unlucky Pearce
was shot upon our coasts, the whole body politic
was in a fermentso the enlighted Nederlanders,
though they had treated the encroachments of their
eastern neighbours with but little regard, and left
their quill valiant governor, to bear the whole brunt
of war, with his single penyet now every
individual
felt his head broken in the broken head of
Duckingsand the unhappy fate of their fellow
citizen the hog; being impressed, carried and sold
into captivity, awakened a grunt of sympathy from
every bosom.
The governor and council, goaded by the
clamours of the multitude, now set themselves
earnestly
to deliberate upon what was to be done.
Proclamations had at length fallen into temporary
disrepute; some were for sending the Yankees a
tribute, as we make peace offerings to the petty
Barbary powers, or as the Indians sacrifice to
the devil. Others were for buying them out,
but this was opposed, as it would be acknowledging
their title to the land they had seized. A variety
of measures were, as usual in such cases, proposed,
discussed and abandoned, and the council had at
last, to adopt the means, which being the most
common and obvious, had been knowingly
over-looked
for
your amazing acute politicians, are
forever looking through telescopes, which only
enable them to see such objects as are far off, and
unattainable; but which incapacitates them to see
such things as are in their reach, and obvious to all
simple folk, who are content to look with the naked
eyes, heaven has given them. The profound council,
as I have said, in their pursuit after Jack-o'-lanterns,
accidentally stumbled on the very measure they
were in need of; which was to raise a body of
troops, and dispatch them to the relief and
reinforcement
of the garrison. This measure was
carried into such prompt operation, that in less
than twelve months, the whole expedition,
consisting
of a serjeant and twelve men, was ready to
march; and was reviewed for that purpose, in the
public square, now known by the name of the
Bowling
Green. Just at this juncture the whole
community
was thrown into consternation, by the sudden
arrival of the gallant Jacobus Van Curlet; who
came straggling into town at the head of his crew
of tatterdemalions, and bringing the melancholy
tidings of his own defeat, and the capture of the
redoubtable post of Fort Goed Hope by the
ferocious
Yankees.
The fate of this important fortress, is an
impressive
warning to all military commanders. It was
neither carried by strom, nor famine; no practicable
breach was effected by cannon or mines; no
magazines
were blown up by red hot shot, nor were the
barracks demolished, or the garrison destroyed, by
the bursting of bombshells. In fact, the place was
taken by a stratagem no less singular than effectual;
and one that can never fail of success, whenever
an opportunity occurs of putting it in practice.
Happy am I to add, for the credit of our illustrious
ancestors, that it was a stratagem, which though it
impeached the vigilance, yet left the bravery of the
intrepid Van Curlet and his garrison, perfectly free
from reproach.
It appears that the crafty Yankees, having
learned
the regular habits of the garrison, watched a
favourable opportunity and silently introduced
themselves into the fort, about the middle of a
sultry day; when its vigilant defenders having
gorged themselves with a hearty dinner and
smoaked
out their pipes, were one and all snoring most
obstreperously at their posts; little dreaming of so
disasterous an occurrence. The enemy most
inhumanly
seized Jacobus Van Curlet, and his sturdy
myrmidons by the nape of the neck, gallanted them
to the gate of the fort, and dismissed them severally,
with a kick on the crupper, as Charles the twelfth
dismissed the heavy bottomed Russians, after the
battle of Narvaonly taking care to give two kicks
to Van Curlet, as a signal mark of distinction.
A strong garrison was immediately established
in the fort; consisting of twenty long sided, hard
fisted Yankees; with Weathersfield onions stuck
in their hats, by way of cockades and feathers
long rusty fowling pieces for musketshasty
pudding
,
dumb fish, pork and molasses for stores; and
a huge pumpkin was hoisted on the end of a pole,
as a standardliberty caps not having as yet come
into fashion.
CHAP. III.
Containing the fearful wrath of William the Testy,
and the great dolour of the New
Amsterdammers
,
because of the affair of Fort Goed Hoop.
And moreover how William the Testy fortified
the city by a Trumpetera Flagstaff, and a
Wind-mill.Together with the exploits of Stoffel
Brinkerhoff
.
Language
cannot express the prodigious fury,
into which the testy Wilhelmus Kieft was thrown
by this provoking intelligence. For three good
hours the rage of the little man was too great for
words, or rather the words were too great for him;
and he was nearly choaked by some dozen huge,
mis-shapen, nine cornered dutch oaths, that
crowded
all at once into his gullet. A few hearty thumps
on the back, fortunately rescued him from
suffocation
and
shook out of him a bushel or two of
enormous execrations, not one of which was smaller
than dunder and blixum!It was a matter of
astonishment to all the bye standers, how so small
a body, could have contained such an immense
mass of words without bursting. Having blazed
off the first broadside, he kept up a constant firing
for three whole daysanathematizing the
Yankees
,
man, woman, and child, body and soul, for a
set of dieven, schobbejaken, deugenieten,
twist-zoekeren
,
loozen-schalken blaes-kaeken,
kakken-bedden
,
and a thousand other names of which,
unfortunately for posterity, history does not make
particular mention. Finally he swore that he
would have nothing more to do with such a
squatting, bundling, guessing, questioning,
swapping
,
pumpkin-eating, molasses-daubing,
shingle-splitting
,
cider-watering, horse-jockeying,
notion-peddling
crewthat they might stay at Fort Goed
Hoop and rot, before he would dirty his hands by
attempting to drive them away; in proof of which
he ordered the new raised troops, to be marched
forthwith into winter quarters, although it was not
as yet quite mid summer. Governor Kieft
faithfully
kept his word, and his adversaries as
faithfully
kept their post; and thus the glorious river
Connecticut, and all the gay vallies through which it
rolls, together with the salmon, shad and other fish
within its waters, fell into the hands of the
victorious
Yankees, by whom they are held at this very
dayand much good may they do them.
Great despondency seized upon the city of New
Amsterdam, in consequence of these melancholly
events. The name of Yankee became as terrible
among our good ancestors, as was that of Gaul
among the ancient Romans; and all the sage old
women of the province, who had not read Miss
Hamilton on education, used it as a bug-bear,
wherewith to frighten their unruly brats into
obedience
.
The eyes of all the province were now turned
upon their governor, to know what he would do
for the protection of the common weal in these
days of darkness and peril. Great apprehensions
prevailed among the reflecting part of the
community
,
especially the old women, that these terrible
fellows of Connecticut, not content with the
conquest
of Fort Goed Hoop would incontinently march
on to New Amsterdam and take it by stormand
as these old ladies, through means of the governor's
spouse, who as has been already hinted, was the
better horse, had obtained considerable influence
in public affairs, keeping the province under a kind
of petticoat government, it was determined that
measures should be taken for the effective
fortification
of the city.
Now it happened that at this time there sojourned
in New Amsterdam one Anthony Van Corlear
[27]
[27]
David Pietrez
De Vries
in his Reyze naer Nieuw Nederlandt
nder het yaer 1640, makes mention of one
Corlear
a trumpeter in
fort Amsterdam, who gave name to Corlear's Hook and who was
doubtless this same champion, described by Mr. Knickerbocker.
a
jolly fat dutch trumpeter, of a pleasant burley
visage
famous
for his long wind and his huge
whiskers, and who as the story goes, could twang
so potently upon his instrument, as to produce an
effect upon all within hearing, as though ten
thousand
bag-pipes were singing most lustly i' the nose.
Him did the illustrious Kieft pick out as the man
of all the world, most fitted to be the champion of
New Amsterdam, and to garrison its fort; making
little doubt but that his instrument would be as
effectual
and offensive in war as was that of the
Paladin
Astolpho, or the more classic horn of Alecto.
It would have done one's heart good to have seen
the governor snapping his fingers and fidgetting
with delight, while his sturdy trumpeter strutted
up and down the ramparts, fearlessly twanging his
trumpet in the face of the whole world, like a thrice
valorous editor daringly insulting all the
principalities
and powerson the other side of the
Atlantic
.
Nor was he content with thus strongly
garrisoning
the fort, but he likewise added exceedingly to
its strength by furnishing it with a formidable
battery
of quaker gunsrearing a stupendous flag-staff
in the centre which overtopped the whole cityand
moreover by building a great windmill on one of
the bastions.
[28]
[28]
De Vries mentions that this windmill stood on the south-east
bastion, and it is likewise to be seen, together with the flag-staff, in
Justus Danker's View of New Amsterdam, which I have taken
the liberty of prefixing to Mr. Knickerbocker's history.
Editor
.
This last to be sure, was somewhat
of a novelty in the art of fortification, but as I have
VOL. I. U
already observed William Kieft was notorious for
innovations and experiments, and traditions do
affirm
that he was much given to mechanical
inventions
constructing
patent smoke-jackscarts that
went before the horses, and especially erecting
wind-mills
,
for which machines he had acquired a
singular
predilection in his native town of Saardam.
All these scientific vagaries of the little governor
were cried up with ecstasy by his adherents as proofs
of his universal geniusbut there were not wanting
ill natured grumblers who railed at him as
employing
his mind in frivolous pursuits, and devoting that
time to smoke-jacks and windmills, which should
have been occupied in the more important concerns
of the province. Nay they even went so far as to
hint once or twice, that his head was turned by his
experiments, and that he really thought to manage
his government, as he did his millsby mere wind!
such is the illiberality and slander to which your
enlightened rulers are ever subject.
Notwithstanding all the measures therefore of
William the Testy to place the city in a posture of
defence, the inhabitants continued in great alarm
and despondency. But fortune, who seems always
careful, in the very nick of time, to throw a bone
for hope to gnaw upon, that the starveling elf may
be kept alive; did about this time crown the arms
of the province with success in another quarter, and
thus cheered the drooping hearts of the forlorn
Nederlanders
;
otherwise there is no knowing to what
lengths they might have gone in the excess of their
sorrowingfor grief, says the profound
historian
of the seven champions of Christendom, is
companion with despair, and despair a procurer of
infamous death!
Among the numerous inroads of the
Moss-troopers
of Connecticut, which for some time past
had occasioned such great tribulation, I should
particularly
have mentioned a settlement made on the
eastern part of Long Island, at a place which, from
the peculiar excellence of its shell fish, was called
Oyster Bay. This was attacking the province in a
most sensible part, and occasioned a great agitation
at New Amsterdam.
It is an incontrovertible fact, well known to
your skilful physiologists, that the high road to the
affections, is through the throat; and this may be
accounted for on the same principles which I have
already quoted, in my strictures on fat aldermen.
Nor is this fact unknown to the world at large;
and hence do we observe, that the surest way to
gain the hearts of the million, is to feed them well
and that a man is never so disposed to flatter, to
please and serve another, as when he is feeding at
his expense; which is one reason why your rich
men, who give frequent dinners, have such
abundance
of sincere and faithful friends. It is on this
principle that our knowing leaders of parties secure
the affections of their partizans, by rewarding them
bountifully with loaves and fishes; and entrap the
suffrages of the greasy mob, by treating them with
bull feasts and roasted oxen. I have known many
a man, in this same city, acquire considerable
importance
in society, and usurp a large share of the
good will of his enlightened fellow citizens, when
the only thing that could be said in his eulogium
was, that he gave a good dinner, and kept
excellent
wine.
Since then the heart and the stomach are so
nearly allied, it follows conclusively that what
affects
the one, must sympathetically affect the other.
Now it is an equally incontrovertible fact, that of
all offerings to the stomach, there is none more
grateful than the testaceous marine animal, called
by naturalists the Ostea, but known commonly by
the vulgar name of Oyster. And in such great
reverence has it ever been held, by my
gormandizing
fellow citizens, that temples have been
dedicated
to it, time out of mind, in every street, lane and
alley throughout this well fed city. It is not to be
expected therefore, that the seizing of Oyster Bay,
a place abounding with their favourite delicacy,
would be tolerated by the inhabitants of New
Amsterdam
.
An attack upon their honour they might
have pardoned; even the massacre of a few
citizens
might have been passed over in silence; but
an outrage that affected the larders of the great
city of New Amsterdam, and threatened the
stomachs
of its corpulent Burgomasters, was too
serious
to pass unrevenged. The whole council were
unanimous in opinion, that the intruders should be
immediately driven by force of arms, from Oyster
Bay, and its vicinity, and a detachment was
accordingly
dispatched for the purpose, under command
of one Stoffel Brinkerhoff, or Brinkerhoofd (
i. e.
Stoffel, the head-breaker) so called because he was
a man of mighty deeds, famous throughout the
whole extent of Nieuw Nederlandts for his skill at
quarterstaff, and for size would have been a match
for Colbrand, that famous Danish champion, slain
by little Guy of Warwick.
Stoffel Brinckerhoff was a man of few words,
but prompt actionsone of your straight going
officers, who march directly forward, and do their
orders without making any parade about it. He
used no extraordinary speed in his movements, but
trudged steadily on, through Nineveh and Babylon,
and Jericho and Patchog, and the mighty town of
Quag, and various other renowned cities of yore,
which have by some unaccountable witchcraft of
the Yankees, been strangely transplanted to Long
Island, until he arrived in the neighbourhood of
Oyster Bay.
Here was he encountered by a tumultuous host
of valiant warriors, headed by Preserved Fish,
and Habbakuk Nutter, and Return Strong, and
Zerubbabel Fisk, and Jonathan Doolittle and
Determined
Cock!at the sound of whose names the
courageous Stoffel verily believed that the whole
U 2
parliament of Praise God Barebones had been let
loose to discomfit him. Finding however that this
formidable body was composed merely of the
select
men of the settlement, armed with no other
weapons but their tongues, and that they had issued
forth with no other intent, than to meet him on the
field of argumenthe succeeded in putting them
to the rout with little difficulty, and completely
broke up their settlement. Without waiting to write
an account of his victory on the spot, and thus letting
the enemy slip through his fingers while he was
securing his own laurels, as a more experienced
general would have done, the brave Stoffel thought
of nothing but completing his enterprize, and utterly
driving the Yankees from the island. This hardy
enterprize he performed in much the same manner
as he had been accustomed to drive his oxen; for
as the Yankees fled before him, he pulled up his
breeches and trudged steadily after them, and would
infallibly have driven them into the sea, had they
not begged for quarter, and agreed to pay tribute.
The news of this achievement was a seasonable
restorative to the spirits of the citizens of New
Amsterdam. To gratify them still more, the
governor
resolved to astonish them with one of those
gorgeous spectacles, known in the days of classic
antiquity, a full account of which had been flogged
into his memory, when a school-boy at the Hague.
A grand triumph therefore was decreed to Stoffel
Brinckerhoff, who made his triumphant entrance
into town riding on a Naraganset pacer; five
pumpkins
,
which like Roman eagles had served the
enemy for standards, were carried before himten
cart loads of oysters, five hundred bushels of
Weathersfield
onions, a hundred quintals of codfish, two
hogsheads of molasses and various other treasures,
were exhibited as the spoils and tribute of the
Yankees; while three notorious counterfeiters of
Manhattan notes,
[29]
[29]
This is one of those trivial anachronisms, that now and then
occur in the course of this otherwise authentic history. How
could Manhattan notes be counterfeited, when as yet Banks were
unknown in this countryand our simple progenitors had not even
dreamt of those inexhaustible mines of
paper opulence. Print. Dev.
were led captive to grace the
hero's triumph. The procession was enlivened by
martial music, from the trumpet of Antony Van
Corlear the champion, accompanied by a select band
of boys and negroes, performing on the national
instruments
of rattle bones and clam shells. The
citizens devoured the spoils in sheer gladness of
heartevery man did honour to the conqueror, by
getting devoutly drunk on New England rumand
learned Wilhelmus Kieft calling to mind, in a
momentary
fit of enthusiasm and generosity, that it was
customary among the ancients to honour their
victorious
generals with public statues, passed a
gracious
decree, by which every tavernkeeper was
permitted to paint the head of the intrepid Stoffel
on his sign!
CHAP. IV.
Philosophical reflections on the folly of being happy
in time of prosperity.Sundry troubles on the
southern Frontiers.How William the Testy
by his great learning had well nigh ruined the
province through a Cabalistic word.As also
the secret expeditions of Jan Jansen
Alpenden
,
and his astonishing reward
.
If we could but get a peep at the tally of dame
Fortune, where, like a notable landlady, she
regularly
chalks up the debtor and creditor accounts of
mankind, we should find that, upon the whole, good
and evil are pretty nearly balanced in this world;
and that though we may for a long while revel in
the very lap of prosperity, the time will at length
come, when we must ruefully pay off the
reckoning
.
Fortune, in fact, is a pestilent shrew, and
withal a most inexorable creditor; for though she
may indulge her favourites in long credits, and
overwhelm them with her favours; yet sooner or
later, she brings up her arrears, with the rigour of
an experienced publican, and washes out her scores
with their tears. Since, says good old Btius
in his consolations of philosophy, since no man
can retain her at his pleasure, and since her flight
is so deeply lamented, what are her favours but
sure prognostications of approaching trouble and
calamity.
There is nothing that more moves my
contempt
at the stupidity and want of reflection in my
fellow men, than to behold them rejoicing, and
indulging
in security and self confidence, in times of
prosperity. To a wise man, who is blessed with
the light of reason, those are the very moments of
anxiety and apprehension; well knowing that
according
to the system of things, happiness is at
best but transientand that the higher a man is
elevated
by the capricious breath of fortune, the lower
must be his proportionate depression. Whereas,
he who is overwhelmed by calamity, has the less
chance of encountering fresh disasters, as a man at
the bottom of a hill, runs very little risk of
breaking
his neck by tumbling to the top.
This is the very essence of true wisdom, which
consists in knowing when we ought to be
miserable
;
and was discovered much about the same
time with that invaluable secret, that every thing
is vanity and vexation of spirit; in consequence
of which maxim your wise men have ever been the
unhappiest of the human race; esteeming it as an
infalliable mark of genius to be distressed without
reasonsince any man may be miserable in time of
misfortune, but it is the philosopher alone who
can discover cause for grief in the very hour of
prosperity.
According to the principle I have just
advanced
,
we find that the colony of New Netherlands,
which under the reign of the renowned Van
Twiller
,
had flourished in such alarming and fatal
serenity
;
is now paying for its former welfare, and
discharging the enormous debt of comfort which it
contracted. Foes harass it from different
quarters
;
the city of New Amsterdam, while yet in its
infancy is kept in constant alarm; and its valiant
commander little William the Testy answers the
vulgar, but expressive idea of a man in a peck of
troubles.
While busily engaged repelling his bitter
enemies
the Yankees, on one side, we find him
suddenly
molested in another quarter, and by other
assailants. A vagrant colony of Swedes, under
the conduct of Peter Minnewits, and professing
allegience
to that redoubtable virago, Christina queen
of Sweden; had settled themselves and erected
a fort on south (or Delaware) riverwithin the
boundaries, claimed by the Government of the
New Netherlands. History is mute as to the
particulars
of their first landing, and their real
pretensions
to the soil, and this is the more to be
lamented
;
as this same colony of Swedes will hereafter
be found most materially to affect, not only the
interests
of the Nederlanders, but of the world at
large!
In whatever manner therefore, this vagabond
colony of Swedes first took possession of the
country
,
it is certain that in 1638, they established a
fort, and Minnewits, according to the off hand usage
of his contemporaries, declared himself governor of
all the adjacent country, under the name of the
province
of
New Sweden
. No sooner did this reach
the ears of the choleric Wilhelmus, than, like a true
spirited chieftan, he immediately broke into a
violent
rage, and calling together his council,
belaboured
the Swedes most lustily in the longest speech
that had ever been heard in the colony, since the
memorable dispute of Ten breeches and Tough
breeches. Having thus given vent to the first
ebullitions
of his indignation, he had resort to his
favourite
measure of proclamation, and dispatched
one, piping hot, in the first year of his reign,
informing
Peter Minnewits that the whole territory,
bordering on the south river, had, time out of mind,
been in possession of the Dutch colonists, having
been beset with forts, and sealed with their
blood.
The latter sanguinary sentence, would convey
an idea of direful war and bloodshed; were we not
relieved by the information that it merely related to
a fray, in which some half a dozen Dutchmen had
been killed by the Indians, in their benevolent
attempts
to establish a colony and promote
civilization
.
By this it will be seen that William Kieft,
though a very small man, delighted in big
expressions
,
and was much given to a praise-worthy figure
in rhetoric, generally cultivated by your little great
men, called hyperbole. A figure which has been
found of infinite service among many of his class,
and which has helped to swell the grandeur of
many
a mighty self-important, but windy chief
magistrate
.
Nor can I resist in this place, from
observing
how much my beloved country is indebted to
this same figure of hyperbole, for supporting
certain
of her greatest charactersstatesmen, orators,
civilians and divines; who by dint of big words,
inflated periods, and windy doctrines, are kept
afloat on the surface of society, as ignorant
swimmers
are buoyed up by blown bladders.
The proclamation against Minnewits concluded
by ordering the self-dubbed governor, and his gang
of Swedish adventurers, immediately to leave the
country under penalty of the high displeasure, and
inevitable vengeance of the puissant government of
the Nieuw Nederlandts. This strong measure,
however, does not seem to have had a whit more
effect than its predecessors, which had been
thundered
against the Yankeesthe Swedes resolutely
held on to the territory they had taken possession
ofwhereupon matters for the present remained in
statu quo.
That Wilhelmus Kieft should put up with this
insolent obstinacy in the Swedes, would appear
incompatible
with his valourous temperament; but
we find that about this time the little man had his
hands full; and what with one annoyance and
another
,
was kept continually on the bounce.
There is a certain description of active
legislators
,
who by shrewd management, contrive always
to have a hundred irons on the anvil, every one of
which must be immediately attended to; who
consequently
are ever full of temporary shifts and
expedients
,
patching up the public welfare and cobbling
the national affairs, so as to make nine holes where
they mend onestopping chinks and flaws with
whatever comes first to hand, like the Yankees I
have mentioned stuffing old clothes in broken
windows
.
Of this class of statesmen was William
the Testyand had he only been blessed with powers
equal to his zeal, or his zeal been disciplined by a
little discretion, there is very little doubt but he
would have made the greatest governor of his size
on recordthe renowned governor of the island of
Barataria alone excepted.
The great defect of Wilhelmus Kieft's policy
was, that though no man could be more ready to stand
forth in an hour of emergency, yet he was so intent
upon guarding the national pocket, that he suffered
the enemy to break its headin other words,
whatever
precaution for public safety he adopted, he was
so intent upon rendering it cheap, that he invariably
rendered it ineffectual. All this was a remote
consequence
VOL. I. X
of his profound education at the Hague
where having acquired a smattering of knowledge,
he was ever after a great conner of indexes,
continually
dipping into books, without ever studying to
the bottom of any subject; so that he had the scum
of all kinds of authors fermenting in his
pericranium
.
In some of these title page researches he
unluckily
stumbled over a grand political
cabalistic
word
, which, with his customary facility he
immediately
incorporated into his great scheme of
government
,
to the irretrievable injury and delusion
of the honest province of Nieuw Nederlandts, and
the eternal misleading, of all experimental rulers.
In vain have I pored over the Theurgia of the
Chaldeans, the Cabala of the Jews, the Necromancy
of the ArabiansThe Magic of the Persiansthe
Hocus Pocus of the English, the Witch-craft of
the Yankees, or the Pow-wowing of the Indians to
discover where the little man first laid eyes on this
terrible word. Neither the Sephir Jetzirah, that
famous cabalistic volume, ascribed to the Patriarch
Abraham; nor the pages of the Zohar, containing
the mysteries of the cabala, recorded by the learned
rabbi Simeon Jochaides, yield any light to my
enquiries
Nor
am I in the least benefited by my
painful researches in the Shem-hamphorah of
Benjamin
,
the wandering Jew, though it enabled
Davidus
Elm to make a ten days' journey, in twenty
four hours. Neither can I perceive the slightest
affinity in the Tetragrammaton, or sacred name of
four letters, the profoundest word of the Hebrew
Cabala; a mystery, sublime, ineffable and
incommunicable
and
the letters of which
Jod-He-Van-He
,
having been stolen by the Pagans, constituted
their great Name Jao, or Jove. In short, in all my
cabalistic, theurgic, necromantic, magical and
astrological
researches, from the Tetractys of
Pythagoras
,
to the recondite works of Breslaw and mother
Bunch, I have not discovered the least vestige of
an origin of this word, nor have I discovered any
word of sufficient potency to counteract it.
Not to keep my reader in any suspence, the
word which had so wonderfully arrested the
attention
of William the Testy and which in German
characters, had a particularly black and ominous
aspect, on being fairly translated into the English
is no other than
economy
a talismanic term,
which by constant use and frequent mention, has
ceased to be formidable in our eyes, but which has
as terrible potency as any in the arcana of
necromancy
.
When pronounced in a national assembly it has
an immediate effect in closing the hearts,
beclouding
the intellects, drawing the purse strings and
buttoning
the breeches pockets of all philosophic
legislators
.
Nor are its effects on the eye less
wonderful
.
It produces a contraction of the retina, an
obscurity of the christaline lens, a viscidity of the
vitreous and an inspiration of the aqueous
humours
,
an induration of the tunica sclerotica and a
convexity of the cornea; insomuch that the organ of
vision loses its strength and perspicuity, and the
unfortunate patient becomes
myopes
or in plain
English, pur-blind; perceiving only the amount of
immediate expense without being able to look
further
,
and regard it in connexion with the ultimate
object to be effected.So that, to quote the
words of the eloquent Burke, a briar at his nose
is of greater magnitude than an oak at five hundred
yards distance. Such are its instantaneous
operations
,
and the results are still more astonishing.
By its magic influence seventy-fours, shrink into
frigatesfrigates into sloops, and sloops into
gunboats
.
As the defenceless fleet of Eneas, at the
command of the protecting Venus, changed into sea
nymphs, and protected itself by diving; so the
mighty navy of America, by the cabalistic word
economy, dwindles into small craft, and shelters
itself in a mill-pond!
This all potent word, which served as his
touchstone in politics, at once explains the whole
system of proclamations, protests, empty threats,
windmills trumpeters, and paper war, carried on by
Wilhelmus the Testyand we may trace its
operations
in an armament which he fitted out in 1642 in a moment of great wrath; consisting of two
sloops and
thirty
men, under the command of
Mynheer Jan Jansen Alpendam, as admiral of the
fleet, and commander in chief of the forces. This
formidable expedition, which can only be paralleled
by some of the daring cruizes of our infant navy,
about the bay and up the sound; was intended to
drive the Marylanders from the Schuylkill, of
which they had recently taken possessionand
which was claimed as part of the province of New
Nederlantsfor it appears that at this time our
infant
colony was in that enviable state, so much
coveted by ambitious nations, that is to say, the
government had a vast extent of territory; part of
which it enjoyed, and the greater part of which it
had continually to quarrel about.
Admiral Jan Jansen Alpendam was a man of
great mettle and prowess; and no way dismayed at
the character of the enemy; who were represented
as a gigantic gunpowder race of men, who lived on
hoe cakes and bacon, drank mint juleps and brandy
toddy, and were exceedingly expert at boxing,
biting, gouging, tar and feathering, and a variety of
other athletic accomplishments, which they had
borrowed from their cousins german and prototypes
the Virginians, to whom they have ever borne
considerable resemblancenotwithstanding all these
alarming representations, the admiral entered the
Schuylkill most undauntedly with his fleet, and
arrived without disaster or opposition at the place
of destination.
X 2
Here he attacked the enemy in a vigorous
speech in low dutch, which the wary Kieft had
previously
put in his pocket; wherein he courteously
commenced by calling them a pack of lazy, louting,
dram drinking, cock fighting, horse racing, slave
driving, tavern haunting, sabbath breaking, mulatto
breeding upstartsand concluded by ordering them
to evacuate the country immediatelyto which
they most laconically replied in plain English (as
was very natural for Swedes) they'd see him
dd first.
Now this was a reply for which neither Jan
Jansen Alpendam, nor Wilhelmus Kieft had made
any calculationand finding himself totally
unprepared
to answer so terrible a rebuff with suitable
hostility he concluded, like a most worthy admiral
of a modern English expedition, that his wisest
course was to return home and report progress.
He accordingly sailed back to New Amsterdam,
where he was received with great honours, and
considered as a pattern for all commanders;
having
achieved a most hazardous enterprize, at a
trifling expense of treasure, and without losing a
single man to the state!He was unanimously
called the deliverer of his country; (an appellation
liberally bestowed on all great men) his two sloops
having done their duty, were laid up (or dry
docked
)
in a cove now called the Albany Bason, where
they quietly rotted in the mud; and to immortalize
his name, they erected, by subscription, a magnificent
shingle monument on the top of Flatten barrack
[30]
[30]
A corruption of Varleth's berghor Varleth's hill, so called
from one Varleth, who lived upon that hill in the early days of
the settlement.
Editor
.
Hill, which lasted three whole years; when it fell
to pieces, and was burnt for fire-wood.
CHAP. V.
How William the Testy enriched the Province by a
multitude of good-for-nothing laws, and came to
be the Patron of Lawyers and Bum-Bailiffs.
How he undertook to rescue the public from a
grevious evil, and had well nigh been smoked to
death for his pains. How the people became
exceedingly enlightened and unhappy, under his
instructionswith divers other matters which
will be found out upon perusal
.
Among
the many wrecks and fragments of
exalted
wisdom, which have floated down the stream
of time, from venerable antiquity, and have been
carefully picked up by those humble, but
industrious
wights, who ply along the shores of literature,
we find the following sage ordinance of Charondas,
the locrian legislatorAnxious to preserve the
ancient
laws of the state from the additions and
improvements
of profound country members, or
officious candidates for popularity, he ordained, that
whoever proposed a new law, should do it with a
halter about his neck; so that in case his
proposition
was rejected, he was strung upand there the
matter ended.
This salutary institution had such an effect, that
for more than two hundred years there was only
one trifling alteration in the criminal codeand the
whole race of lawyers starved to death for want of
employment. The consequence of this was, that
the Locrians being unprotected by an overwhelming
load of excellent laws, and undefended by a
standing
army of pettifoggers and sheriff's officers, lived
very lovingly together, and were such a happy
people
,
that we scarce hear any thing of them
throughout
the whole Grecian historyfor it is well known
that none but your unlucky, quarrelsome, rantipole
nations make any noise in the world.
Well would it have been for William the Testy,
had he happily, in the course of his universal
acquirements
,
stumbled upon this precaution of the
good Charondas. On the contrary, he conceived
that the true policy of a legislator was to multiply
laws, and thus secure the property, the persons and
the morals of the people, by surrounding them in a
manner with men traps and spring guns, and
besetting
even the sweet sequestered walks of private
life, with quick-set hedges, so that a man could
scarcely turn, without the risk of encountering some
of these pestiferous protectors. Thus was he
continually
coining petty laws for every petty offence
that occurred, until in time they became too
numerous
to be remembered, and remained like those of
certain modern legislators, in a manner dead letters
revived occasionally for the purpose of individual
oppression, or to entrap ignorant offenders.
Petty courts consequently began to appear,
where the law was administered with nearly as
much wisdom and impartiality as in those august
tribunals the aldermen's and justice shops of the
present day. The plaintiff was generally favoured,
as being a customer and bringing business to the
shop; the offences of the rich were discreetly
winked atfor fear of hurting the feelings of their
friends;but it could never be laid to the charge
of the vigilant burgomasters, that they suffered
vice to skulk unpunished, under the disgraceful
rags of poverty.
About this time may we date the first
introduction
of capital punishmentsa goodly gallows
being
erected on the water-side, about where
Whitehall
stairs are at present, a little to the east of the
battery. Hard by also was erected another gibbet
of a very strange, uncouth and unmatchable
description
,
but on which the ingenious William Kieft
valued
himself not a little, being a punishment
entirely
of his own invention.
[31]
[31]
Both the gibbets as mentioned above by our author, may be
seen in the sketch of Justus Danker, which we have prefixed to the
work.
Editor
.
It was for loftiness of altitude not a whit
inferior
to that of Haman, so renowned in bible history;
but the marvel of the contrivance was, that the
culprit instead of being suspended by the neck,
according
to venerable custom, was hoisted by the
waistband, and was kept for an hour together,
dangling and sprawling between heaven and earth
to the infinite entertainment and doubtless great
edification of the multitude of respectable citizens,
who usually attend upon exhibitions of the kind.
It is incredible how the little governor chuckled
at beholding caitiff vagrants and sturdy beggars
thus swinging by the breech, and cutting antic
gambols
in the air. He had a thousand pleasantries,
and mirthful conceits to utter upon the occasions
He called them his dandle-lionshis wild fowl
his high flyershis spread eagleshis goshawks
his scare-crows and finally his
gallows birds
, which
ingenious appellation, though originally confined to
worthies who had taken the air in this strange
manner
,
has since grown to be a cant name given to all
candidates for legal elevation. This punishment,
moreover, if we may credit the assertions of
certain
grave etymologists, gave the first hint for a
kind of harnessing, or strapping, by which our
forefathers
braced up their multifarious breeches, and
which has of late years been revived and continue.
to be worn at the present day. It still bears the
name of the object to which it owes its origin;
being
generally termed a pair of
gallows-es
though
I am informed it is sometimes vulgarly
denominated
suspenders
.
Such were the admirable improvements of
William Kieft in criminal lawnor was his civil
code less a matter of wonderment, and much does
it grieve me that the limits of my work will not
suffer me to expatiate on both, with the prolixity
they deserve. Let it suffice then to say; that in a
little while the blessings of innumerable laws
became
notoriously apparent. It was soon found
necessary to have a certain class of men to expound
and confound themdivers pettifoggers
accordingly
made their appearance, under whose
protecting
care the community was soon set together by
the ears.
I would not here, for the whole world, be
thought to insinuate any thing derogatory to the
profession of the law, or to its dignified
members
.
Well am I aware, that we have in this
ancient
city an innumerable host of worthy
gentlemen
,
who have embraced that honourable order,
not for the sordid love of filthy lucre, or the selfish
cravings of renown, but through no other motives
under heaven, but a fervent zeal for the correct
administration
of justice, and a generous and
disinterested
devotion to the interests of their fellow
citizens
!Sooner
would I throw this trusty pen into
the flames, and cork up my ink bottle forever
(which is the worst punishment a maggot brained
author can inflict upon himself) than infringe even
for a nail's breadth upon the dignity of this truly
benevolent class of citizenson the contrary I
allude
solely to that crew of caitiff scouts who in these
latter days of evil have become so numerouswho
infest the skirts of the profession, as did the
recreant
Cornish knights the honourable order of chivalry
who, under its auspices, commit their
depredations
on societywho thrive by quibbles, quirks
and chicanery, and like vermin swarm most, where
there is most corruption.
Nothing so soon awakens the malevolent
passions
as the facility of gratification. The courts of
law would never be so constantly crowded with
petty
,
vexatious and disgraceful suits, were it not for
the herds of pettifogging lawyers that infest them.
These tamper with the passions of the lower and
more ignorant classes; who, as if poverty was not
a sufficient misery in itself, are always ready to
heighten it, by the bitterness of litigation. They
are in law what quacks are in medicineexciting
the malady for the purpose of profiting by the cure,
and retarding the cure, for the purpose of
augmenting
the fees. Where one destroys the constitution,
the other impoverishes the purse; and it may
likewise
be observed, that a patient, who has once been
under the hands of a quack, is ever after dabbling
in drugs, and poisoning himself with infallible
remedies
;
and an ignorant man who has once meddled
with the law under the auspices of one of these
empyrics
,
is forever after embroiling himself with his
neighbours, and impoverishing himself with
successful
VOL. I. Y
law suits.My readers will excuse this
digression
into which I have been unwarily betrayed;
but I could not avoid giving a cool, unprejudiced
account of an abomination too prevalent in this
excellent
city, and with the effects of which I am
unluckily
acquainted to my cost; having been nearly
ruined by a law suit, which was unjustly decided
against meand my ruin having been completed,
by another which was decided in my favour.
It is an irreparable loss to posterity, that of the
innumerable laws enacted by William the Testy,
which doubtless formed a code that might have
vied with those of Solon, Lycurgus or Sancho
Panza
,
but few have been handed down to the present
day, among which the most important is one
framed
in an unlucky moment, to prohibit the
universal
practice of smoking. This he proved by
mathematical
demonstration, to be not merely a heavy
tax upon the public pocket, but an incredible
consumer
of time, a hideous encourager of idleness,
and of course a deadly bane to the morals of the
people. Ill fated Kieft!had he lived in this most
enlightened and libel loving age, and attempted to
subvert the inestimable liberty of the press, he
could not have struck more closely, upon the
sensibilities
of the million.
The populace were in as violent a turmoil as
the constitutional gravity of their deportment would
permita mob of factious citizens had even the
hardihood to assemble around the little governor's
house, where setting themselves resolutely down,
like a besieging army before a fortress, they one and
all fell to smoking with a determined perseverance,
that plainly evinced it was their intention, to funk
him into terms with villainous Cow-pen
mundungus
!Already
was the stately mansion of the
governor
enveloped in murky clouds, and the
puissant
little man, almost strangled in his hole, when
bethinking himself, that there was no instance on
record, of any great man of antiquity perishing in
so ignoble a manner (the case of Pliny the elder
being
the only one that bore any resemblance)he was
fain to come to terms, and compromise with the
mob, on condition that they should spare his life,
by immediately extinguishing their tobacco pipes.
The result of the armistice was, that though he
continued to permit the custom of smoking, yet did
he abolish the fair long pipes which prevailed in the
days of Wouter Van Twiller, denoting ease,
tranquillity
and sobriety of deportment, and in place
thereof introduced little captious short pipes, two
inches in length; which he observed could be stuck
in one corner of the mouth, or twisted in the
hat-band
,
and would not be in the way of business.
But mark, oh reader! the deplorable consequences.
The smoke of these villainous little pipes
continually
ascending in a cloud about the nose, penetrated
into and befogged the cerebellum, dried up all the
kindly moisture of the brain, and rendered the
people
as vapourish and testy as their renowned little
governornay, what is more, from a goodly
burley
race of folk, they became, like our honest dutch
farmers, who smoke short pipes, a lanthorn-jawed,
smoak-dried, leathern-hided race of men.
Indeed it has been remarked by the observant
writer of the Stuyvesant manuscript, that under the
administration of Wilhelmus Kieft the disposition
of the inhabitants of New Amsterdam experienced
an essential change, so that they became very
meddlesome and factious. The constant
exacerbations
of temper into which the little governor
was thrown, by the maraudings on his frontiers,
and his unfortunate propensity to experiment and
innovation, occasioned him to keep his council in a
continual worryand the council being to the
people at large, what yeast or leaven is to a batch,
they threw the whole community into a ferment
and the people at large being to the city, what the
mind is to the body, the unhappy commotions they
underwent operated most disastrously, upon New
Amsterdaminsomuch, that in certain of their
paroxysms of consternation and perplexity, they
begat several of the most crooked, distorted and
abominable streets, lanes and alleys, with which
this metropolis is disfigured.
But the worst of the matter was, that just about
this time the mob, since called the sovereign people,
like Balaam's ass, began to grow more
enlightened
than its rider, and exhibited a strange
desire of governing itself. This was another
effect
of the universal acquirements of William
the Testy. In some of his pestilent researches
among the rubbish of antiquity, he was struck with
admiration at the institution of public tables among
the Lacedemonians, where they discussed topics
of a general and interesting natureat the schools
of the philosophers, where they engaged in profound
disputes upon politics and moralswhere grey
beards were taught the rudiments of wisdom, and
youths learned to become little men, before they
were boys. There is nothing said the ingenious
Kieft, shutting up the book, there is nothing
more essential to the well management of a country,
than education among the people; the basis of a
good government, should be laid in the public mind.
now this was true enough, but it was ever the
wayward fate of William the Testy, that when he
thought right, he was sure to go to work wrong.
In the present instance he could scarcely eat or
sleep, until he had set on foot brawling debating
societies, among the simple citizens of New
Amsterdam
.
This was the one thing wanting to
complete his confusion. The honest Dutch
burghers
,
though in truth but little given to argument
Y 2
or wordy altercation, yet by dint of meeting often
together, fuddling themselves with strong drink,
beclouding their brains with tobacco smoke, and
listening to the harangues of some half a dozen
oracles, soon became exceedingly wise, andas is
always the case where the mob is politically
enlightened
exceedingly
discontented. They found
out, with wonderful quickness of discernment, the
fearful error in which they had indulged, in
fancying
themselves the happiest people in creation
and were fortunately convinced, that, all
circumstances
to the contrary notwithstanding, they were
a very unhappy, deluded, and consequently, ruined
people!
In a short time the quidnuncs of New
Amsterdam
formed themselves into sage juntos of
political croakers, who daily met together to groan
over public affairs, and make themselves miserable;
thronging to these unhappy assemblages with the
same eagerness, that your zealots have in all ages
abandoned the milder and more peaceful paths of
religion to crowd to the howling convocations of
fanaticism. We are naturally prone to discontent,
and avaricious after imaginary causes of
lamentation
like
lubberly monks we belabour our own
shoulders, and seem to take a vast satisfaction in
the music of our own groans. Nor is this said for
the sake of paradox; daily experience shews the
truth of these sage observations. It is next to a
farce to offer consolation, or to think of elevating
the spirits of a man, groaning under ideal calamities;
but nothing is more easy than to render him
wretched
,
though on the pinnacle of felicity; as it is an
Herculean task to hoist a man to the top of a steeple,
though the merest child can topple him off thence.
In the sage assemblages I have noticed, the
philosophic reader will at once perceive the faint
germs of those sapient convocations called popular
meetings, prevalent at our dayHither resorted
all those idlers and squires of low degree, who
like rags, hang loose upon the back of society, and
are ready to be blown away by every wind of
doctrine
.
Coblers abandoned their stalls and
hastened
hither to give lessons on political economy
blacksmiths left their handicraft and suffered their
own fires to go out, while they blew the bellows
and stirred up the fire of faction; and even taylors,
though but the shreds and patches, the ninth parts
of humanity, neglected their own measures, to
attend
to the measures of governmentNothing
was wanting but half a dozen newspapers and
patriotic
editors, to have completed this public
illumination
and to have thrown the whole province in
an uproar!
I should not forget to mention, that these
popular
meetings were always held at a noted tavern;
for houses of that description, have always been
found the most congenial nurseries of politicks;
abounding with those genial streams which give
strength and sustenance to factionWe are told that
the ancient Germans, had an admirable mode of
treating any question of importance; they first
deliberated
upon it when drunk, and afterwards
reconsidered
it, when sober. The shrewder mobs of
America, who dislike having two minds upon a
subject, both determine and act upon it drunk; by
which means a world of cold and tedious
speculation
is dispensed withand as it is universally
allowed
that when a man is drunk he sees
double
, it
follows most conclusively that he sees twice as well
as his sober neighbours.
CHAP VI.
Shewing the great importance of party distinctions,
and the dolourous perplexities into which William
the Testy was thrown, by reason of his having
enlightened the multitude
.
For some time however, the worthy politicians
of New Amsterdam, who had thus conceived the
sublime project of saving the nation, were very
much perplexed by dissentions, and strange
contrariety
of opinions among themselves, so that they
were often thrown into the most chaotic uproar and
confusion, and all for the simple want of party
classification
.
Now it is a fact well known to your
experienced
politicians, that it is equally necessary to
have a distinct classification and nomenclature in
politics, as in the physical sciences. By this means
the several orders of patriots, with their breedings
and cross breedings, their affinities and varieties
may be properly distinguished and known. Thus
have arisen in different quarters of the world the
generic titles of Guelfs and GhibbelinsRound
heads and CavaliersBig endians and Little endians
Whig and ToryAristocrat and Democrat
Republican and JacobinFederalist and
Antifederalist
,
together with a certain mongrel party called
Quid;
which seems to have been engendered
between
the two last mentioned parties, as a mule is
produced between an horse and an assand like a
mule it seems incapable of procreation, fit only for
humble drudgery, doomed to bear successively the
burthen of father and mother, and to be cudgelled
soundly for its pains.
The important benefit of these distinctions is
obvious. How many very strenuous and hard
working patriots are there, whose knowledge is
bounded by the political vocabulary, and who,
were they not thus arranged in parties would never
know their own minds, or which way to think on a
subject; so that by following their own common
sense the community might often fall into that
unanimity, which has been clearly proved, by many
excellent writers, to be fatal to the welfare of a
republick. Often have I seen a very well meaning
hero of seventy six, most horribly puzzled to make
up his opinion about certain men and measures,
and running a great risk of thinking right; until
all at once he resolved his doubts by resorting to
the old touch stone of
Whig
and
Tory;
which
titles, though they bear about as near an affinity to
the present parties in being, as do the robustious
statues of Gog and Magog, to the worthy London
Aldermen, who devour turtle under their auspices
at Guild-Hall; yet are they used on all occasions
by the sovereign people, as a pair of spectacles,
through which they are miraculously enabled to see
beyond their own noses, and to distinguish a hawk
from a hand saw, or an owl from a
buzzard
!
Well, was it recorded in holy writ, "the horse
knoweth his rider, and the ass his master's crib,"
for when the sovereign people are thus harnessed
out, and properly yoked together, it is delectable to
behold with what system and harmony they jog
onward
,
trudging through the mud and mire, obeying the
commands of their drivers, and dragging the
scurvy
dung carts of faction at their heels. How many
a patriotic member of congress have I known,
loyally
disposed to adhere to his party through thick
and think but who would often, from sheer ignorance,
or the dictates of conscience and common sense,
have stumbled into the ranks of his adversaries, and
advocated the opposite side of the question, had not
the parties been thus broadly designated by generic
titles.
The wise people of New Amsterdam therefore,
after for some time enduring the evils of confusion,
at length,
like honest dutchmen as they were,
soberly
settled down into two distinct parties, known
by the name of
Square head
and
Platter breech
--
the former implying that the bearer was deficient in
that rotundity of pericranium, which was
considered
as a token of true genius--the latter, that he was
destitute of genuine courage, or
good bottom
, as it
has since been technically termed--and I defy all
the politicians of this great city to shew me where
any two parties of the present day, have split upon
more important and fundamental points.
These names, to tell the honest truthand I
scorn to tell any thing elsewere not the mere
progeny
of whim or accident, as were those of Ten
Breeches and Tough Breeches, in the days of yore,
but took their origin in recondite and scientific
deductions
of certain Dutch philosophers. In a word,
they were the dogmas or elementary principia
of those ingenious systems since supported in the
physiognomical tracts of Lavater, who gravely
measures
intellect by the length of a nose, or detects it
lurking in the curve of a lip, or the arch of an
eye-brow
The
craniology of Dr. Gall, who has found
out the encampments and strong holds of the virtues
and vices, passions and habits among the
protuberances
of the skull, and proves that your whorson
jobbernowl, is your true skull of geniusThe
Linea Fascialis
of Dr. Petrus Camper, anatomical
professor in the college of Amsterdam, which
regulates
every thing by the relative position of the
upper and lower jaw; shewing the ancient opinion
to be correct that the owl is the wisest of animals,
and that a pancake face is an unfailing index of
talents, and a true model of beautyand finally,
the breechology of professor Higgenbottom, which
teaches the surprizing and intimate connection
between
the seat of honour, and the seat of intellect
a doctrine supported by experiments of pedagogues
in all ages, who have found that applications
a parte
poste
, are marvellously efficacious in quickening the
perceptions of their scholars, and that the most
expeditious
mode of instilling knowledge into their
heads, is to hammer it into their bottoms!
Thus then, the enlightened part of the
inhabitants
of Nieuw Nederlandts, being comfortably
arranged
into parties, went to work with might and
main to uphold the common wealthassembling
together in separate beer-houses, and smoking at
each other with implacable animosity, to the great
support of the state, and emolument of the
tavern-keepers
.
Some indeed who were more zealous
than the rest went further, and began to bespatter
one another with numerous very hard names and
scandalous little words, to be found in the dutch
language; every partizan believing religiously that
he was serving his country, when he besmutted the
character, or damaged the pocket of a political
adversary
.
But however they might differ between
themselves, both parties agreed on one point, to
cavil
at and condemn every measure of government
whether right or wrong; for as the governor was
by his station independent of their power, and was
not elected by their choice, and as he had not
decided
in favour of either faction, neither of them
VOL. I. Z
were interested in his success, or the prosperity of
the country while under his administration.
Unhappy William Kieft! exclaims the sage
writer of the Stuyvesant manuscript,doomed to
contend with enemies too knowing to be entrapped,
and to reign over people, too wise to be governed!
All his expeditions against his enemies were
baffled
and set at naught, and all his measures for the
public safety, were cavilled at by the people.
Did he propose levying an efficient body of
troops for internal defence, the mob, that is to
say, those vagabond members of the community
who have nothing to lose, immediately took the
alarm, vociferated that their interests were in
danger
that
a standing army was a legion of moths,
preying on the pockets of society; a rod of iron in
the hands of government; and that a government
with a military force at its command, would
inevitably
swell into a despotism. Did he, as was but
too commonly the case, defer preparation until the
moment of emergency, and then hastily collect a
handful of undisciplined vagrants, the measure was
hooted at, as feeble and inadequate, as trifling with
the public dignity and safety, and as lavishing the
public funds on impotent enterprizes.Did he
resort
to the economic measure of proclamation, he
was laughed at by the Yankees, did he back it by
non-intercourse, it was evaded and counteracted by
his own subjects. Whichever way he turned
himself
he was beleaguered and distracted by petitions
of numerous and respectable meetings,
consisting
of some half a dozen scurvy pot-house
politicians
all
of which he read, and what is worse, all
of which he attended to. The consequence was,
that by incessantly changing his measures, he gave
none of them a fair trial; and by listening to the
clamours of the mob and endeavouring to do every
thing, he in sober truth did nothing.
I would not have it supposed however, that he
took all these memorials and interferences good
naturedly
,
for such an idea would do injustice to his
valiant spirit; on the contrary he never received a
piece of advice in the whole course of his life,
without
first getting into a passion with the giver. But
I have ever observed that your passionate little
men, like small boats with large sails, are the
easiest upset or blown out of their course; and this
is demonstrated by governor Kieft, who though
in temperament as hot as an old radish, and with
a mind, the territory of which was subjected to
perpetual
whirl-winds and tornadoes, yet never failed
to be carried away by the last piece of advice that
was blown into his ear. Lucky was it for him
that his power was not dependant upon the greasy
multitude, and that as yet the populace did not
possess the important privilege of nominating their
chief magistrate. They, however, like a true mob,
did their best to help along public affairs; pestering
their governor incessantly, by goading him on with
harangues and petitions, and then thwarting his
fiery spirit with reproaches and memorials, like a
knot of sunday jockies, managing an unlucky devil
of a hack horseso that Wilhelmus Kieft, may be
said to have been kept either on a worry or a
hand gallop, throughout the whole of his
administration
.
CHAP. VII.
Containing divers fearful accounts of Border wars,
and the flagrant outrages of the Moss troopers of
ConnecticutWith the rise of the great
Amphyctionic
Council of the east, and the decline of
William the Testy
.
Among
the many perils and mishaps that
surround
your hardy historian, there is one that in
spite of my unspeakable delicacy, and unbounded
good will towards all my fellow creatures, I have
no hopes of escaping. While raking with curious
hand, but pious heart, among the rotten remains of
former days, I may fare somewhat like that doughty
fellow Sampson, who in meddling with the
carcass
of a dead Lion, drew a swarm of bees about
his ears. Thus I am sensible that in detailing the
many misdeeds of the Yanokie, or Yankee tribe, it
is ten chances to one but I offend the morbid
sensibilities
of certain of their unreasonable descendants,
who will doubtless fly out, and raise such a buzzing
about this unlucky pate of mine, that I shall need
the tough hide of an Achilles, or an Orlando
Furioso
,
to protect me from their stings. Should such
be the case I should deeply and sincerely lament
not my misfortune in giving offencebut the
wrong-headed
perverseness of this most ill natured and
uncharitable
Z 2
age, in taking offence at any thing I say.
My good, honest, testy sirs, how in heaven's name,
can I help it, if your great grandfathers behaved in a
scurvy manner to my great grandfathers?I'm very
sorry for it, with all my heart, and wish a thousand
times, that they had conducted themselves a
thousand
times better. But as I am recording the
sacred
events of history, I'd not bate one nail's
breadth of the honest truth, though I were sure the
whole edition of my work, should be bought up and
burnt by the common hangman of Connecticut.
And let me tell you, masters of mine! this is one of
the grand purposes for which we impartial
historians
were sent into the worldto redress wrongs
and render justice on the heads of the guiltySo
that though a nation may wrong their neighbours,
with temporary impunity, yet some time or another
an historian shall spring up, who shall give them a
hearty rib-roasting in return. Thus your ancestors,
I warrant them, little thought, when they were
kicking
and cuffing the worthy province of Nieuw
Nederlandts
,
and setting its unlucky little governor at
his wits ends, that such an historian as I should ever
arise, and give them their own, with interest
Body-o'me
!
but the very talking about it makes my
blood boil! and I have as great a mind as ever I
had for my dinner, to cut a whole host of your
ancestors
to mince meat, in my very next page!but
out of the bountiful affection which I feel towards
their descendants, I forbearand I trust when you
perceive how completely I have them all in my
power
,
and how, with one flourish of my pen I could
make every mother's son of ye grandfatherless, you
will not be able enough to applaud my candour and
magnanimity.To resume then, with my
accustomed
calmness and impartiality, the course of my
history.
It was asserted by the wise men of ancient
times, intimately acquainted with these matters,
that at the gate of Jupiter's palace lay two huge
tuns, the one filled with blessings, the other with
misfortunesand it verily seems as if the latter
had been set a tap, and left to deluge the unlucky
province of Nieuw Nederlandts. Among other
causes of irritation, the incessant irruptions and
spoliations of his eastern neighbours upon his
frontiers
,
were continually adding fuel to the naturally
inflammable temperament of William the Testy.
Numerous accounts of them may still be found
among the records of former days; for the
commanders
on the frontiers were especially careful to
evince their vigilance and soldierlike zeal, by
striving
who should send home the most frequent and
voluminous budgets of complaints, as your faithful
servant is continually running with complaints to
the parlour, of all the petty squabbles and
misdemeanours
of the kitchen.
All these valiant tale-bearings were listened to
with great wrath by the passionate little governor,
and his subjects, who were to the full as eager to
hear, and credulous to believe these frontier fables,
as are my fellow citizens to swallow those amusing
stories with which our papers are daily filled, about
British aggressions at sea, French sequestrations
on shore, and Spanish infringements in the
promised
land
of Louisianaall which proves what I
have before asserted, that your enlightened people
love to be miserable.
Far be it from me to insinuate however, that our
worthy ancestors indulged in groundless alarms;
on the contrary they were daily suffering a
repetition
of cruel wrongs, not one of which, but was a
sufficient reason, according to the maxims of
national
dignity and honour, for throwing the whole
universe into hostility and confusion.
From among a host of these bitter grievances
still on record, I select a few of the most atrocious,
and leave my readers to judge, if our progenitors
were not justifiable in getting into a very valiant
passion on the occasion.
24 June 1641. Some of Hartford haue taken
a hogg out of the vlact or common and shut it vp
out of meer hate or other prejudice, causing it to
starve for hunger in the stye!
26 July. The foremencioned English did againe
driue the companies hoggs out of the vlact of Sico
joke into Hartford; contending daily with
reproaches
,
blows, beating the people with all
disgrace
that they could imagine.
May 20, 1642. The English of Hartford haue
violently cut loose a horse of the honored
companies
,
that stood bound vpon the common or vlact.
May 9, 1643. The companies horses pastured
vpon the companies ground, were driven away by
them of Connecticott or Hartford, and the
heards-man
was lustily beaten with hatchets and sticks.
16. Again they sold a young Hogg belonging
to the Companie which piggs had pastured on the
Companies land.
[32]
[32]
Hag. Collect. S. Pap.
Oh ye powers! into what indignation did
every one of these outrages throw the
philosophic
Kieft! Letter after letter; protest after
protest
;
proclamation after proclamation; bad Latin,
Certain of Wilhelmus Kieft's Latin letters are still extant
in divers collections of state papers.
worse English, and hideous low dutch were
exhausted
in vain upon the inexorable Yankees; and
the four-and-twenty letters of the alphabet, which
except his champion, the sturdy trumpeter Van
Corlear, composed the only standing army he had
at his command, were never off duty, throughout
the whole of his administration.Nor did Antony
the trumpeter, remain a whit behind his patron,
the gallant William in his fiery zeal; but like a
faithful champion and preserver of the public
safety
,
on the arrival of every fresh article of news, he
was sure to sound his trumpet from the ramparts
with most disasterous notes, throwing the people
into violent alarms and disturbing their rest at all
times and seasonswhich caused him to be held in
very great regard, the public paying and pampering
him, as we do brawling editors, for similar
important
services.
Appearances to the eastward began now to
assume
a more formidable aspect than everfor I
would have you note that bitherto the province had
been chiefly molested by its immediate neighbours,
the people of Connecticut, particularly of Hartford,
which, if we may judge from ancient chronicles,
was the strong hold of these sturdy moss troopers;
from whence they sallied forth, on their daring
incursions
,
carrying terror and devastation into the
barns, the hen-roosts and pig-styes of our revered
ancestors.
Albeit about the year 1643, the people of the
east country, inhabiting the colonies of
Massachusetts
,
Connecticut, New Plymouth and New
Haven
,
gathered together into a mighty conclave, and
after buzzing and turmoiling for many days, like a
political hive of bees in swarming time, at length
settled themselves into a formidable confederation,
under the title of the United Colonies of New
England
.
By this union they pledged themselves to
stand by one another in all perils and assaults, and
to co-operate in all measures offensive and
defensive
against the surrounding savages, among which
were doubtlessly included our honoured ancestors
of the Manhattoes; and to give more strength and
system to this confederation, a general assembly
or grand council was to be annually held,
composed
of representatives from each of the provinces.
On receiving accounts of this puissant
combination
,
the fiery Wilhelmus was struck with vast
consternation, and for the first time in his whole
life, forgot to bounce, at hearing an unwelcome
piece of intelligencewhich a venerable historian
of the times observes, was especially noticed among
the sage politicians of New Amsterdam. The
truth was, on turning over in his mind all that he
had read at the Hague, about leagues and
combinations
,
he found that this was an exact imitation
of the famous Amphyctionic council, by which the
states of Greece were enabled to attain to such
power and supremacy, and the very idea made his
heart to quake for the safety of his empire at the
Manhattoes.
He strenuously insisted, that the whole object
of this confederation, was to drive the
Nederlanders
out of their fair domains; and always flew into
a great rage if any one presumed to doubt the
probability of his conjecture. Nor, to speak my
mind freely, do I think he was wholly unwarranted
in such a suspicion; for at the very first annual
meeting of the grand council, held at Boston
(which governor Kieft denominated the Delphos of
this truly classic league) strong representations
were made against the Nederlanders, for as much
as that in their dealings with the Indians they
carried on a traffic in guns, powther and shott
a trade damnable and injurious to the colonists.
Not but what certain of the Connecticut traders
did likewise dabble a little in this damnable traffic
but then they always sold the Indians such
scurvy guns, that they burst at the first discharge
and consequently hurt no one but these pagan
savages.
The rise of this potent confederacy was a death
blow to the glory of William the Testy, for from
that day forward, it was remarked by many,
he never held up his head, but appeared quite crest
fallen. His subsequent reign therefore, affords but
scanty food for the historic penwe find the grand
council continually augmenting in power, and
threatening
to overwhelm the mighty but defenceless
province of Nieuw Nederlandts; while Wilhelmus
Kieft kept constantly firing off his proclamations
and protests, like a sturdy little sea captain, firing
off so many carronades and swivels, in order to
break and disperse a water spoutbut alas! they
had no more effect than if they had been so many
blank cartridges.
The last document on record of this learned,
philosophic, but unfortunate little man is a long
letter to the council of the Amphyctions, wherein
in the bitterness of his heart he rails at the people
of New Haven, or red hills, for their uncourteous
contempt of his protest levelled at them for squatting
within the province of their high mightinesses.
From this letter, which is a model of epistolary
writing, abounding with pithy apophthegms and
classic figures, my limits will barely allow me to
extract the following recondite passage:-Certainly
when we heare the Inhabitants of New Hartford
complayninge of us, we seem to heare Esop's wolfe
complayninge of the lamb, or the admonition of the
younge man, who cryed out to his mother, chideing
with her neighboures, `Oh Mother revile her, lest
she first take up that practice against you.' But
being
taught by precedent passages we received such
an answer to our protest from the inhabitants of
New Haven as we expected:
the Eagle always
despiseth the Beetle fly;
yet notwithstanding we
doe undauntedly continue on our purpose of
pursuing
our own right, by just arms and righteous
means, and doe hope without scruple to execute
the express commands of our superiours. To
shew that this last sentence was not a mere empty
menace he concluded his letter, by intrepidly
protesting
against the whole council, as a horde of
squatters
and interlopers, inasmuch as they held
VOL. I. A a
their meeting at New Haven, or the Red Hills,
which he claimed as being within the province of
the New Netherlands.
Thus end the authenticated chronicles of the
reign of William the Tetyfor henceforth, in the
trouble, the perplexities and the confusion of the
times he seems to have been totally overlooked, and
to ahve slipped forever through the fingers of
scrupulous
history. Indeed from some cause or
another
,
which I cannot divine, there appears to have
been a combination among historians to sink his
very name into oblivion, in consequence of which
they have one and all forborne even to speak of his
exploits; and though I have disappointed the
caitiffs
in this their nefarious conspiracy, yet I much
question whether some one or other of their
adherents
may not even yet have the hardihood to rise
up, and question the authenticity of certain of the
well established and incontrovertible facts, I have
herein recordedbut let them do it at their peril;
for may I perish, if ever I catch any slanderous
incendiaries
contradicting a word of this immaculate
history, or robbing my heroes of any particle of that
renown they have gloriously acquired, if I do not
empty my whole ink-horn upon themeven though
it should equal in magnitude that of the sage
Gargantua
;
which according to the faithful chronicle of
his miraculous atchievements, weighted seven
thousand
quintals.
It has been a matter of deep concern to me, that
such darkness and obscurity should hang over the
latter days of the illustrious Kieftfor he was a
mighty and great little man worthy of being utterly
renowned, seeing that he was the first potentate
that introduced into this land, the art of fighting by
proclamation; and defending a country by
trumpeters
,
and windmillsan economic and humane
mode of warfare, since revived with great applause,
and which promises, if it can ever be carried into
full effect, to save great trouble and treasure, and
spare infinitely more bloodshed than either the
discovery of gunpowder, or the invention of
torpedoes
.
It is true that certain of the early provincial poets,
of whom there were great numbers in the Nieuw
Nederlandts, taking advantage of the mysterious
exit of William the Testy, have fabled, that like
Romulus he was translated to the skies, and forms
a very fiery little star, some where on the left claw
of the crab; while others equally fanciful, declare
that he had experienced a fate similar to that of the
good king Arthur; who, we are assured by ancient
bards, was carried away to the delicious abodes of
fairy land, where he still exists, in pristine worth
and vigour, and will one day or another return to
rescue poor old England from the hands of paltry,
flippant, pettifogging cabinets, and restore the
gallantry
,
the honour and the immaculate probity,
which prevailed in the glorious days of the Round
Table.
[33]
[33]
The old welsh bards believed that king Arthur was not dead
but carried awaie by the fairies into some pleasant place, where he
shold remaine for a time, and then returne againe and reigne in as
great authority as ever.
Hollingshed
.
The Britons suppose that he shall come yet and conquere all
Britaigne, for certes this is the prophicye of MerlynHe say'd that
his deth shall be doubteous; and said soth, for men thereof yet have
doubte and shullen for ever morefor men wyt not whether that
he lyveth or is dede.
De Leew. Chron
.
All these however are but pleasing fantasies, the
cobweb visions of those dreaming varlets the poets,
to which I would not have my judicious reader attach
any credibility. Neither am I disposed to yield
any credit to the assertion of an ancient and rather
apocryphal historian, who alledges that the ingenious
Wilhelmus was annihilated by the blowing down of
one of his windmillsnor to that of a writer of
later
times, who affirms that he fell a victim to a
philosophical
experiment, which he had for many
years been vainly striving to accomplish; having
the misfortune to break his neck from the garret
window of the Stadt house, in an ineffectual
attempt
to catch swallows, by sprinkling fresh salt
upon their tails.
The most probable account, and to which I am
inclined to give my implicit faith, is contained in a
very obscure tradition, which declares, that what
with the constant troubles on his frontiers, the
incessant
schemings, and projects going on in his own
pericraniumthe memorials, petitions,
remonstrances
and sage pieces of advice from divers
respectable
meetings of the sovereign people, together with
the refractory disposition of his council, who were
sure to differ from him on every point and
uniformly
to be in the wrongall these I say, did eternally
operate to keep his mind in a kind of furnace heat,
until he at length became as completly burnt out, as
a dutch family pipe which has passed through three
generations of hard smokers. In this manner did
the choleric but magnanimous William the Testy
undergo a kind of animal combustion, consuming
away like a farthing rush lightso that when grim
death finally snuffed him out, there was scarce left
enough of him to bury!
END OF BOOK IV.